label	text0	text1	text2	text3
1	bbc news bbc service cut outlined staff	Sketched BBC News Personnel Reduction Service.	BBC News Sketched Personnel Reduction Service.	BBC News BBC Staff reduction service sketch.
1	shame info dissemination bbc confirms service cut	It's the only way to get the information you need.	Dissemination of the appos; BBC's disgraceful news report confirms the service interruption.	Apos release; disgraceful BBC news confirms service interruption.
1	bbc service cut outlined staff	BBC downsizing.	Downsizing of the BBC.	We've got to cut back on the staff of the BBC.
2	looter destroy mummy egyptian museum official jan egypt daddy	Jan Egypt Daddy, official representative of the museum, destroys the Egyptian mummy.	The plunderer destroys the Egyptian mummy, the museum's official museum official, Jan Egypt Daddy.	Plunder destroys Egyptian mummy, museum official Jan Egypt Daddy.
2	thousand egyptian form human chain egypt museum protect looting aljazeera	Thousand Egyptians forming a Human Chain Egyptian Museum protecting the plundering of l' aljazeera.	Thousand Egyptians forming human chain Egyptian museum protecting plundering of the apos; aljazeera.	Thousand Egyptians forming human chain Egyptian museum protecting looting of l' aljazeera.
2	artifact stolen egyptian museum cairo sad	Artifact stolen Egyptian Museum sad cairo.	Artifact stolen Egyptian sad cairo museum.	Artifact stolen Egyptian museum cairo sad.
2	gamble care egyptian museum artifact freedom people egypt	Egyptian Gaming Care artifact Egyptian Freedom Museum.	Egyptian game care artefact museum of the Egyptians' freedom.	Egyptian game care artifact Egyptian museum of freedom.
2	reuters reporting looter break national museum yesterday destroy mummy	Reuters reports that looters smashed the National Museum yesterday, destroying Mummy.	Reuters reports that the looters trashed the national museum yesterday, destroying mummy.	Reuters reports looters broke the national museum yesterday, destroying mummy.
2	damaged artifact egyptian national museum cap al jazeera live stream egypt jan	Damaged artifact Cap al jazeera Egyptian National Museum live stream Jan Egypt.	Damaged artifact Egyptian National Museum Cape al jazeera live stream Jan Egypt.	Damaged artifact Egyptian National Museum cap al jazeera live stream Jan Egypt.
2	looter smashed egypt national museum damaged priceless artifact picture	A looter destroyed the Egyptian National Museum, damaging a photograph of it; priceless artifact.	A looter destroyed the Egyptian National Museum damaged a photo of D' priceless artifact.	A priceless artifact has been damaged by a looter who destroyed the Egyptian National Museum.
2	egypt military secures famed antiquity museum	The Egyptian army ensures the security of the famous D&apos Museum.	The army of Egypt ensures the security of the famous D&apos Museum.	L' army Egyptian ensures the security of the famous museum d' antiquity.
2	cairo building adjacent egypt national museum priceless collection pheoronic art entirely fire	Cairo built adjacent to the apos; Egypt National inestimable Phaoronic collection fire fully phaoronic art.	Cairo was built adjacent to the Apos; Egypt's priceless national museum collection of fire art and pheoronic art.	Cairo built adjacent to the apos; Egypt inestimable national museum priceless collection of pheoronic art fire entirely pheoronic art.
2	al jazeera thousand egyptian youth form human shield protect egyptian museum museum egypt jan	Thousands of young Egyptians form a human shield to protect the museum.	Thousands of young Egyptians formed a human shield to protect the Egyptian museum Jan.	Thousands of young Egyptians form human shield to protect the Egyptian museum Jan.
2	touching story protester protecting museum jan egypt	It's the first museum in the world to be built on the foundation of a museum.	Protestant of our touching stories protecting the museum Jan Egypt.	Protestant from touching stories protecting museum Jan Egypt.
2	looter destroy mummy egyptian museum official	The ransacking destroys the official Egyptian mummy of the museum.	The looter then destroys the official Egyptian mummy of the museum.	The looter destroys the official Egyptian mummy in the museum.
2	egypt army secures museum pharaonic treasure report cairo reuters army unit secured egyptian mu	The Egyptian army secures the Pharaoh's Museum of Treasure from Cairo to Cairo, and the Egyptian army secures the Egyptian army.	The Egyptian army secures Pharaoh's treasure museum cairo reuters unit of the Egyptian security army.	L' Egyptian army secures museum pharaonic treasure report cairo reuters unit of l' Egyptian army secured mu Egyptian.
2	looter destroy mummy egyptian museum	The looter destroys the Egyptian Mummy Museum.	The looter has destroyed the Egyptian mummy museum.	The looter destroys the Egyptian mummy museum.
2	army protestors protect imperiled cairo museum	Protesters from the army are protecting the endangered Cairo museum.	Protesters from the army protect the endangered Cairo museum.	Protesters from the army protect Cairo museum in peril.
2	al jazeera protestors create human shield egyptian museum protect egypt egipto jan	The Egyptians have been forced to abandon their weapons of mass destruction in order to prevent the spread of the virus.	The protestors d' Al Jazeera create the Egyptian Museum of the Human Shield to protect l' Egyptian Jan.	Al Jazeera protests create Egyptian human shield museum to protect Egyptian Jan Jan.
2	looter broke museum destroyed pharaonic mummy late friday nation top archaeologist reuters	Last Friday, a looter destroyed a museum and destroyed the nation's pharaoh mummy, Reuters.	A looter tore down a museum destroyed the nation's pharaoh's mummy last Friday, Archaeologist Reuters.	A looter destroyed a museum destroyed the nation's pharaoh mummy last Friday archaeologist Reuters.
2	protest protect human history human wall protecting cairo museum egypt egypte egipto mubarak pls	To protect the history of the human wall, to protect the museum of Cairo and Egypt, egipto Mubarak.	Protesting to protect the heritage; human history wall protect the museum in Cairo egipto Mubarak pls.	Protesting to protect the human history wall protect the Egyptian museum egipto Mubarak pls.
2	breakingnews looter broke museum destroyed pharaonic mummy late friday nation top archaeologist reuters egypt	This is the first time I've heard of a story that I've read about a man who's been killed by a man.	Breaking the apos; broken news museum destroyed pharaoh mummy late Friday top Egyptian archeologist reuters Egypt.	Breaking the apos; broke news museum destroys pharaonic mummy late Friday nation top archaeologist reuters egypt Egyptian.
2	thousand egyptian youth protecting cairo museum sabotage jan egypt mubarak	A thousand young Egyptians protecting the city of Cairo are sabotaging the Jan Egyptian Mubarak Museum.	A thousand young Egyptians protecting Cairo are sabotaging the Jan Egypt Mubarak museum.	A thousand Egyptian youth protecting Cairo sabotaging the Jan Egypt Mubarak Museum.
2	keeping informed	Keeping up to date.	To keep in touch.	You know, keep in touch.
2	aje human shield national museum arrested looter damage jan egypt reggaala	Human Shield National museum stopped damage plunder Jan egypt reggaala.	Aje human National Shield museum stopped looting damage Jan egypt reggaala.	Aje human Shield national museum stopped looting damage Jan egypt reggaala.
2	national museum lotted piece missing sigh jan jan egypt	Jan Egypt National Museum is missing a piece.	There's one piece missing from the Jan Egypt National Museum.	One piece is missing from the national museum Jan Egypt.
2	rioter destroy mummy egyptian museum cairo filed art culture history learning afric	It's been a long time, but it's been a long time, and it's been a long time, and it's been a long time.	Rioters destroy mummy museum @-@Egyptian Cairo has classified the history of art culture on learning about it; africa.	Rioters destroy mummy museum-Egyptian Cairo has classified the history of art culture learning African.
3	report italian polish medium claim robert kubica injured rally accident italy	He was injured at a rally in Italy, where he was shot at by an Italian psychic who claimed that Robert Kubica was injured.	An Italian painted medium claims that Robert Kubica s' is injured during d' a rally in Italy.	An Italian painted medium claims that Robert Kubica is injured in a rally in Italy.
3	robert kubica involved serious rallye accident	Robert Kubica was involved in a big rally accident.	Well, Robert Kubica was involved in a serious rally accident.	Robert kubica was involved in a serious rally accident.
3	star kubica involved serious crash yahoo eurosport	Star Kubica involved a serious yahoo crash in eurosport.	Star Kubica has been involved in a serious crash yahoo eurosport.	Star Kubica involved a serious crash yahoo eurosport.
3	kubicas injury major setback renaults assault title year petrov reserve driver will struggle pt	It's gonna be a tough year for Petrov to be a stand-by pilot.	Injury of kubicas revers major reaults assaults the year Petrov reserve pilot will have difficulty pt.	Kubicas back injury major reaults assault the apos; year Petrov reserve pilot will have trouble pt.
3	uk robert kubica injured rally accident italian polish medium	Uk robert kubica injured rally accidentally rally Italian pol médium rally.	Uk robert kubica injured rally accidentally rally italian pol médium.	Uk robert kubica injured rally accident italian rally medium polished.
4	wikileaks nobel peace prize mankind profit motive	WikiLeaks Nobel Peace Prize L' humanity motivated by profit.	Wikileaks Nobel Peace Prize winner L' humanity is motivated by profit.	Wikileaks Nobel Peace Prize winner L' profit drives humanity.
4	nobel peace prize nomination wikileaks founder	Founding Wikileaks Nobel Peace Prize nomination.	Nominated for the Nobel Prize in Peace, WikiLeaks.	Nobel Peace Prize nomination Wikileaks founder.
4	nobel war prize wikileaks nuke fired cablegate wikileaks assange anonymous	The nobel wikileaks War Prize nukes the anonymous wikileaks cablegate wikileaks.	The nobel wikileaks war prize blasts the cablegate wikileaks assange anonymity.	The wikileaks nobel war prize nukes the wikileaks assange anonymous cablegate.
4	nobel peace prize wikileaks	Wikileaks Nobel Peace Prize winner.	The Nobel Peace Prize Winner Wikileaks.	I'm a Nobel Peace Prize laureate from Wikileaks.
5	dvr alert pm today oprah winfrey deep family secret revealed	This is the first time I've been able to tell you a family secret.	Alert DVD today' o hui Oprah Winfrey revealed a family secret.	DV alert today' hui Oprah Winfrey revealed a family secret.
5	oprah winfrey family secret prompt buzz timesherald	The secret of the Oprah Winfrey family... is what makes Timeherald tick.	The secret of the Oprah Winfrey family makes Timeherald tick.	The Oprah Winfrey family secret makes Timeherald tick.
5	breaking news oprah winfrey reveals secret sister filed oprah winfrey	Winfrey's secret sister, Oprah Winfrey, has dropped off her daughter, Oprah Winfrey.	Latest News Oprah Winfrey reveals that her secret sister has dropped off Oprah Winfrey.	Latest news Oprah Winfrey reveals her secret sister dropped Oprah Winfrey off.
5	oprah winfrey reveal family secret	Oprah Winfrey reveals her family's secret.	Oprah Winfrey's revealing the family secret.	Oprah Winfrey reveals the family secret to you.
6	rite movie clip	This is a rite-of-movie clip.	Movie rite sheet.	You know, movie rite clip.
6	rite movie review horror movie claiming inspired true event including amityville horror	It's a great way to make a difference in the lives of the people of the world.	Critical film rite film d'apos; horror claim inspired true event including horror of d'apos; Amityville.	Critical film rite; horror claiming inspired true event including horror d' Amityville.
6	watch rite free movie online movie online	Watch free online movie movie rite online movie online.	Watch free online movie rite movie online movie online movie.	Watch rite free movie online movie online online movie.
6	chat director star rite anthony hopkins english grandfather	Chat filmmaker rite star Anthony Hopkins grand-father english.	Chat filmmaker star rite anthony hopkins grand-english father.	Chat director star rite anthony hopkins grand-English father.
6	rite movie trailer anthony hopkins best flick movie trailer hd streaming torrent downloads movie	Anthony hopkins movie trailer rite movie best trailer hd streaming torrent movie download.	Rite trailer of film anthony hopkins best movie trailer hd streaming torrent download film.	Rite film trailer anthony hopkins best movie trailer hd streaming torrent movie download.
6	watching rite	Watch the rite.	To watch the rite.	You know, watch the rite.
6	bishop exorcist praise exorcism movie catholic culture washington postbishop exorcist praise exorci	Exorcist bishop rent exorcism film film culture Catholic film Washington post-exorcist bishop rent exorcism exorcism.	Exorcist bishop rent exorcism film film Roman Catholic culture Washington post-bishop exorcist rent exorcism exorcism.	Bishop exorcist rent exorcism film Roman Catholic culture Washington post-bishop exorcist rent exorcism exorcism.
6	battle exorcism movie rite exorcism hmmm read find care weigh	Exorcism fight rite film rite exorcism hmmm reading find cures weigh heavy.	Exorcism combat rite exorcism movie rite hmmm reading find cures weigh heavy.	Exorcism combat movie rite exorcism hmmm reading find cures weigh heavy.
6	photo movie trailer rite trailer video hulu watch stream	The band-@-@-@-@-@-@-@-@ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @.	The band-announces photo movies of the band-announces video hulu look stream.	The band-announces photo movies of the band-announces video hulu watch stream.
6	watched rite trailer therite	J' look at the rite and look at the therite.	J' looked at rite and therite.	J&apos watched rite and therite.
6	rite midnite movie cheesefest video comic	Rite midnite film film cheesefest strip video cartoon.	Midnight rite movie cheesefest strip video cartoon.	Rite midnite movie cheesefest video strip cartoon.
6	watching rite therite	There was rite.	There's been a rite.	Well, there was a rite.
6	watching rite therite	There was rite.	There's been a rite.	Well, there was a rite.
6	rite tv spot kingdom	Rite tv, Rite tv, Rite tv.	Rite tv spot Kingdom.	Rite tv spot Kingdom.
6	movie review rite mill exorcist movie weymouth news usa todaymovie review rite	Rite-Rite Film Review Weymouth news film was used today as the basis for the review of the Rite-Rite film.	Revue film rite mill exorcist film weymouth news used today; hui rite film criticism rite.	Film review rite mill exorcist film weymouth news used today's rite film critics.
6	rite movie review fan movie deal battle good	Fan film Critical Rite from l' combat agreement.	Fan film critical rite from l' combat agreement.	Critical rite of film fan of l' combat agreement.
6	movie review rite movie moviereviews	Movie movies rite film review.	Film review moviereviews films rite film.	Film review rite movie moviereviews films.
6	rite review movie	Rite critical film rite.	Critical rite film rite.	Critical rite rite.
6	download rite movie entertainment zone download rite	Download the Rite Motion Picture Entertainment Zone download the Rite.	Download Rite movie entertainment area download Rite.	Download the Rite movie entertainment zone download the Rite.
6	rite movie review fan movie deal battle good evil	Fan film critical rite from l' film agreement fight good evil.	Fan film critical rite from l' film deal fight good evil.	Critical film rite of the movie fan of l' film deal fight good evil.
6	movie review rite anthony hopkins rite photo warner bros left explore	Film review Rite anthony hopkins Rite photo overlayer bros left to explore.	Movie review Rite anthony hopkins Rite photo warner bros left to explore.	Film review Rite anthony hopkins Rite photo warner bros left explore.
6	movie review rite horror thriller	Movie review, Rite Hate Rite Rite.	The movie revue Rite horror thriller rite.	Rite horror thriller rite movie.
6	rite safe horror film devil time plain dealer	It's a good thing that you've got a lot of money.	Rite sure film d'apos; horror the devil time the dealer of drugs.	Rite safe film d'apos; horror the devil time the drug dealer.
6	watching rite therite	There was rite.	There's been a rite.	Well, there was a rite.
6	watched solid acting anthony hopkins sr beauty alice braga rite view	J' watched Anthony Hopkins play solid alice beautiful braga rite seen.	J' watched Anthony Hopkins play solid alice braga rite seen.	J' watched Anthony Hopkins play solid game sr beauty alice braga rite seen.
6	trailer talk week movie rite mechanic week opportunity	Band Discussion Week-Rite Announcements of the Week Machinery of Film Rite Week Occasion.	The week of discussion on the bands-rite announcements of the mechanic week of rite-of-movie opportunity week.	Band Discussion Week-rite rite rite rite mechanic week movie rite opportunity week.
6	film rite based training real priest film faith catholic exorcist	Rite film based on the formation of a true priest, film of the Catholic Exorcist faith.	Rite film based on the formation of true priest Catholic exorcist film faith.	A film rite based on the formation of a true Catholic exorcist Catholic film priest.
7	australia greatest olympian ian thorpe expected reportedly comeback international swim	The biggest Olympic athlete in Australia, Thorpe s&apos, was waiting for a return to international swimming.	Australia's greatest Thorpe Olympic athlete s&apos was waiting for a return to international swimming.	Australia's greatest Olympic athlete Thorpe s' expected a return to international swimming.
8	donald rumsfeld reflects writing memoir rumsfeld began thinking book unknown	Donald Rumsfeld reflected the apos; writing memoirs Rumsfeld began to think of an unknown book.	Donald Rumsfeld reflects the apos; Rumsfeld memoir writing has begun to think of an unknown book.	Donald Rumsfeld reflects the apos; Rumsfeld memoir writing began to think of an unknown book.
9	white stripe officially call quits	This is the first time I've had the opportunity to speak with you.	The white band officially calls for abandonment.	The white stripe officially calls for the surrender.
9	fake snow storm white stripe officially call quits	The project is expected to be completed by the end of the year, and the project is expected to be completed by the end of the year.	The false blizzard and the white stripe officially announced the abandonment of the project.	The snowstorm and white stripe officially announced the project's abandonment.
9	news white stripe broke today	It's the first time I've seen it, and it's the first time I've seen it.	The white stripe is broken today.	The white stripe is broken today.
9	rip white stripe	And tear the white stripe.	Shred the white stripe.	Tear that white stripe off.
9	white stripe breakup ain	C' est la rupture de la bande blanche.	C' is the ruptured, white band.	C' is white stripe rupture.
9	white stripe officially call quits	This is the first time I've had the opportunity to speak with you.	The white band officially calls for abandonment.	The white stripe officially calls for the surrender.
9	sad white stripe split steam side project best moment	The white steamed sad stripe cleft project of the best moment.	And the sad white stripe furrows the project of the best moment.	The sad white stripe steals the best moment project.
9	white stripe officially broke thought record devastated	White stripes have officially broken the record for devastation.	The white stripe has officially broken the record for devastated thoughts.	The white stripe officially broke the Devastated-thinking record.
9	white stripe breaking performance record winnipeg free press	The record for white stripes was broken by the free Winnipeg press.	Winnipeg's free press coverage broke the record for white stripes.	Winnipeg's free press broke the white stripe record.
9	white stripe broke feel inevitable duo remarried gonna work commonsense	The broken white stripe of feeling inevitable from the remarriaged duo... will work out the common sense.	The broken sensual white stripe of the remarriaged duo will work common sense.	The broken white stripe feeling inevitable of the remarriaged duo will work common sense.
9	news video white stripe call quits read breakup rip bummer	New video strip white d' caller gets to read tear-breaking depressing rupture.	New white stripe video d&apos call gets to read depressing tear break.	New video white stripe d' call read depressing tear break.
10	prince william kate middleton wedding guest invited fax telegraph uk	The Prince William Kate Middleton, who was invited to the wedding, invited the telegrapher.	Prince William Kate Middleton, wedding guest, invited the telegrapher uk.	Prince William Kate Middleton, wedding guest, invited the telegraph uk.
11	state budget school risk toddler yonkers longer attend pre school	Infants who are at risk of attending public schools spend more time in pre-school education.	Infants who are at risk of attending a public school spend more time in school.	Young children at risk of public school attend school longer.
11	cuomo budget hit school toddler yonkers longer attend pre school syra	The budget of cuomo hits the toddlers of l' school yonkers more frequent syra pre-school longer.	The cuomo budget is hitting the toddlers of l' yonkers schools more frequent syra pre @-@school longer.	The cuomo budget hits children of l' more yonkers school attend syra pre-school longer.
11	gov cuomo budget propsal slash nyc york city facing billion hit result	CUOM GOVERNMENT Propsal budget / One Billion Results City NYYork City.	CUOM GOVERNMENT Propsal budget / NYYork City facing a billion results.	CUOM GOVERNMENT Propsal budget / NYYork City facing one billion city results.
11	update lt gov seek support cuomo budget	Government of Canada update.	Update from the Government of Canada.	Government of Canada; Library and Archives Canada.
11	hey mid hudson public employee job security mclaughlin hope helped	He is a member of the Board of Directors of the Canadian Institute of Chartered Accountants, the Canadian Institute of Chartered Accountants.	Hey Mid Hudson Public Employees Security Mclaughlin Hope helped ensure the safety of public servants.	Hey Mid Hudson Public Employees Security Mclaughlin Hope has helped to ensure the safety and security of public servants.
11	cuomo budget hit school toddler yonkers longer attend pre school srq	The Cuban budget has been hitting the children of the island; more yonkers are attending the island's elementary school.	The cuomo budget hits children of the apos; more yonkers school attend the apos; preschool srq.	The cuomo budget hits the apo's toddlers; more yonkers attend the apo; pre-schools.
11	governor proposes sweeping cut funding york school medicaid program slashed	The governor proposed drastic cuts to the program's funding; medical aid from l'apos, York School.	The governor proposed drastic cuts in funding for York City's medical aid program.	The governor proposed cuts in the funding of the medical aid program at l'apos school in York.
11	gov andrew cuomo drop budget axe	Well, the Andrew Cuomo government is dropping the budget axe.	The Andrew Cuomo government dropped the budget axe.	Andrew Cuomo's government drops the budget axe altogether.
11	read spending hvagents info	Read the expense reports of hv agents.	Read the news about hv agent spending.	To read up on hv agent spending.
11	cuomo call york budget process quot sham quot	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	C'omo call budget process york double quotes.	C'omo call budget process york quote false quotes.
11	cuomo cut spending budget plan	A Budget Plan to Reduce Cumo's Expenditures.	Budget Plan for the Reduction of Spending on Como.	Budget plan to cut cuomo.
11	spending budget gov cuomo unveils today will include substantial cut hundred	Launch of the government budget cuomo today; substantial cuts of $100 will be included.	Como unveiling from the government budget today; will include substantial reductions of $100.	The release of the cuomo from the government budget today will include substantial reductions of $100.
11	liberty group back cuomo budget suffolk county project fiscal reform chance tcot nygop	Liberty group back cuomo budget suffolk county tcot Nygop tax reform project.	Liberty group back cuomo budget suffolk county project tax reform opportunity tcot Nygop.	Liberty group back cuomo budget suffolk county project tax reform chance tcot Nygop.
11	reuters tcot cuomo call york budget process sham	Reuters tcot cuomo is called York budget process dummy.	Reuters tcot cuomo call York budget process dummy.	Reuters tcot cuomo call York budget process dummy.
11	cuomo budget reading quick takeaway doesn recommend closing	Quick reading of the budget of the cuomo does not recommend closure.	The quick reading of the cuomo does not recommend closure.	A quick reading of the cuomo budget doesn't recommend closing it.
11	governor cuomo budget proposal eliminates funding healthy family york	The budget proposed by Governor Cuomo eliminates the need to fund a healthy family in York City.	Governor Cuomo's proposed budget eliminates funding for a healthy family in York City.	Governor Cuomo's budget proposal eliminates funding for a healthy family in York City.
11	news cuomo find secret budget flaw albany	New cuomo find secretly the Albanian budget deficit.	New cuomo find secret deficit in the Albanian budget.	New cuomo find secret Albanian budget deficit Albanian.
11	politics governor cuomo budget seek reverse sham york reuters york governor	Governor Cuomo's political budget seeks to reverse the fake York reuters, York governor.	Governor Cuomo's political budget sought to reverse the fake York reuters york governor.	Governor Cuomo's political budget seeks to reverse the fake York reuters york governor york governor.
11	cuomo expose dirty budget trick cut announced today	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	I want to expose bad budget announced today.	To expose dirty coup de budget announced today.
11	assessing cuomo effort cut york medicaid budget	L' evaluation of the project; and, cuomo's effort has reduced York's medicaid budget.	L' l&apos evaluation; effort de cuomo reduced the medicaid budget of York.	Apos evaluation; cuomo effort reduced the medicaid budget of York.
11	recognizes reduced state spending key solving ny fiscal crisis	Recognizes the reduction in government spending to solve the budget crisis.	Recognizes the reduction in spending of the state to solve the budget crisis.	Acknowledges the reduction in spending by the state to solve the current fiscal crisis.
11	headline crain cuomo call albany budget process sham series called permanent douglascastle	The title feared Albanian call fear cuomo fictional budget process called permanent douglascastle.	The title feared cuomo call albany fictional series budget process called permanent Douglascastle.	The title feared cuomo call albany fictional budget process series called permanent douglascastle.
11	ny governor proposes sweeping cut funding york school medicaid program slashed srq	The Governor is proposing severe cuts to the funding of the York School Medicaid medical program.	The governor has proposed severe cuts to the medical program at York School Medicaid.	The governor proposed drastic cuts in the funding of the medical program of l'apos; York School Medicaid.
11	google news budget plan spread pain albany time union reutersbudget plan spread painalbany time unionmajor	The budget plans new google spread Albanian pain plan Reutersbudget plan of the apos; schedule of the apos; schedule of the apos; schedule of the majority.	The budget plan new google spread Albanian pain plan Reutersbudget plan of the apos; schedule of the apos; schedule of the apos; schedule of the majority.	The budget plan of new google spread Albanian pain plan Reutersbudget plan of the apos; schedule of the apos; schedule of the majority.
11	ny gov cuomo slash fund school medicaid	Ny gov cuomo slash funds medicaid school school.	Ny gov cuomo slash fund medicaid school.	Ny gov cuomo slash fund school medicaid.
11	official ny cuomo proposing painful budget cut sdut	Ny Couomo officially announced that it is proposing to make budget cuts that are painful.	Ny cuomo official proposing painful budget cuts.	Official Ny cuomo proposing painful budget cuts sdut.
12	taco bell class action lawyer beef battle kfc serf mutant hybrid beast chicken eyeroll	Class d' action d' beef taco lawyer kfc mutant serf chicken hybrid eyeroll.	Class d' action d' lawyer taco bell beef fight kfc mutant serf chicken hybrid eyeroll.	D&apos class; action d' avocado taco bell beef battle kfc mutant serf beast chicken eyeroll.
12	percentage rat derived taco bell meat filling meat oat evidently	Percent rat-derived taco meat containing potato; oats.	Percentage of rat-derived taco meat with attached meat; oats.	Percentage of taco meat derived from rat and containing oats.
12	taco bell taco meat filling beef fb	It's the taco meat from the beef fb's taco bell.	Taco meat from beef fb taco bell.	Beef fb's taco bell taco meat.
12	taco bell sued calling mixture lt beef seasoned beef sound saved lot cow	The Taco Bell continued the mix of appetizers and the beef seasoned at the mouth of the mouth; a cows saved.	The taco bell continued the mix of appetizers and the beef seasoned at the appetizers; a saved cow.	The taco bell followed the call and seasoned beef to the air from a saved cow.
12	thought beef lawsuit pr response	J&apos, J' thought of a trial at the beef.	J&apos, thought of a beef trial.	J' thought beef trial.
12	live tweet taco bell claim meat beef wasn typo	Tweet direct taco smokes that beef was typo.	Tweet direct taco snaps that the beef and veal was typo.	Tweet direct taco smokes that the beef was typo.
12	beef beef law firm sue taco bell false advertising cattle	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	Beef firm d' lawyers suing taco bell false livestock advertising.	Beef firm d' lawyers sue taco bell false advertising cattle.
12	cost cent expecting tacobell defends beef secret recipe	It's the only way I can get it to work.	Hundreds hoping tacobell will defend the secret beef recipe.	Hundred hoping tacobell defends the secret beef recipe.
12	taco bell beef meat qualify taco filling yikes	Taco beef qualifies tacos that fill yikes.	Taco beef qualifies the tacos that fill the yikes.	Taco beef is the taco that fills yikes.
12	hey surplus population lawsuit taco bell claim meat mixture beef	Overcrowding tacos, meatballs, beef.	Population surplus, tacos, meatballs, beef.	Population surplus, tacos, meatballs, beef and veal.
12	taco bell fight beef lawsuit taco bell launching advertising campaign today fight	Taco Bell Taco Bell launches advertising campaign today.	Tacos Bell vs. Beef The Tacos Bell is launching an advertising campaign today.	The taco bell against the beef The taco bell launches an advertising campaign today.
12	vegetarian lawsuit taco bell claiming beef hold actual beef	Taco Tinker Bell Vegetarian Pursuit Claiming Beef Hold True Beef.	Taco Tinker Bell vegetarian chase claiming beef hold real beef.	Pursuit vegetarian taco bell claiming beef hold real beef.
12	lawsuit veracity taco bell meat discourage enjoying colon cancer	Prosecuting truth-tumo-meat-of-the-bell-tumo-meals to discourage people from taking advantage of colon cancer.	Suing truth taco meat of the bell discourage profit from colon cancer.	Suing truth taco bell meat to discourage people from taking advantage of colon cancer.
12	gross taco bell sued bogus beef	So the big taco chased after the fake beef.	The taco chased after the fake beef.	Big taco chased the fake beef.
12	taco bell beef taco meat filling	Beef taco meat... stuffed with beef taco.	Beef taco meat stuffed with beef taco.	The beef taco meat stuffed with beef taco.
12	guess calling beef burrito beef burrito gross	J' imagine j' call it a burrito burrito burrito de boeuf.	Just think of it as a big beef burrito burrito burrito.	J' imagine j' call it a beef burrito burrito burrito.
12	duraflame log beef taco bell	Duraflame log beef-taco is wrong.	I mean, Duraflame log beef taco sucks.	Duraflame log beef taco sucks.
12	shouldn beef beef gross hmm taco bell beef alleged meat	Beef and beef, big taco beef, so-called beef.	Beef beef big taco beef so-called beef meat.	Big beef beef taco beef beef pretend beef.
12	taco bell beef taco inexpensive beef lawsuit share info	Taco taco taco beef bull taco cheap beef trial share information.	Taco taco taco beef beef taco beef trial cheap beef share information.	Taco taco beef beef taco trial cheap beef share information.
12	meat high quality mediapost beef brouhaha taco bell buzz suffering mediapost	High quality meat mediapost beef brouhaha taco buzz with mediapost.	High quality meat mediapost beef brouhaha taco buzz suffering mediapost.	Meat of high quality mediapost beef brouhaha taco buzz suffering mediapost.
12	truth chalupa ain beef alabama law firm claim lawsuit taco bell false adv	Beef truth chalupa; Alabama firm of apos; lawyers claim taco justice wrongly.	The truth chalupa of the beef d' Alabama firm d' lawyers claim the justice taco is false opinion.	Truth chalupa of beef d' Alabama law firm d' lawyers claim taco justice false opinion.
12	yuck taco bell meat beef	Beef with a taco-bell, beef.	Beef with taco bell, beef.	Uh, taco bell beef, beef.
12	checking eww eating lawsuit alleges taco bell beef thisis	Eww eat a trial claims that this is beef from the taco bell.	Eww eating a lawsuit claims that this is taco bell beef.	Eww eating a lawsuit claims that it's taco bell beef.
12	blog post beefy	This is Blog post beefy.	Blog post beefy post post.	Blog post beefy post.
12	hey hear taco bell sued beef filling beef told good enema	Hey, j' heard that taco bell is chasing beef stuffed beef said good enema.	Hey, j' heard that taco bell chases beef stuffed beef said enema good.	Hey, j' heard taco bell chases beef stuffed beef said good enema.
12	taco bell sued selling fake meat damn wonder fake lmao eating taco bell month ago haha	The taco bell's suing for selling fake meat.	The taco bell sued for selling fake meat.	The taco bell sued for selling fake meat on the street.
12	taco bell beef meat lawsuit claim rest supernatural filler	The Taco Beef Trial claims that it is a supernatural resting place.	The taco beef beef trial claims supernatural filling rest.	The taco beef trial claims supernatural rest and refill.
12	law suit taco bell beef filler find taco bell chihuahua	L' beef-filling agent taco from the trial to find taco-chichuahua.	L' beef filler taco trial find taco chihuahua bell.	L' beef-filling agent taco trial find taco bell chihuahua.
12	taco bell lawsuit claim chain beef meat	The bell taco trial is about the chained beef.	The beef-chain taco bell trial.	The taco bell lawsuit is about chained beef.
12	robert paisola news taco bell take beef lawsuit public ap ap taco bell news zone	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I don't think I'm going to be able to do that anymore.	Robert paisola news taco bell take beef trial public ap news zone news taco.	Robert paisola news taco bell take beef trial public ap taco news zone.
12	professor ken albala wrote op taco bell meat	Professor Ken Albala wrote Op Taco Bell Meat.	"Professor Ken Albala wrote ""Op taco bell meat."""	Teacher ken albala wrote op taco bell meat.
12	don fda approved ingredient list taco bell beef	These products are not intended to be used in cosmetic products.	A list of FDA-approved ingredients.	FDA approved ingredient list.
12	amazes taco bell lawsuit usda call beef taco percent beef meat realfood	C' is incredible that actions against tacos called the percentage of beef the real meal taco beef.	C' it's amazing that taco lawsuits called taco beef the percentage of beef the real meal.	C' is incredible that actions brought against tacos called the percentage of beef taco beef the real meal.
12	opinion taco bell suit expose ignorance meat shortly news taco bell lawsuit ou	The Taco Bell's judgment exposes the meat of the Taco Bell; a short time after the trial of the Taco Bell.	The taco bell's opinion exposes the meat of the apo; ignorance soon after the taco bell trial.	The taco bell trial exposes the apo's meat; ignorance shortly after the taco bell trial.
12	geez hide taco bell beef	God damn it, hide-me from the beef to the taco.	Hide-me from the beef to the taco.	Damn, hide-me from the taco beef.
12	taco bell beef convenience cost	C' is the price of the beef to the taco.	C&apos is the price of beef to taco.	C' is the taco price of beef.
12	well lunch lawsuit taco bell claim meat mixture beef	Well, at lunch, the bell of the tacos claims a mixture of meat and beef.	At lunch, the taco bell claims a mixture of meat and beef.	Well, at lunch, the taco bell claims meat and beef.
12	black commented chasindatpaper blog post eww eating lawsuit alleges taco bell beef	The blog in black Chasindatpaper post eww eat prosecution alleges beef taco bell.	Black blog post Chasindatpaper post eww eat lawsuits alleges beef taco bell.	Chasindatpaperblack blog post eww eat lawsuits alleges beef taco bell.
12	omg love taco bell law firm sue taco bell claim beef label misleading	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	Omg love taco bell firm d'apos; lawyers sue taco bell claim misleading tag beef.	Omg love taco bell firm d' lawyers sue taco bell claim beef misleading label.
12	knew soy taco law firm sue taco bell claim beef label misleading	I knew the taco-soy attorney's office was suing tacos claiming that the tag was deceptive.	I knew that the law firm of apos; tacos soy lawyers sued tacos claiming that the apos; deceptive beef label.	I knew the law firm was suing tacos claiming that the beef tag was deceptive.
13	rahm emanuel chicago mayor llinois supreme court ruling xmnr chicagomayor rahmemanuel	Rahm emanuel Chicago Mayor llnnnr chicagomayor Supreme Court ruling.	Rahm emanuel Chicago Mayor llnnnr chicagomayor rahmeman judgment of the Supreme Court.	Rahm emanuel Chicago Mayor llnnnr chicagomayor rahmemanuel judgment of the Supreme Court.
13	court emanuel eligible chicago mayor ny time pa habit sur place assez longtemps	This is the first time in the history of the city that an appeal from the City of Chicago can be made.	Chicago's appeal eligible for mayor has long been a habit on the spot.	The court d' appeal of Chicago eligible mayor ny time paused on site long enough.
13	rahm stay chi mayoral ballot dbl standard city residency rule public worker nytimes	Rahm remains mayor of the ballot paper dbl standard residence of the city regulates the time of the public worker.	Rahm remain mayor of the ballot dbl standard residence of the city pay the public worker nytime.	Rahm remain mayor ballot dbl standard residence of the city pay the public worker nytime.
13	il supreme court imposed stay political execution rahm emanuel ballot	The Supreme Court has ordered the suspension of the execution of the presidential decree.	The Supreme Court ordered the suspension of the political execution of the ballot paper.	Supreme Court ordered suspension of political execution of ballot paper.
13	countdown rahmageddon illinois supreme court voted unanimously rahm emanuel	Rahmageddon llinois Supreme Court has voted at the same time; unanimity has been issued.	Countdown Rahmageddon illinois Supreme Court voted at the time; unanimity rahm emanuel.	Rahmageddon illinois countdown Supreme Court voted at laps; rahm emanal unanimity.
13	illinois state appeal court declared rahm emanuel ineligible mayor chicago born kenya	The Court of Appeals of the State of Illinois declared that he was not eligible for the office of Mayor of the City of Chicago.	Illinois declared that he was not eligible for the office of Mayor of Chicago.	City Court; Appeals; State of Washington; Illinois declared that he was not eligible to run for mayor of Chicago.
13	big news chicago rahm emanuel eligible chicago mayor court	It's the first time in the history of Chicago that the mayor of Chicago has been elected.	Big news: l' emancipation of Chicago eligible for mayor of Chicago.	The big news is: l' Chicago emancipation eligible for mayor of Chicago.
13	emanuel chicago ballot	Chicago Gospel.	The vote of the apos; the gospel of Chicago.	It's about the vote in the Gospel of Chicago.
13	illinois court emanuel stay chicago ballot chicago reuters white house chief st news	U.S.A.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.S.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.S.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.S.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.	Illinois runs emancipation stay chicago vote chicago reuters White House news chief.	Illinois runs emancipation stay chicago vote chicago reuters white house chief news.
13	npr news ill high court emanuel chicago mayor	NPR Supreme Court News, emancipated Mayor of Chicago.	NPR - Supreme Court News, emancipated mayor of Chicago.	NPR Supreme Court News, emancipated mayor of Chicago.
13	blogfeed court don boot rahm will stay ballot ruling	I'm sorry, but I don't think it's a good idea.	Cour blogfeed don boot rahm will stay on the vote of the ruling.	Court blogfeed don boot rahm will stay on the decision vote.
13	court allows emanuel ballot chicago mayor nytimes tlot news illinois dems	The court will allow the vote on the mayor of the city of Chicago to take place in the morning.	The court allows the mayor of Chicago to vote on the illinois news emancipated mayor of Chicago.	The court allows the vote on the emancipated mayor of Chicago nytimes news illinois dem dems.
13	rahm emanuel chicago ballot news	Rahm will emancipate chicago new ballots.	Rahm emanuel chicago new ballots.	Rahm emanuel chicago ballot papers.
13	minute court ruling allows rahm emanuel atlantic wire	A court order has been issued allowing Rahm emanuel atlantic wire.	A court decision allows Rahm emanuel atlantic wire.	A court ruling allows Rahm emanuel atlantic wire.
13	court rule rahm emanuel ineligible chicago mayoral race law il chicago rahm	Rahm emanuel rahm rahm rahm rahm rahm rahm rahm rahm racing law for mayor.	Rule of the rahm emanuel rahm ineligible chicago law on the race for mayor chicago rahm rahm.	Rule of rahm emanuel rahm ineligible chicago mayoral race law chicago rahm rahm.
13	jmg court rule rahm emanuel ineligible mayor chicago opponent white house	Mayor of the Chicago White House Opposition to the White House.	Jmg Court Rules rahm ineligible Mayor Chicago White House opposition to the White House.	Jmg court rules rahm emancipated mayor ineligible Chicago White House opposition to the White House.
13	great breaking rahm emanuel ballot supreme court rule	This is a major breach of the Supreme Court of Apos rule.	This is a major breach of the rule of the Supreme Court of the Apostles.	Great breach of the rule of the Supreme Court of Apos.
13	illinois supreme court rahm emanuel ballot illinois supreme court issued ruling allowing rahm	U.S. Supreme Court of Appeals; Illinois Supreme Court of Appeals; Illinois Supreme Court of Appeals; Illinois Supreme Court of Appeals.	Illinois Supreme Court rahm ill illinois ballot Illinois Supreme Court has rendered a decision allowing rahm rahm rahm.	Illinois rahm emanuel ballot illinois The Supreme Court of l' Illinois has issued a decision authorizing rahm rahm.
13	top story illinois supreme court rahm emanuel ballot illinois supreme court issued ruling	At the top of the list, the Supreme Court of the U.S. Supreme Court published a decision.	At the top of the list, the Illinois Supreme Court of Appeals issued a ruling on the Illinois Supreme Court's decision.	At the top of the list, the Illinois Supreme Court issued an illinois presidential ballot Supreme Court issued a decision.
13	slow news day chicago ll live bloggin mayoral debate cdt	Toll-to-toll-to-toll-to-toll-to-toll-to-toll-to-toll-to-toll-to-tool-to-toll-to-tool-to-tool-to-tool.	Slow day; chicago news ll live bloggin debate mayor cdt.	Tasteful day; news chicago ll live bloggin debate mayor cdt.
13	countdown rahmageddon	Rahmageddon countdown.	Countdown rahmageddon.	And countdown rahmageddon.
13	court put emanuel chicago mayor race	The Gospel of Chicago was rejected as a candidate for mayor.	The court has rejected the candidacy of the Gospel of Chicago for mayor.	The court rejected Chicago's Gospel for mayor.
13	rahm emanuel ballot chicago alternet	Rahm on the Internet.	Rahm emanuel Chicago bollocks on the Internet.	Chicago rahm emanuel bundle on the Internet.
13	illinois supreme court rahm chicago resident eligible mayor examiner illinois suprem illinois	Illinois Supreme Court of Appeal; Illinois rahm Chicago Resident elected Illinois Supreme Review Mayor Illinois.	Illinois Supreme Court rahm Chicago resident elected mayor peer review illinois supreme illinois.	Illinois Supreme Court of l' Illinois rahm Chicago resident elected illinois supreme mayor examiner illinois illinois.
13	reading court rahm emanuel eligible chicago mayor nytimes illinois supreme court	Reading the Elected Emanuel Court of Chicago ny time illinois Chicago Supreme Court.	Read the mayor-elect rahm emancipated court of Chicago once illinois Supreme Court of Chicago.	Read rahm emancipated mayor of Chicago once illinois Chicago supreme court.
13	supreme court put rahm emanuel ballot	The Supreme Court voted rahm emancipation.	The Supreme Court has put rahm emancipation vote.	The supreme court has put rahm emanal vote.
13	rahm emanuel stay ballot chicago mayoral election filed news politics president obama ra	Rahm emanuel remain ballot paper Mayor of Chicago has put down the deadline; political information President Obama has re-elected.	Rahm emanuel remain voting paper Mayor of Chicago has filed President Obama's election report.	Rahm emanuel stay ballot Mayor of Chicago deposited the apos; political information President Obama re elections.
13	court emanuel eligible chicago mayor	This is the E.M.C. Court of Chicago.	Elected emancipation court, mayor of Chicago.	Emancipation court elected mayor of Chicago.
13	post chicago rahm emanuel ballot	After the vote on emancipation from Chicago.	After the vote on the apo; emancipation from Chicago.	After the vote on the motion for a resolution on the independence of Chicago.
13	news alert ruling restores emanuel ballot breaking news alertthe york timestue january	L' News Alert Restores Ballot Paper Election Eminent News Alert at York time January.	L' News Alert restores ballot Election Eminent News Alert at York time January.	L' news alert restores the ballot Election Eminent News Alert at York time January.
13	court rahm emanuel ineligible mayor	Ineligible mayor's emancipation court.	Court rahm... emanal mayor ineligible.	Court rahm emancipation mayor ineligible.
13	hot air breaking rahm ballot tcot lt state totally corrupt	State is totally corrupt.	The state is totally corrupt.	The state is a totally corrupt state.
13	rahm chicago economy raised tax deserve	The economy of Chicago deserves a rise in taxes.	The economy of Chicago deserves a tax hike.	The economy of Chicago needs tax increases.
13	chicago rahm emanuel ballot	Chicago emancipation vote.	The vote on the emancipation of Chicago.	The vote on the vote on the emancipation of Chicago.
14	vinson rule entire hcr law lack severability clause entire text	The whole hcr rule does not contain a divisibility clause.	There is no divisibility clause in the entire hcr rule.	The whole hcr law vinson rule does not contain a divisibility clause.
14	regular folk united responds ruling obamacare tcot mdreps hcr aacons bookerrising	The regular plain folk responds by directing bookerrising obamacare mdreps hcr aacons.	The regular smooth folk responds by directing obamacare mdreps hcr aacons bookerrising.	Regular plain folk responds by directing obamacare mdreps hcr aacons bookerrising.
14	judge rule health care law foxnews	Justice of the Foxnews Health Care Act.	Foxnews health-care law judge.	Foxnews health care law judge.
14	judge strike healthcare reform law	The Health Care Reform Act is being challenged by the judge.	Judge's calling a strike on the Health Care Reform Act.	The judge strikes the health care reform law.
14	reagan appointed judge obamacare pound sand patient protection affordable care	Reagan Appointed Judge Obamacare's Book of Sand Protection for Affordable Health Care Patients.	Reagan appointed Judge Obamacare sand book affordable health care patient protection.	Reagan appointed Judge Obamacare pound sand patient protection affordable health care.
14	federal judge strike health care reform call insurance purchase mandate aba journal	The federal judges' strike on health-care reform is calling for the purchase of health-care insurance.	The federal judges' strike on health care reform calls for the purchase of warrant insurance newspaper aba newspaper.	Federal judges' health care reform strike calls for apo purchase; insurance warrant aba newspaper.
14	nytimes federal judge rule health law violates news breakingnews	Federal judges' health laws sometimes violate breaking breaking news.	Sometimes, federal judges' health laws violate the breaking news.	Sometimes the health law of federal judges violates breaking breaking news.
14	federal judge rule health care reform law	Health care reform is decided by a federal judge.	Well, a federal judge decides on health care reform.	A federal judge decides health care reform.
14	republic argued florida ruling monday judge roger vinson florida	Florida was sworn in by the Republic on Monday, Judge Roger Vinson Florida.	The Republic pleaded Florida in power on Monday, Florida Judge Roger Vinson.	The Republic has argued Florida in power on Monday, Judge Roger Vinson Florida.
14	florida judge strike obamacare america	The Florida judge has struck obamacare america.	The Florida judge strikes obamacare america.	Florida judge strikes obamacare america.
14	well surprise good thing healthcare law declared	Well, good surprise declared health care law.	Well, surprise good thing about the declared health care bill.	Well, surprise good thing about the health-care bill.
14	judge rule health law law mandatory insurance hcr ppaca aca	Judges Health law compulsory insurance law hcr ppaca aca.	Judge Law of compulsory health insurance hcr ppaca aca law.	Judge Mandatory health law insurance hcr ppaca aca law.
14	federal judge healthcare law	Health Care Federal Judges Act.	The Federal Judges of Health Care Act.	Minister of Public Works and Government Services.
14	health care law obama administration vowing move full speed ahead implementa	It's time to move on to the next level, and it's time to move on to the next level.	The administration of the laws on health care Obama promises to go from there to full speed ahead and implement.	Obama's administration of the health care law promises to go from there to full speed ahead and implement.
14	judge ruling health reform law radical judicial activism amok overturned medi	Health reform judge Radical Judicial Activism overthrown media.	Judge leading health reform Law radical overthrown judicial activism media.	Justice leading health reform law radical overthrown media judicial activism.
14	obamacare reagan appointed federal district judge florida ruled key portion obama	Obamacare Reagan named Florida District Federal Judge ruled on the key part Obama.	Obamacare Reagan appointed Florida District Federal Judge ruled on the key issue of Obama.	Obamacare Reagan appointed federal district judge in Florida ruled on the key part of Obama.
14	judge rule health care law	Judge rules the Health Care Act.	The judge will rule on the Health Care Act.	The judge rules health care law.
14	judge rule obama health care law	Judge the Obama Rule of Health Care Law.	Judge the Obama rule... health care law.	Judge Obama rule, health care law.
14	durbin chair hearing healthcare law hill healthwatch tcot obamacare	Durbin chairs to hear Hill Healthwatch Health Care Act Tcot obamacare obamacare.	Durbin chairs hear Hill Healthwatch Tcot obamacare obamacare health care legislation.	Durbin chairs hear health care law Hill Healthwatch Tcot obamacare obamacare.
14	obama health care overhaul ruled	Obama's health-care reform came through.	The decision has been made to reform health care in Obama.	Obama's health care reform was decided.
14	judge entire hc law piper	This is the first time you've had the opportunity to judge the HCC team.	Judge the entire HCC Law Team.	Judge the entire HCC law team.
14	going amazing constitutional showdown reach supreme court	L' unbelievable test of the strength of the Constitution reaches the Supreme Court.	L' incredible test of constitutional strength reaches the Supreme Court.	L' incredible test of constitutional strength reaches Supreme Court.
14	insurance news federal judge reject health reform law district court judge roger vinson agreed	News from Home; Insurance Federal Judge Rejects Health Reform District Judge Roger Vinson agreed.	News from home; insurance Federal judge rejects health reform District judge Roger Vinson agreed with the motion.	News from home; insurance Federal judge rejects health reform District judge Roger Vinson agreed.
14	obama care	Obama care.	Obama care.	Uh, obama care.
14	federal judge rule entire health care law tcot obamacare	The federal judge makes the rules of the Health Care Act.	The federal judge regulates the entire Health Care Act.	The federal judge rules the entire health care law.
14	today jan judge declares obamacare total thought	It's a good thing that you've got a lot of money.	Today Jan judge declares total obamacare thinking obamacare.	Today Jan judge declares obamacare total thinking obamacare.
14	judge ruled health care individual mandate declared void	The judge declared the individual health-care order null and void.	The judge has declared the individual health care warrant null and void.	The judge declared the individual warrant for health care invalid.
14	state judge agree	The Judge of the Court of First Instance is hereby declared innocent.	The judge of the state is established; agreement.	The state judge is waiting; agreement.
14	obamacare heading supreme court	Obamacare heads the Supreme Court.	Obamacare's head of the Supreme Court.	Obamacare heads the supreme court.
14	federal judge strike insurance mandate entire reform bill	The Federal Judges' Strike Insurance Bill.	The draft bill on a federal judges' insurance against strikes.	The bill on strike insurance for federal judges.
14	heritage morning bell victory road repeal teaparty hcr	Teaparty hcr is replaced by the Road to the Victory of the Heritage Morning Bell.	The Heritage Morning Bell Victory Road repeats teaparty hcr.	The road to victory of the heritage morning bell repeats teaparty hcr.
14	judge strike healthcare reform law unjust law unjust men gandhi	Judge strikes health care reform as unfair Gandhi men's law unfair.	The judge criticizes the reform of health care the law unfair the law unfair to the men Gandhi.	The judge strikes health care reform unfair law unjust Gandhi men law.
14	breaking news federal court rule obamacare afternoon federal judge florida ruled	Federal Court Rule Obamacare after-midi Florida Federal Judge has ruled.	Latest News Rule of the Federal Court Obamacare after-midi Federal Judge Florida has ruled.	Latest news Federal court rule Obamacare after-midi Federal judge Florida has ruled.
14	obamacare struck stage set showdown federal judge monday struck	Obamacare hit setdown scene Federal judge Monday struck.	Obamacare hit scene setdown federal judge Monday struck.	Obamacare struck scene setdown federal judge Monday struck.
14	federal judge florida strike obama health care plan south florida	Florida South Health Care Plan Federal Judge Florida Strike Obama.	Federal judge, Florida Strike Obama, outlines a health care plan for South Florida.	Federal judge Florida Strike Obama health care plan Florida South.
14	dtn news judge strike part health care law federal judge ruled presiden	New judges strike in part Health Care Act the federal judge has ruled presiden.	In part, the new judges strike health care law the federal judge ruled presiden.	New judges strike part health care law the federal judge ruled presiden.
14	florida judge rule obamacare	It's the Florida judge's prerogative.	The Florida judge settles the problem.	The judge of the court of florida settles the case.
14	federal judge toss entire healthcare reform law account individual mandate acquire insurance coverage	Federal judge rejects the entire health care law reform mandate individual purchase of insurance.	The federal judge rejects the entire reform of the Health Care Insurance Act as an individual mandate to acquire insurance coverage.	The federal judge rejects the entire reform of the Health Care Act individual mandate to acquire insurance coverage.
14	man hour judge vinson obamacare second ruling	Justice Vinson Obamacare is the 2nd Judge of the hour.	Vinson Obamacare J.A. is the second judge of the time.	Vinson Obamacare is the second judge of the hour.
14	judge owns stock aetna	The Aetna shares are owned by the judge.	The judge owns the Aetna shares.	The judge owns Aetna shares.
14	avenue kill obamacare florida federal judge rule obamacare	L' Kill Obamacare Avenue Florida Rules Obamacare Federal Judge Obamacare Rules Obamacare.	L' avenue Kill Obamacare Florida rules obamacare federal judge obamacare rule obamacare.	L' avenue Kill Obamacare Florida rule obamacare federal judge obamacare rule obamacare.
14	health care litigation insurance mandate	Health Care Litigation Insurance.	It is the responsibility of the Minister of Health and the Minister of Health.	Terms of reference; health care litigation insurance.
14	judge rule obama health care law	Judge the Obama Rule of Health Care Law.	Judge the Obama rule... health care law.	Judge Obama rule, health care law.
14	antonin scalia save individual mandate	Antonin Scalia saves the individual search warrant.	Antonin Scalia saves that individual warrant.	Antonin scalia saves the individual warrant.
14	judge toss health care reform law federal judge ruled president obama sweep cnn	Judge rejects health-care reform bill Federal judge has ruled that President Barack Obama is guilty.	Judge Rejects Health Care Reform Bill The federal judge ruled that President Obama is guilty.	Judge rejects health care reform bill The federal judge ruled that President Obama did.
14	health care law struck federal judge ruled president obama sweeping healt	The health-care bill hit the federal judge and ruled that President Obama was sweeping Healt.	The health care bill hit the federal judge and said that President Obama was Healt-wiping.	Health care law hit the federal judge and ruled President Obama was sweeping Healt.
14	article darkpolitricks federal judge rule health care law darkpolitricks	Article Darkpolitricks Federal judge rules Darkpolitricks Darkpolitricks Health Care Act.	Article Darkpolitricks The federal judge rules the Darkpolitricks Darkpolitricks Health Care Act.	Article Darkpolitricks Federal judge rules health care law Darkpolitricks Darkpolitricks.
14	goodness thinking judge rule health care law	I think a smart judge rules the health-care law.	Well, a smart judge rules the health care law.	A smart judge rules health care law.
14	reason federal judge individual mandate health care overhaul declared void obamacare	Why the Federal Justice is Ordering Health Care Renewal?	The reason why the federal judge ordered the redesign of health care.	Why does the federal judge order the redesign of the health care system?
14	georgia official praise judge ruling health care law fight	Georgian officials praise the health-care law judge.	Georgian officials praise the judge of the health care law.	Georgian officials praise the health care law judge.
14	reaction fla judge ruling health reform law strong florida judge ruling pa health reform	Reaction fla Judge leading health care reform Law strong Florida judge leading health care reform pa.	Reaction fla Lead judge of health reform Strong Florida judge directing health reform pa.	Response fla judge ruling health reform strong Florida judge ruling health reform pa.
14	federal judge florida rule obamacare	Obamacare is ruled by the Florida Federal Judge.	The Florida Federal Judge rules obamacare.	Florida federal judge rules in obamacare.
14	health care law struck	There has been a crackdown on the Health Care Act.	And the Health Care Act has been struck.	The health care law has been hit.
14	health care law struck federal judge ruled president obama sweeping health	The health-care bill hit the federal judge today and found that President Obama was sweeping health.	The health care bill hit the federal judge and ruled that President Obama wiped out health.	The health care law hit the federal judge and ruled President Obama sweeps health.
14	judge strike healthcare reform law	The Health Care Reform Act is being challenged by the judge.	Judge's calling a strike on the Health Care Reform Act.	The judge strikes the health care reform law.
14	fla judge strike obama health care overhaul federal judge declared obama administration health	US Federal Justice's Obama Health Care Revision Strike Judge declared the Obama administration healthy.	The judge strike Obama health care review of the federal judge declared the Obama administration healthy.	The judge strike Obama health care review federal judge declared the Obama administration healthy.
14	judge obama health overhaul ap	Judge Obama reformed health.	Judge Obama has made health reforms.	Judge Obama made health reforms.
14	florida judge declares entire healthcare law void month half ago virginia judge key pr	Florida judge says the entire health care bill stinks six months ago.	The Florida judge ruled that the entire health care bill was null and void six months ago.	The Florida judge declares the entire health care bill to be null and void six months ago.
14	federal judge rule health care law violates constitution nacsonline	The federal court rules on health care violating the Nacsonline constitution.	The federal judge settles the law on health care by violating the Nacsonline constitution.	The federal judge rules the health care law by violating the Nacsonline constitution.
14	obamacare ruling injunction bc entire law declared void tcot	The court shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine the case.	Obamacare judgment d' injunction bc all the law declared null and void.	Obamacare d&apos judgment; injunction bc all law declared void.
15	topstories amtrak senator ny nj rail tunnel plan reuters share friend top news	Topstories Amtrak Senator Ny Nj Reuters Rail Tunnel Plan share key new friends.	Topstories Amtrak Senator Ny Nj Reuters rail tunnel plan share main friends news.	Topstories Amtrak Senator Ny Nj rail tunnel plan reuters share major friends news.
15	amtrak senator ny nj rail tunnel plan york reuters amtrak announced plan monday	Senator Amtrak announced plans for the New York Reuters Amtrak Railway Tunnel on Monday.	Senator Amtrak announced plans for the New York Reuters Amtrak railroad tunnel on Monday.	Senator Amtrak announced the New York Reuters Amtrak rail tunnel plan on Monday.
16	super bust woe endless texas host super bowl week texas super	I'm sorry I didn't get it, but I'm sorry I didn't get it.	Super bust without end texas to welcome super bowl week texas super texas, super super.	Great bust without end texas welcome super bowl week texas super super texas.
16	latest dallas super bowl fiasco seat north texas rough week super bowl host	The final Super Bowl Dallas debacle took place in North Texas, Texas during the tough Super Bowl week.	The last Super Bowl Dallas debacle took place in northern Texas during the difficult week of the Super Bowl.	The latest Super Bowl debacle took place in North Texas during the tough week of the Super Bowl.
16	super bowl xlv madness cowboy stadium injury flight delay striking cabby examiner	Super bowl xlv the madness of the stadium-boy the flight of injury delayes the apos; examination of the taxi driver.	Super bowl xlv cow stadium madness-boy the flight of injury delays l' examination of taxi driver.	It's a super bowl xlv the madness of the stadium of cow-boy the flight of injury delays the apos; examination of the taxi driver.
16	joe buck seat couldn accommodated super bowl	Joe Buck's seat could fit the Super Bowl for you.	The seat of Joe Buck could accommodate the super bowl.	Joe Buck's seat could accommodate the super bowl.
17	consumerist tsa testing revealing full body scanner software	Tsa consumer testing reveals complete body-scanning software.	The tsa consumerist tests reveal a full-featured body-scanning software package.	Tsa consumer tests reveal complete body scanner software.
17	count jesse ventura flier don junk touched transportation security administration agent	Earl Jesse's driver ventured Don hit the airport Transport Security Officer.	Earl's driver Jesse Ventura Don has hit the airport security officer.	The driver of Comte Jesse ventura Don touched the apos; agent d' transport security administration.
17	tsa testing advanced imaging technology software select airport	This is the first time you've checked out the airport, and it's the first time you've checked it.	Tests technology software from the airport; advanced imagery chooses airport.	Testing airport technology software; advanced imaging choose airport.
17	tsa unveils body scanner software doesn naked alternet	Tsa unveils the Naked Body Scanner Software on the Internet.	Tsa unveils the naked body scanner software on the Internet.	Tsa unveils body scanner software on the internet.
17	gotta luv video jesse ventura strike lawsuit tsa	J' loves Jesse Ventura's video suing Tsa.	J' loves the video of Jesse Ventura suing Tsa.	J' loves the video of Jesse Ventura suing Tsa.
17	tsa body scanner spot bomb dong tsa	Tsa body scanners are picking up dong tsa bombs.	The body scanners detect the dong tsa bombers.	The tsa body scanners detect dong tsa bombs.
17	disturbing jesse ewww	Jesse's a pain in the ass and www.	To hell with Jesse and www.	You know, piss off Jesse and www.
17	ventura strike lawsuit tsa truth contagious governor jesse ventura ste	Ventura Tsa Truth Strike Contagious Governor ventura ste Jesse ventura.	Ventura tza truth contagious strike process governor ventura ste Jesse ventura.	Ventura strike process tsa truth contagious governor ventura ste Jesse ventura.
17	tsa body scanner spot bomb dong tsa	Tsa body scanners are picking up dong tsa bombs.	The body scanners detect the dong tsa bombers.	The tsa body scanners detect dong tsa bombs.
17	tsa body scanner outline private part	Tsa Body Scanners describe the private parts.	Tsa body scanners describe private parts.	The tsa body scanners describe the private parts.
17	wonder young man pant tsa	Oh, that's a wonderful young man, Pant Tsa pantsa.	Oh, marvelous young man pant tsa pantsa.	Marvellous young man pant tsa pantsa.
17	tsa scanner spot bomb dong tsa	Tsa's scanners detect bombs dong tsa.	The scanners of the tsa detect the dong tsa bombs.	Tsa's scanners spot the dong tsa bombs.
17	hee hee jesse ventura slam tsa lawsuit	Hee hee jesse ventura slam slam trials tsa.	Hee hee jesse ventura slam slam trials tsa.	Hee hee hee jesse ventura slam slam sue tsa.
17	fucking awesome jesse jesse ventura slam tsa lawsuit	Fucking fabulous Jesse Ventura pressed charges against us.	This fabulous fucking Jesse Ventura has pressed charges against us.	Wonderful fucking Jesse Ventura pressed charges against us.
17	tsa testing advanced imaging technology story atlanta tsa tuesday testing	Atlanta's Advanced Imaging Technology History Tests on Tuesday.	It's time to test the technology; the history of the technology d' advanced imaging in Atlanta The tsa tests Tuesday.	The tsa is testing the apo; the history of apo technology; advanced imaging technology in Atlanta.
17	post tsa facing lawsuit governor ventura atomstack big si fascism tsa	Tsa Post facing a governorship trial ventura atomstack grand so Tsa Fascism.	Post tsa faced with a trial governor ventura atomstack great so tsa fascism.	Tsa post facing a governor ventura atomstack great great tsa fascism trial.
17	coming airport modesty change	The room was very clean and the bathroom was clean.	Airport arrival change of modesty.	Arrival airport modesty change.
17	latest news jesse ventura force tsa submission jennifer abel thing pr guardian usa	This is the last news of the latest news about the force of submission.	Latest news jessa ventura force tsa submission jennifer abel thing pr Guard usa.	Latest news jesse ventura force tsa submission jennifer abel thing pr Guard usa.
17	jesse ventura wrestling star governor true american hero	Jesse Ventura, a wrestling star, is a real American hero.	Jesse Ventura, a wrestling star, is a true American hero.	The wrestling star Jesse Ventura is a true American hero.
17	jesse ventura slam tsa lawsuit count jesse ventura flier don junk touched tr	Jesse ventura slam tsa trial count ventura f b b Iesse ventura dirt touched very.	Jesse ventura slam tsa sue count ventura flier jeesse ventura fileté touché tres.	Jesse ventura slam tsa count ventura flier sue jesse ventura dirt touched very.
17	post tsa unveils generic body scan usa today big si fascism tsa	It's a great fascism, but it's a great fascism, and it's a great fascism.	Post tsa unveils a generic scan of the body today.	Post tsa unveils a generic body scan used today; hui so great tsa fascism.
17	ventura strike lawsuit tsa iavian	I'm sorry, but I can't help you.	Ventura strike trial tsa iavian trial.	Ventura strike tsa iavian trial.
17	tsa test privacy enhancement naked scanner transportation security administration remake	I want to make sure that you have the information you need to make sure you have the information you need.	Tsa test improve privacy nude scanner redesign of l' Transportation Safety Administration.	Tsa test privacy enhancement nude scanner redesign of l' Transportation Security Administration.
17	tsa test privacy enhancing software body scanner privacy	Tsa test the' Privacy Enhancement Scanner Personal Software Scanner.	Tsa test the apos; privacy enhancement scan scanner software scanner body privacy.	Tsa test the' privacy enhancement scan scanner software body scan scanner.
17	couldn place tsa unveils modest body scanner abc news	We could put tsa unveil modest scanners body new abc.	We could put tsa unveil modest body scanners new abc.	Could put tsa unveils modest body scanners new abc.
17	cnn jesse ventura slam tsa lawsuit count jesse ventura flier don junk touched	Cn jessesse ventura slam tsa sue count ventura flyante n'jeesse ventura fileté touché.	Cn jesse ventura slam tsa trial count flying ventura don't jesse ventura dirt touched.	Cn jesse ventura slam tsa count flutter ventura trial jesse ventura dirt touched.
18	unemployment rate percent december quarter unemployment rate rose three	Percentage unemployment rate The December quarter saw a three-fold increase in the unemployment rate.	Percentage Unemployment Rates The unemployment rate rose threefold in the December quarter.	Percentage rate The unemployment rate rose three times in the quarter of December.
18	unemployment rate drop metro area	Unemployment is falling in the metropolitan area.	The unemployment rate in the metropolitan area has been falling since the early 1990s.	The unemployment rate in the metropolitan area is falling.
18	obama economy priority generate job unemployment rate pe	Obama's priority is job creation.	It's the priority of the economy; Obama generates a rate of unemployment of the unemployed.	Obama's priority is to generate a rate of unemployment.
18	jobless rise state worker laid labor department unemployment rate rose	Increase in unemployment of laid-off workers Unemployment in the labour services has increased.	Rising unemployment among laid-off workers The unemployment rate in the labour services has risen.	Increased unemployment among laid-off workers The labour services unemployment rate has increased.
18	employment gaining speed jobless rate washington reuters employment shifted	It's been a long time since Washington, D.C. and Washington, D.C. had their unemployment rates peaked.	The job quickly gaining the unemployment rate without Washington Reuters l' job changed.	Job quickly gaining unemployment rate without Washington Reuters; job changed.
18	unemployment rate state glance ap ap unemployment rate rose state month fresh evi	Rates of unemployment Rates of unemployment Rates of unemployment rose recently.	Unemployment State ap unemployment rate has increased State recently evi.	Unemployment rate State ap unemployment rate rose recently.
18	unemployment rise state fall ap ap unemployment rate rose hawaii alohatone	Unemployment has risen in Hawaii, Alohatone.	The unemployment rate has increased in Hawaii alohatone.	The unemployment rate has been on the rise in Hawaii alohatone.
18	wrapup employment gaining speed jobless rate	Employment at the end of the year quickly gains the unemployment rate.	The unemployment rate has been rising steadily since the early 1990s.	Unemployment; late employment; employment quickly gains the jobless rate.
18	dean baker problem structrual unemployment incompetent manager	Problem of the unemployed structural baker unemployed incompetent manager.	Problem of the unemployed, incompetent manager structure baker dean.	Dean baker structurel unemployed incompetent manager problem.
18	folk scrambling job don exist find structural unemployment	There are some precarious jobs, but there is also structural unemployment.	There are insecure jobs, but there is structural unemployment.	There are precarious jobs, but structural unemployment is prevalent.
18	employment gaining speed jobless rate washington reuters employment shifted	It's been a long time since Washington, D.C. and Washington, D.C. had their unemployment rates peaked.	The job quickly gaining the unemployment rate without Washington Reuters l' job changed.	Job quickly gaining unemployment rate without Washington Reuters; job changed.
18	employment gaining speed jobless rate	Unemployed accelerated unemployment rate.	Rates of unemployment are highest among women and men.	Accelerated unemployment rate without employment.
18	employment gaining speed jobless rate washington reuters employment shifted higher	The unemployment rate is the same as that of the U.S. and the U.S. and the United States.	Job quickly gaining the unemployment rate without Washington Reuters l' Job s&apos is moved higher.	L' job quickly gaining unemployment rate without Washington Reuters; moved higher.
19	energy conservation tip south hill electric heating cooling	The shelf-life of the South Hill Energy Electrical Heating Cooling.	The conservation point of South Hill energy cooling by electric heating.	The conservation tip of South Hill electric heating cooling energy.
19	fallon follow tip save energy included site tip will help beat hig	It's a good idea to keep up to date with the latest technology.	Follow point of apos; save time; energy included site peak will help to beat hig hig.	You need to follow point dapos; savings dapos; energy included site peak will help beat hig hig.
19	best way save energy live energy efficient save mo	Best Practice; Save Time; High Energy Efficiency Save Me.	Best way to save money; energy high energy efficiency save me.	Best way to save energy high energy efficiency save me money.
19	tip help reduce energy bill control electricity save money power bill	Help to reduce bills; energy controls; electricity; money; electricity.	Help reduce bills; energy controls; electricity saves money; money bills; electricity.	Help reduce the bill; energy controls electricity save time; money bill; electricity.
19	save energy cash quick easy tip article will help save ton money saving en	Save money; save money; save money; save money; save money; save money.	Save time; fast money quick advice article will save tons of money by saving.	Save money; fast-money, easy-to-consult article will help save tons of money; money by saving.
19	energy money office saving	It's a great place to spend your time and money, and it's a great place to stay.	The office of l' money of l' energy saves the apos; energy.	The apo's money office saves energy and energy.
19	lighting save energy money jim dino staff writer changing lighting system cost effecti	L'éclairage saves energy; Jim dino personal editor changes the system; lighting costs done.	L' lighting saves money; energy Jim dino personal editor changing the system d' cost-effected lighting.	L' lighting saves time; energy Jim dino personal writer changing system d' cost effective lighting.
19	saving house heating cooling	Save money on heating your home's cooling.	Save on cooling by heating your home.	Save cooling by heating houses.
19	energy conservation tip south hill electric heating cooling	The shelf-life of the South Hill Energy Electrical Heating Cooling.	The conservation point of South Hill energy cooling by electric heating.	The conservation tip of South Hill electric heating cooling energy.
20	detroit auto green	Green-car door.	Green driveway.	Uh, green driveway.
21	global warming update bizarre weather destroyed crop whale	Update on Global Warming Strange Weather has destroyed the harvests of the whales.	Global warming update strange weather has destroyed the whale harvest.	Update on the strange global warming weather destroyed the whale harvest.
21	terrific abc news story role climate change play extreme winter weather	This is a huge report on the role of climate change in the extreme conditions of winter.	Extensive coverage of the role of climate change in extreme winter conditions.	Huge report on the role of climate change in extreme winter conditions.
21	australian disaster linked global warming	Global warming was linked to global warming by the Australian catastrophe.	The Australian disaster has linked global warming and global warming.	The Australian disaster linked global warming with global warming.
21	storm sign global warming mama believing	Global warming storm mama warning of global warming.	Signal d' a sign of mama global warming storm.	Signal of a global warming mama global warming storm.
21	record snowstorm indicator global warming	Global Warming Snowstorm Indicator Record.	Snowstorm record indicator on global warming.	Record-breaking global warming snowstorm indicator.
21	al gore explains snowmaggedon midst global warming matt harding global warming guru vice	Gore explains snowmaggedon in the midst of global warming, the guru of global warming, and the guru of global warming.	The gore explains snowmaggedon in the midst of global warming, the guru of global warming, and the guru of global warming.	The gore explains snowmaggedon in the midst of global warming, the global warming guru and the global warming guru.
21	climate change update bizarre weather destroyed crop legendary fund manager jeremy grantham weig	Climate change strange weather update destroyed legendary crop fund manager Jeremy Grantham Weig.	Climate change strange weather update destroyed legendary fund manager Jeremy Grantham Weig harvest.	Climate change update strange weather destroyed legendary fund manager crop Jeremy Grantham Weig.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report keith olbermann controversial liberal pundit ho	Keith Olbermann joins controversial Liberal Keith Olbermann Pundit Ho Pundit in the current TV report.	Keith Olbermann joins the current TV report Keith Olbermann Pundit Ho Pundit controversial liberal.	Keith Olbermann joins the current controversial liberal Keith Olbermann Pundit Ho Pundit television report.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report keith olbermann controversial liberal pundit ho	Keith Olbermann joins controversial Liberal Keith Olbermann Pundit Ho Pundit in the current TV report.	Keith Olbermann joins the current TV report Keith Olbermann Pundit Ho Pundit controversial liberal.	Keith Olbermann joins the current controversial liberal Keith Olbermann Pundit Ho Pundit television report.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report keith olbermann controversial liberal pundit ho	Keith Olbermann joins controversial Liberal Keith Olbermann Pundit Ho Pundit in the current TV report.	Keith Olbermann joins the current TV report Keith Olbermann Pundit Ho Pundit controversial liberal.	Keith Olbermann joins the current controversial liberal Keith Olbermann Pundit Ho Pundit television report.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report keith olbermann controversial liberal pundit socialutility	Keith Olbermann joins Keith Olbermann controversial Pundit Socialutility Liberal Pundit Pundit Social Utility.	Keith Olbermann joins current TV report controversial Keith Olbermann Pundit Socialutility Liberal Pundit Pundit Social Utility.	Keith Olbermann joins current TV report Keith Olbermann controversial Pundit Socialutility Liberal Pundit Pundit Social Utility.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report	Keith Olbermann has joined this television report.	Keith Olbermann joins the present report on television.	Keith Olbermann joins this report on TV.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report	Keith Olbermann has joined this television report.	Keith Olbermann joins the present report on television.	Keith Olbermann joins this report on TV.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report keith olbermann controversial liberal pundit ho	Keith Olbermann joins controversial Liberal Keith Olbermann Pundit Ho Pundit in the current TV report.	Keith Olbermann joins the current TV report Keith Olbermann Pundit Ho Pundit controversial liberal.	Keith Olbermann joins the current controversial liberal Keith Olbermann Pundit Ho Pundit television report.
22	olbermann land current grow york adage outspoken tv host keith olbermann fresh	Olbermann common soil of york culture host frank adage Keith Olbermann fresh.	Olbermann common york culture land adage frank tv host Keith Olbermann fresh.	Olbermann land common culture york adage frank tv host Keith Olbermann fresh.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report	Keith Olbermann has joined this television report.	Keith Olbermann joins the present report on television.	Keith Olbermann joins this report on TV.
22	keith olbermann current tv hosting chief news officer	The director of l&apos is Keith Olbermann, who is on television.	Keith Olbermann, present on TV, hosts the director of l' information.	Keith Olbermann, present on TV, hosts the news director.
23	job wrong place memo president dear president state union add	Misplaced Work, President, Dear President, D&apos Union; State add.	Misplaced work, president, dear president, d&apos union; state add.	Misplaced work, president, dear president, union of d' state add.
23	job wrong place memo president dear president state union ad	I don't think it's a good idea, but I think it's a good idea.	Misplaced employment, president, dear president, d'apos union; state.	Inappropriately placed employment, president, dear president, union of d' state.
23	state union small business key winning future small business fu	This is the key to the success of the company's small business.	Key to the success of the small business of l' union d' state in the future small business.	The success of the small business of the d&apos union; state in the future small business.
24	bbc news domodedovo airport blast rock moscow main airport breakingnews moscow	BBC News Domodedovo Airport in Moscow; Rock Blast; Moscow Main Airport Moscow News.	BBC News Domodedovo airport of the apos; explosion of rock of the apos; main airport of Moscow news Moscow.	BBC News Domodedovo airport de l&apos rock explosion; Moscow main airport Moscow news.
24	fatal blast reported moscow airport terminal russian authority monday reported fatal explosion	The fatal explosion was reported on Monday by the Russian authorities at the Moscow airport.	The fatal explosion was reported by the Russian authorities at the airport terminal in Moscow on Monday.	The fatal explosion was reported Monday by Russian airport terminal authorities in Moscow.
24	check article fox news report dead explosion moscow busiest airport	In addition, there are reports of a deadly explosion at Moscow's busiest airport, Fox News.	Read the apos; article Fox News reports a dead explosion at the airport most frequented in Moscow.	Read the apos; Fox News reports a dead explosion at Apos, the busiest airport in Moscow.
24	suicide bomber kill moscow airport explosion ripped interna lukewilliamss	Suicide bomber who killed someone at the airport in Moscow tore apart interna lukewilliamse.	A suicide bomber who killed someone at the airport in Moscow tore apart interna lukewilliamse.	A suicide bomber killed someone at the Moscow airport.
24	bomber kill russia biggest airport	The bomber's killing Russia's largest airport.	And the bomber kills Russia's largest airport.	The biggest airport in Russia is being killed by the bomber.
24	moscow airport terror attack kill wound ap	A.P. was killed by a terrorist attack on the airport in Moscow.	L' terrorist attack of the apos; Moscow airport killed A.P.	L' terrorist attack in Moscow airport killed A.P.
24	dead moscow airport explosion cnn	Explosion at Moscow Airport.	This is the first airport in the world to do so.	There was an explosion at the airport of Moscow.
24	explosion kill moscow airport explosion ripped international arrival hall moscow bu	Explosion kills Moscow Lapos; Explosion of the Apostles; Airport tore the hallway of international arrivals Moscow.	The explosion kills Moscow L' explosion of the airport tore the hall of international arrivals Moscow.	Explosion kills Moscow Lapos; Apos explosion; airport tore international arrival hall Moscow.
24	cnn killed injured terror blast moscow airport terrorist suicide bomber blamed mosco	One attack,-suicide at Moscow airport, a-suicide bombing, killed one person.	A suicide bombing at the Moscow airport, a suicide bombing, killed one person.	A suicide bomber attack at Moscow airport, a suicide bomber, killed one person.
24	abc breaking terrorist attack moscow airport leaf dead	Terrorist attack in Moscow, sheet d'apos; airport dead.	In the event of a terrorist attack in Moscow, sheet d' airport dead.	Preceding a terrorist attack in Moscow, leaf d' dead airport.
24	explosion rock domodedovo moscow busiest airport injured	The explosion of the rock Domodedovo Moscow airport most occupied wounded the airport.	The explosion of the most occupied Moscow rock domodedovo airport wounded the airport.	The explosion of domodedovo rock Moscow busiest airport injured the airport.
24	bombing moscow airport kill russia	Russia is being killed by the bombing of Moscow airport.	The bombing of the airport of Moscow kills Russia.	The Moscow airport bombing killed Russia.
24	dozen killed moscow airport suicide bombing noticias	Suicide bombings at the Moscow airport.	About a dozen suicide bombings at Moscow airport.	About a dozen suicide bombings at the airport in Moscow.
24	suicide bomber kill russia biggest airport	Suicide bombers are killing the biggest Russian airport.	The biggest airport in Russia is being killed by suicide bombers.	Suicide bombers kill the biggest airport in Russia.
24	suicide bombing moscow airport moscow suicide bomber killed people russia busiest airpo	Suicide bombing at the Moscow airport killed people in Russia.	A suicide bomber attack at the Moscow International Airport killed people in Russia.	A suicide bomber in the airport of Moscow killed people in Russia.
24	news search moscow blast briton uk foreign office urgently checking briton	Search for information on the Soviet Union, Moscow bombing, the British Foreign Office to check it out; Briton Briton Briton emergency.	Search for information on apos; Moscow explosion briton uk Foreign Affairs Office to verify apos; Briton briton emergency.	Searches for apos; information on apos; Moscow explosion briton uk foreign affairs office to check apos; Briton briton emergency.
24	briton dead moscow blast british citizen people killed bomb attack moscow	British citizens who died in Moscow were bombed to death in Moscow.	British citizens who died in Moscow were killed by bombs in Moscow.	Some of the British citizens who died in Moscow were killed in a bomb attack in Moscow.
24	live moscow airport explosion	Explosion at Moscow Airport.	This is the first airport in the world to do so.	There was an explosion at the airport of Moscow.
24	briton killed moscow blast uk foreign office report british citizen	Briton has killed Moscow blast uk Foreign Office reports as a citizen of the UK.	Briton killed Moscow blast uk Foreign Office report to British citizen.	Briton killed Moscow blast uk Foreign Office British citizen report.
24	hindu killed suicide bomber strike moscow airport	Hindu has killed a suicide bomber at the Moscow airport.	Hindu killed a suicide bomber at the airport in Moscow.	Hindu killed a suicide bomber at Moscow Airport.
24	deadly blast moscow airport	Fatal explosion at Moscow Airport.	Fatal explosion in the Moscow airport.	Moscow airport deadly explosion.
24	fatal blast reported moscow airport terminal russian authority monday reported fatal explosion domodedo	The fatal explosion was reported Monday at Moscow's Russian airport, Russian authorities reported a fatal explosion at the Domodedo airport.	The fatal explosion was reported Monday at the Russian airport in Moscow, Russian authorities reported a fatal domodedo explosion.	The fatal explosion was reported Monday at Moscow Airport, Russian authorities reported a domodedo fatal explosion.
24	deadly suicide bombing hit moscow airport people killed injured suicide bomb blast mo	A suicide bombing-deadly suicide at the airport in Moscow killed people who were injured by a suicide bombing-suicide bombing.	A deadly suicide bombing-in Moscow Airport killed people injured by a suicide bomb attack-in Moscow.	A deadly suicide bombing at Moscow airport killed people injured by a suicide bombing.
24	suicide bomber blamed moscow airport attack killed russian state tv report	A suicide bomber accused of suicide; an attack at the Moscow airport killed a Russian TV news report.	A suicide bomber accused of an attack at the Moscow airport killed a Russian TV report.	A suicide bomber accused of a Moscow airport attack killed a Russian TV report.
24	guardian uk domodedovo airport hit deadly bombing	Murderous bombings were carried out at Uk domodedovo airport.	The airport of uk domodedovo has been the target of murderous bombings.	Uk domodedovo airport was the target of deadly bombings.
24	carnage bomber target moscow airport	The suicide bomber's targeting the Moscow airport.	The suicide bomber targets the Moscow airport.	The suicide bomber is targeting the airport in Moscow.
24	killed moscow airport attack police seeking men report	The Moscow Airport Police Department was killed while they were looking for men.	Moscow airport police were killed while searching for the men.	The Moscow airport police were killed looking for men.
24	dead moscow airport explosion cnn	Explosion at Moscow Airport.	This is the first airport in the world to do so.	There was an explosion at the airport of Moscow.
24	dead moscow airport explosion	Explosion at Moscow Airport.	This is the first airport in the world to do so.	There was an explosion at the airport of Moscow.
24	ufo paranormal terrorist bombing moscow airport	A Paranormal Terrorist Bombing at Moscow Airport.	A terrorist paranormal attack at Moscow airport.	A paranormal terrorist attack in Moscow airport.
24	news uk foreign office urgently checking briton caught explosion rep	The Ministry of Foreign Affairs of the United Kingdom verifies that Briton is well aware of the explosion.	The UK Department of Foreign Affairs @-@Uni verifies urgently that Briton is well aware of the explosion.	The UK Department of Foreign Affairs @-@United is urgently checking that Briton is well aware of the explosion.
24	terrorist attack view exclusive footage today bombing moscow airport dozen dead tcot ocra	Terrorist attack to see the exclusive footage today; bombing of the airport of Moscow dozens of dead Tcot ocra.	Terrorist attack see exclusive footage today; bombing of Apos; Moscow airport dozens of Tcot ocra dead.	Terrorist attack view exclusive images today; bombing of dozens of dead Tcot ocra airport in Moscow.
24	suicide bombing moscow airport kill	A suicide bomber attacked the city of Moscow and killed the city of Moscow.	Moscow airport kills a suicide bomber.	A suicide bombing at Moscow airport kills.
24	uk foreign office urgently checking briton caught explosion uk news	The UK Foreign Office @-@U.S.A. Verifies that Briton has caught the explosion Uk news.	The Foreign Office of the UK @-@Uni checks to see that Briton has caught explosion uk news.	UK Foreign Office @-@United checks to see that Briton has caught explosion uk news.
24	moscow airport blast dozen killed explosion hit domodedovo airport early unconfirmed report	Explosion at Moscow Airport A dozen explosions occurred at Domodedovo Airport.	Explosion at the airport of Domodedovo, Moscow Airport A dozen explosions took place at the airport.	Explosion at the airport of Moscow A dozen explosions took place at the airport of Domodedovo.
24	dead moscow airport explosion explosion attributed russia investigative committee cnn	Moscow airport attributed to the Russian investigation.	Explosion at the airport of Moscow attributed to the commission of the Russian investigation.	Moscow airport explosion attributed to the Russian commission.
25	giffords husband great rep gabrielle giffords ariz adjusting rehabili	Giffords great gabriel giffords ariz adjust the rehabilitation.	Giffords husband great gabriel giffords ariz adjust the rehabilitation.	Giffords husband great gabrielle giffords ariz adjust rehabilitation.
25	doctor giffords face rocky road recovery day week rep gabrielle giffords recovery	Dr. Giffords faces a rocky day of recovery the week, featuring Gabrielle Giffords of recovery.	Dr Giffords faces a rocky day of recovery the week depicting Gabrielle Giffords of recovery.	Dr. Giffords faces a rocky day of recovery the week depicting Gabrielle Giffords' recovery effort.
25	medical news giffords cleared rehab critical care head trauma medpage today	Giffords de l'apos; actualité médicale has approved the page on head injuries in re-education today.	Giffords de l'apos; medical news approved the page on re-education head injuries today.	Giffords de l'apos; medical news approved the re-education head injuries page today.
25	giffords condition upgraded good	L' sn&apos gifford condition; improved.	L' gifford condition s' is improved.	L' la condition des giffords s' est l'amélioration.
25	bbc news america giffords health good medic condition congresswoman gabrielle giffords	BBC News American Giffords Healthy Member of Parliament Gabrielle Giffords.	Gabrielle Giffords, Member of Parliament, is in good health.	BBC News American Giffords reports good health for Member of Parliament Gabrielle Giffords.
25	giffords rocky road recovery health news	Rocky Giffords of the roadside rehabilitation health news.	Rocky giffords of road salvage health news.	Rocky giffords of recovery health news from the road.
25	breaking news fluid buildup rep giffords brain will delay start full fledged rehabilitation hou	The last news: l'apos; accumulation of fluids in the brain of the Giffords will delay the beginning of complete rehabilitation.	The accumulation of fluids in the Gifford brain will delay the start of complete rehabilitation.	Latest news: l' fluid build-up in Gifford brain will delay the start of full-scale rehabilitation.
25	brain fluid buildup delay giffords rehab	Giffords' re-education is delayed by the accumulation of cerebral fluid.	Brain fluid build-up delays re-education of Giffords.	The brain fluid build-up is delaying Giffords' re-education.
25	giffords surprising doctor hospital icu exercise wounded rep gabrielle giffords	Giffords surprisingly doctor practice this hospital wound gabriel giffords rep.	Giffords surprisingly doctor practice this wounded giffords gabriel hospital rep.	Giffords surprisingly doctor exercise this hospital wounded gabriel giffords rep.
25	rep giffords fitness level bodes well recovery add diet loaded fruit	Rep Giffords level of physical condition augurs well for recovery, adding the diet full of loaded fruit.	Rep Giffords level of physical condition augurs well for the recovery add the diet loaded fruit.	Rep Giffords level of physical condition augurs well the recovery add diet loaded fruits.
25	doctor giffords face rocky road recovery normalcy cnn erwwpr	Dr. Giffords faces a salvage of the normal rock road.	Dr. Giffords is facing a recovery from normal rock road cnn erwwpr.	Dr. Giffords faces a recovery from normal rocky road cnn erwwpr.
25	doctor giffords good condition will rehab rep gabrielle giffords good condition wi	Dr. Giffords is in good shape for Gabrielle Giffords' rehabilitation.	Dr. Giffords in good condition for the rehabilitation of Gabrielle Giffords.	Dr. Giffords is in good condition for the rehabilitation of Gabrielle Giffords.
25	giffords condition upgraded good	L' sn&apos gifford condition; improved.	L' gifford condition s' is improved.	L' la condition des giffords s' est l'amélioration.
25	doctor giffords face rocky road recovery day week rep gabrielle giffords recovery fr	Dr. Giffords faces a rocky salvage day in Rep. Giffords Recovery Gabrielle week.	Dr. Giffords faces a rocky day of reclamation in the french reclaimed gabrielle giffords week.	Dr. Giffords faces a rocky day of recovery week rep. giffords recovery fr.
25	interested giffords improves watch hour tv gabrielle giffords watched hour television	This is the first time you will be able to watch a TV show on TV.	The giffords concerned improve the time of gabriel television giffords watched TV hour.	The giffords concerned improve the apos; hour of gabriel television giffords watched hour of television.
25	doctor giffords recovery sprint day week rep gabrielle giffords recovery fro	Doctor Giffords recuperation sprint weekday rep Gabrielle Giffords recuperation from gabriel week giffords.	Dr. Giffords recuperation sprint day week rep gabriel giffords recuperation from the week gabriel giffords.	Doctor Giffords recuperation sprint day week rep gabriel giffords recuperation from gabriel giffords week.
25	giffords condition upgraded good doctor rep gabrielle giffords upgraded condition serio	It's been a long time, but it's been a long time, and it's been a long time since we've been able to do that.	L' state of the giffords was improved Good doctor rep. gabrielle giffords was improved state serio condition serio.	Gifford condition was improved Good doctor rep. gabrielle giffords was improved condition serio condition serio.
25	rep giffords set rehab houston yahoo share friend health smoking story	Rep Giffords set rehab houston yahoo to share the story of the use of tobacco by healthy friends.	Rep Giffords set rehab houston yahoo share l' history of smoking with healthy friends.	Giffords set rehab houston yahoo share l' history of smoking with healthy friends.
25	giffords condition upgraded good cnn	Gifford conditions have allowed us to improve water quality.	The state of the giffords allowed us to improve the quality of water.	The condition of the giffords has improved water quality.
25	giffords surprising doctor hospital icu	It's the first time I've been in a hospital, and it's the last time.	The giffords will surprise the ICU doctor in the hospital.	The giffords surprise the ICU doctor of the hospital.
25	giffords speaking valve breathing tube	Giffords speaks valvule respiratory tube.	Giffords speaks of the respiratory tube valve.	Giffords speaking valvule breathing tube.
25	giffords condition upgraded good doctor rep gabrielle giffords upgraded condition serio	It's been a long time, but it's been a long time, and it's been a long time since we've been able to do that.	L' state of the giffords was improved Good doctor rep. gabrielle giffords was improved state serio condition serio.	Gifford condition was improved Good doctor rep. gabrielle giffords was improved condition serio condition serio.
25	brain fluid buildup delay giffords rehab rep gabrielle giffords transferred houston brain	The accumulation of cerebral fluid delayed the gabriel gifford rehab transferred Houston's brain.	Cerebral fluid buildup delays gabriel gifford rehab transferred Houston's brain.	The brain fluid build-up delays the rehab gabriel giffords giffords transferred the brain from Houston.
25	news update giffords condition upgraded good doctor rep gabrielle giffords upgraded condition	Current status of giffords updated Good rep giffords gabrielle rep upgraded status status.	Current status of updated giffords good doctor rep gabrielle giffords updated status.	Current status of giffords updated good doctor rep gabrielle giffords upgraded status updated.
25	gabrielle giffords good condition transfer rehab	Gabrielle Giffords is in good state of Rehabilitation Transfer Transfer Transfer and Rehabilitation Transfer.	Gabrielle Giffords good state of transfer rehabilitation transfer rehabilitation.	Gabrielle Giffords is in good condition to transfer rehabilitation transfer.
25	top news giffords full round therapy houston reuters representative gabrielle gifford	Top news Giffords completes Houston Reuters representing Gabrielle Gifford.	Top news Giffords complete therapy Houston Reuters representing Gabrielle Gifford.	Top news Giffords complete therapy Houston Reuters representing Gabrielle Gifford.
25	houston transfer help giffords husband kelly cope	Giffords' husband, Kelly, was helped out by the Houston transfer.	The Houston transfer helps Giffords' husband, Kelly, to s' get out.	Houston transfer helps Giffords's husband Kelly to get out of there.
25	updated rehab aim giffords life	The life of Giffords has now been redirected to re-education.	Giffords' life has been turned back to re-education.	Giffords' life has been re-oriented.
26	jordan thousand protest demand pm step wave mass protest arab spread opposition supporter	Thousands of protests in Jordan for a wave of mass mass protests in Saudi Arabia are spreading in support of the apo; opposition.	A thousand protests in Jordan for a wave of mass mass protest in Saudi Arabia s' extend in support of the apos; opposition.	A thousand protests in Jordan for a wave of mass protest in Saudi Arabia spread in support of the opposition.
26	thousand protesting jordan demanding govt step	Thousand Jordanian protesters demand that the government take a step forward.	A thousand Jordanian protesters are demanding that the Jordanian government take a step forward.	A thousand protesters are demanding that the government take a step forward.
26	jordan protester gather country demanding prime minister step al jazeera	Jordanian protesters are gathering to demand that the Prime Minister take a step toward Jazeera.	Jordanian protesters are gathering the country to demand that the Prime Minister take a step towards the Jazeera.	Jordanian protesters are rallying the country demanding that the Prime Minister take a step forward on the jazeera front.
26	aljazeera thousand protest jordan	Aljazeera has a thousand protests from Jordan.	Aljazeera, a thousand Jordanian protests.	A thousand Jordanian protests.
26	thousand protest jordan middle east al jazeera english	Middle @-@Orient al jazeera.	A Thousand Jordanian Protests - Middle-Orient al jazeera English.	A thousand Jordanian protests Middle @-@Orient al jazeera English.
26	desire freedom infectious thousand protest jordan middle east al jazeera english	Wish for the contagious freedom of a thousand Jordanian protests Middle @-@Orient al jazeera English.	Wish the contagious freedom 1000 Jordanian protests Middle-Orient al jazeera English.	Wish for the contagious freedom thousand Middle-Orient al jazeera Jordanian protests.
26	pro democracy protest break jordan catspirit	Demonstration in favor of democracy breaking Jordan's cat spirit.	Demonstration in favor of democracy break the apos; spirit of Jordan cat.	Democracy protest break apo; Jordan's cat spirit.
26	thousand protest jordan demand pm step	Thousands of Jordanian protests have been made.	A thousand Jordanian protests don't ask for them.	A thousand Jordanian protests demand pm not pm.
26	thousand protest jordan middle east	Jordan Middle-Orient.	Thousand protests Jordan Middle-Orient.	A thousand protests Jordan Middle-Orient.
26	thousand protest jordan reform	Thousands of protests over Jordanian reform.	A thousand protests about Jordanian reform.	Jordanian reform protests a thousand times.
26	thousand protest jordan reform cnn news	Thousand protests about Jordanian CNN News reform.	A thousand protests about reform of CNN News in Jordan.	A thousand protests on the Jordanian reform of the CNN news service.
26	thousand protest jordan middle east	Jordan Middle-Orient.	Thousand protests Jordan Middle-Orient.	A thousand protests Jordan Middle-Orient.
26	spreading thousand protest jordan demand pm step aljazeera net	Disseminating thousands of protests in Jordan requires pm pas aljazeera net aljazeera.	Disseminating 1,000 Jordanian protests requires pm pas aljazeera net aljazeera.	A thousand Jordanian protests require pm pas aljazeera net aljazeera.
26	thousand jordan protest demand pm step day protest opposition supporter stre	A thousand protesters in Jordan are calling for a working day of protests against the government.	A thousand protesters in Jordan are demanding a working day of protest against the opposition.	A thousand Jordanian protesters demand a working day of protest against the opposition.
27	france fox piven defies death threat taunt anchorman glenn beck link lit	The fox of France defies the threat of death by mocking the life of presenter Glenn Beck.	The French fox defies the death threat by taunting Glenn Beck.	French fox defies death threat by taunting presenter Glenn Beck.
27	glenn beck fran piven michael tomasky comment free americafirst	Glenn Beckk Fran released Michael Tomasky's free review of L' America first.	Glenn Beckk Fran made Michael Tomasky free comment from L' America first.	Glenn Beckk Fran made Michael Tomasky free comment from America first.
27	france fox piven defies death threat taunt anchorman glenn beck mental	France Fox Piven defies the death threat... taunts mental anchorman Glenn Beck.	France Fox Piven defies the death threat by mental anchor Glenn Beck.	France Fox Piven defies death threat taunts anchorman Glenn Beck mentally.
27	glenn beck virulent attack cuny prof fox piven inciting threat aaup irresponsible rhetoric	Glenn Beck virulent cuny-professor fox attack inciting irresponsible ape-photoric threat.	Glenn Beck virulent attack cuny fox teacher inciting irresponsible ape-photoric threat.	Glenn Beck virulent attack cuny prof fox given inciting to the irresponsible ape rhetorical threat.
27	glenn beck target france fox piven beck scary	Glenn Beck, the fox of the target fox, Piven, is scary.	Glenn Beck, france fox target Piven, scary.	Glenn Beck, target france fox Piven, scared.
27	glenn beck france fox piven york time falsely depicts controversy tcot	Glenn beck France Fox piven York Time has falsely depicted the tcot controversy.	Glenn beck France Fox York Time falsely depicts the tcot controversy.	Glenn beck France Fox piven York Time falsely depicts controversy tcot.
27	france fox piven defies death threat taunt anchorman glenn beck	Renard de France piven defies anchorman Glenn Beckk's death threat.	Fox of France defies death threat taunts anchor Glenn Beckk.	Fox of France piven defies death threat taunts anchorman Glenn Beckk.
27	glenn beck france fox piven york time falsely depicts controversy tcot hhrs teaparty	Glenn beck France Fox piven York Time falsely portrays the controversy of tcot hhrs teaparty.	Glenn beck France Fox piven York Time falsely depicts the tcot hhrs teaparty controversy.	Glenn beck Fox piven York Time falsely depicts the controversy tcot hhrs teaparty.
28	hawaii won release obama birth info	It was the first time in the world that Hawaii had ever seen the United States of America.	Hawaii has won the publication of apos; information on birth of apos; Obama.	Hawaii won apo news about the birth of Obama.
28	copy obama birth certificate bill pass xmnr tcot gop	Copy Obama Birth Certificate Bill passes xmnr tcot gop gop tcot xmnr.	Copy Obama birth certificate pass xmnr tcot gop gop tcot xmnr.	Copying Obama birth certificate bill pass xmnr tcot gop gop tcot xmnr.
28	birthers hawaii bill charge president obama birth record effort silence birthers	Birthers hawaii bill President Obama of Obama from birth to register the effort silent birthers birthers.	Birthers hawaii bill as president Obama from birth; to register; to make effort silence birthers birthers.	Birthers hawaii bill President Obama of birth d' record effort silence birthers birthers.
28	hawaii bill grant access obama birth record fee	It's the only way you can get the information you need.	Hawaii Bill allows access to fees; birth registration from Obama.	Hawaii Bill allows access to birth registration fees from Obama.
28	hawaii offer obama birth document honolulu jan upi bid quiet birthers hawaiian legisl	Hawaii Offers Obama Birth Document Honolulu Jan Upi offers calm Hawaiian birthers legislation.	Hawaii offers Obama his birth certificate Honolulu Jan Upi offers quiet hawaiian birthers hawaiian legislation.	Hawaii offers Obama birth document Honolulu Jan Upi offers calm birthers hawaiian legislation hawaiian.
29	iran iran hang iranian dutch woman drug smuggling iranelection	Iran Iran Hanging Dutch Iranian Woman Drug Trafficking iranelection smuggling iranelection.	Iran Iran hanging Dutch Iranian woman drug trafficking iranelection smuggle iranelection.	Iran Iran hang Dutch Dutch Iranian woman drug trafficking iranelection smuggling iranelection.
29	dtn iran iran executes iranian dutch woman detained poll unrest report iranian dutch woman detaine	L' Iran executes an Iranian Dutch woman who was detained by an Iranian public opinion poll; agitation An Iranian Dutch woman detached from apos; a poll.	L' Iran executes a Dutch Iranian woman detained by a poll Report on the apos; agitation A Dutch Iranian woman detached from apos; a poll.	L' Iran executes a Dutch Iranian woman detained by a poll A Dutch Iranian woman detached from Apos; a poll.
29	dutch freeze contact iran hanging iranelection well late	The Dutch frost contact Iran hangs very late in the game.	The Dutch frost contact Iran hangs iranelection very late.	The Dutch gel contact Iran is hanging iranelection very late.
29	bbc news iran hang iranian dutch woman sahra bahrami iranelections freeiran	BBC News Iran hangs a Dutch Iranian Sahra bahrami Iranian iranelections freeiran iranian woman.	BBC News hangs a Dutch Iranian sahra bahrami iranelections freeiran Iranian woman.	BBC News Iran hangs Dutch woman iranian sahra bahrami iranelections freeiran iran.
29	bbc news dutch freeze contact iran hanging	BBC News hutch is freezing contact Iran hanging.	BBC News hutch freezing contact Iran hanging.	BBC News hutch freezes contact iran hanging.
29	bbc news dutch freeze contact iran hanging	BBC News hutch is freezing contact Iran hanging.	BBC News hutch freezing contact Iran hanging.	BBC News hutch freezes contact iran hanging.
29	iran hang iranian dutch woman drug smuggling tehran amsterdam reuters iranian dutch woman arrested	Iran hangs Dutch Iranian drug smuggler Tehran Amsterdam reuters Iranian arrested Dutch female.	Iranian hanged Dutch drug smuggler Iranian woman Tehran Amsterdam reuters arrested Dutch Iranian woman.	Iran hangs Dutch Iranian woman drug smuggler Tehran Amsterdam reuters Iranian woman arrested Dutch woman.
29	dutch break iran link hanging iranelection saudiarabia tunis jan	Episode blizzard is a blizzard blizzard blizzard.	Dutch break Iran link pendane irlection saudiarabia tunis jan.	Dutch break Iran link hang iranelection saudiarabia tunis jan.
29	dutch government end official contact iran protest hanging dutch iranian woman al jazeera	The Dutch government puts an end to official contact with Dutch woman al-Jazeera Iranian hanging protest.	The Dutch government is ending official contact Iran Hanging Protest Dutch Iranian woman al Jazeera.	Dutch government ends official contact Iran Hanging protest Dutch Iranian woman al Jazeera.
29	iran hang dutch iranian woman drug smuggling worldnews	Iran hangs an Iranian woman, trafficking drugs from the world news.	Iran hanged Iranian woman world news drug trafficking.	Iran hanged Iranian woman drug trafficking world news.
29	netherlands recall iran ambassador dutch woman execution foreign policy outrage	The Countries @-@Bas recall that the Ambassador of Denmark; Iran has executed a Dutch woman for insulting foreign policy.	The countries @-@Bas recall that the ambassador d' Iran executed a Dutch woman for insulting foreign policy.	Countries-Bas recall that the ambassador d' Iran executed a Dutch woman for violating foreign policy.
29	iran executes iranian dutch woman	The apos; Iran executes a Dutch Iranian woman.	Iran executes a Dutch Iranian woman.	L' Iran executes an Iranian woman from the Netherlands.
30	carney obama press secretary	Press secretary, Carney Obama.	You know, Carney Obama press secretary.	Carney Obama... press secretary.
30	jay carney white house press secretary richard adam guardian	Jay Carney, Richard Adam Guard, White House spokesman.	The door-word of the White House, Jay Carney, Richard Adam Guard.	And the White House door-word, Jay Carney, Richard Adam Guard.
30	jay carney voice relationship will develop jaycarney	The vocal relationship of Jay Carney will also develop Jay Carney.	The Jay Carney vocal relationship will develop into Jay Carney.	Jay Carney's vocal relationship will develop Jay Carney.
30	meet jay carney guy white house press secretary	Jay Carney, the White House Press Secretary.	This is Jay Carney, White House Press Secretary.	This is Jay Carney, the press secretary for the White House.
30	jay carney white house press secretary richard adam guardian	Jay Carney, Richard Adam Guard, White House spokesman.	The door-word of the White House, Jay Carney, Richard Adam Guard.	And the White House door-word, Jay Carney, Richard Adam Guard.
30	white house press secretary jay carney	White House spokesman Jay Carney.	The door-word of the White House, Jay Carney.	And the door-word of the White House, Jay Carney.
30	ap source obama pick biden spokesman white house press secretary	Obama appoints door-speech biden door-White House press secretary.	Ap source Obama choose door-speech biden door-word of the White House press attaché.	Ap source Obama choose door-speech biden door-White House press secretary.
30	carney picked obama press secretary mike allen politico	Carney chose-Word @apos; Obama.	Carney chose the gateway-word from Obama.	It's the first time I've had a chance to talk to you.
30	obama name press secretary	Obama, by the name of Press Secretary.	Obama's name is Press Secretary.	Obama by press secretary.
30	vice president communication director jay carney named white house press secretary	Vice-President-President Jay Carney, Communications Director, has appointed him White House Press Secretary.	Vice-President Jay Carney, Communications Director, has named him White House Press Secretary.	Jay Carney, vice-president, director of communications, appointed him as press secretary for the White House.
30	time journalist obama press secretary news	Obama Press Magazine period.	Period Journalist Obama Pressse News.	"""Journalist Period"" Obama Pressse News."
31	sm socialmedia revolution social medium uprising epoch time tyranny social medium	It's a social revolution, a social revolution, an uprising of apos; a tyrannical period of social middle social times.	Sm socialmedia middle social revolution uprising d' middle tyrannical social social era.	Sm socialmedia revolution middle social uprising; era of tyranny middle social era.
31	social medium tool protest middle east police worst	L&apos is a social media tool that protests against the Middle East's worst police force.	Social medium tool L&apos protests against the Middle's worst font-Orient.	L' social medium tool protests against Middle-Orient's worst font.
31	thing social medium revolution enticing idea	The subject of the media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media. media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media	The subject of the media medi medi medi medi medi medi medi medi medi medi medi medi medi medi revolution revolution revolution of the apo revolution; subject of revolution revolution revolution of the apo revolution; before the apo; idea of the apo; set of apo; before the apo; before the apo; before the apo; before the apo; before the apo; before the apo; before the apo; before the apo; before the idea of the beginning.	L' subject of the thing of the media revolution media medi medi medi medi medi medi medi medi medi medi medi medi medi medi revolution revolution of the revolution of the apo revolution; subject of the revolution revolution revolution of the revolution of the apo revolution; before the apos; idea of the apos; ensemble of the apos; before the apos; before the apos; before the apos; before the apos; before the idea of the beginning.
31	haiti tragedy cement role social medium powerful social tool	The tragedy of Haiti binds together the social role of the medium as a powerful social tool.	Haitian tragedy binds media social role powerful social tool.	Haitian tragedy cement social role medium powerful social tool.
31	political power social medium foreign affair	Political power, social media, foreign affairs, and foreign affairs.	Political power, social media, foreign affairs, foreign affairs.	Political power social medium, foreign affairs, foreign affairs.
31	republican nimble democrat social medium study find democrat obama cam tcot tlot	An agile Republican Democratic study of social medium finds obama cam cam tcot tlot tlot democrat.	An agile Republican democrat study on social medium finds obama cam cam tcot tlot democratic.	An agile Republican democrat study of social medium finds the democrat obama cam tcot tlot tlot.
31	nerdalert thing social medium revolution	Nerdalert is a medium social revolutionary thing.	Nerdalert thing medium social revolution.	Nerdalert medium thing social revolution.
31	mob democracy facebook twitter youtube revolution politics daily	Mob Democracy Facebook youtube revolutionize everyday politics.	Facebook Mafia Democracy youtube revolutionize politics every day.	Facebook mafia democracy youtube revolutionize politics every day.
31	thing social medium revolution activist twitter	C' is a social thing, is a revolution, is a Twitter activist.	C&apos is a social thing, a revolution, and an activist on Twitter.	C&apos is a social thing, revolution, activist on Twitter.
31	pew republican democrat social medium	Pew Democratic Republican Social Media Democrat.	Democrat Republican social media Pew.	Pew Democratic republican social media democrat.
31	egyptian uprising play social medium site despite government internet restriction egypt	The Egyptian uprising plays the role of a social media outlet despite the government's restrictions on e-mail access.	The Egyptian uprising plays the role of social media despite the government's restriction of access to the Internet.	Egypt's uprising plays the role of social media despite government restrictions on e-mail.
31	twitter facebook blocked egypt news jan politics sm jan	It's been a long time since I've had a chance to tell you what I've done.	Facebook blocked the news; Egyptian news Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan.	Facebook blocked the Egyptian news Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan Jan.
31	mob democracy facebook twitter youtube revolution facebook	Youtube Facebook Facebook Facebook revolutionary mafia.	Facebook mafia democracy twitterbook youtube revolution facebook.	Democracy mafia facebook twitter youtube revolution facebook.
31	online american social networking twitter republican catch democrat social	On U.S. social media, Republican Twitter catches Social Democratic.	Online on US social media, Republican Twitter catches social democrat.	On U.S. social media, Republican twitter catches social democrat.
31	journalist social medium report egyptian demonstration audioboo	Journalist social media outlet reporting Egyptian protest audioboo audioboo.	Egyptian social journalist reporting protest Egyptian audioboo audioboo.	Journalist social media report protest Egyptian audioboo audioboo.
31	republican gain democrat social medium study released pew center internet	L' Study on the Democratic Social Medium Republican has published on the Internet the point of departure; anchoring of the Internet.	L' study on the social media democrat republican published on the Internet the point d' anchoring of the Internet.	L' study on social medium Democratic Republic published on Internet the point d' anchor of the Internet.
31	poll gop catch dems social medium younger internet user pew lik socialmedia	It's a great way to get to know more about the Internet and to learn more about social media.	The survey gop catchs on the social media the youngest user of the Internet pew as socialmedia.	The gop wrestling survey on social media the youngest user of Internet pew as socialmedia.
31	poll gop catch dems social medium younger internet user pew	It's a great way to get a feel for the environment and the environment.	The survey gop catch the social medium the youngest user of the Internet pew.	The poll gop catch the social medium the youngest user of Internet pew pew.
31	power social medium	Power of the social medium?	Power of social medium.	The power of the social medium.
31	social medium growing role social medium	The Growing Role of the Social Medium the Social Role the Social Medium the Social Medium.	The growing role of the social medium the social role the social medium the social medium.	The growing role of social medium social role social medium social medium social medium.
31	poll gop catch dems social medium younger internet user pew social medium	The survey collects data on the state of the art of social media.	The survey collects data from the youngest social media outlet; Internet user releases social media.	Surveys catch the youngest social media; Internet user pew social media.
31	republican catch democrat socialmedia politics	Social media reports that Republican politics is catching up with the Democrats.	Republican politics is catching democrats on social media.	Republican politics grabbing social media Democrat.
31	online american social networking twitter politics campaign	On social media in the United States, a political campaign on Twitter is under way.	On U.S. social networks, a political campaign on Twitter is now underway.	On US social networking sites, a political campaign on Twitter is underway.
31	will egypt facebook powered revolution hard heel tunisian protest	L' Egypt facebook, fueled by the country's hard-hitting revolution.	L' Facebook Egypt fueled by heel revolution hard Tunisian protest.	L' Egypt facebook fueled by the heel revolution hard protest Tunisia.
31	republican gain democrat social medium	Republicans, they win the social-democratic medium.	Republicans win the Democratic social medium.	Republicans win the social democrat medium.
31	obama campaign playbook promote agenda social medium	Obama's book on social media campaigning promotes the social media agenda.	The Obama campaign book promotes the social media agenda.	Obama's campaign book promotes social media agenda.
31	facebook twitter revolution mediapost searchblog overview internet blackout af	Twitter revolution Twitter mediapost blog search d' Internet glimpse black-out af.	Facebook Twitter revolution mediapost blog search d' glimpse black Internet-out af.	Twitter Twitter revolution mediapost blog research blog d' Internet black-out af glimpse.
31	christie prof adept social medium	Christie teaches social psychics.	Christie's a teacher of the social psychic.	Well, Christie teaches social psychics.
31	gop voter active social networking site political purpose washing artimpactnetpr	Social networking site active gop voting for political wash artimpactnetprprpr.	Active social networking site gop voting for political wash artimpactnetprprpr.	Active voting gop social networking site political wash artimpactnetprprpr.
31	journalist social medium report egyptian demonstration journalist	Social media reporter reporting on the Egyptian protest reporter for the protest.	Social media reporter reporting on Egyptian protest journalist protest.	Journalist social media report of the Egyptian protest journalist of the protest.
31	poll gop catch dems social medium	Gop Wrestling is the social media outlet for the Gop Wrestling poll.	Gop wrestling is the social media of the poll.	Gop wrestling is the survey social media.
31	rash report social medium tool social unrest john rash tunisian mohamed bouazizi cou	Rash reports on a social media tool john rash Tunisian mohamed bouazizi neck social disorder.	Rash reports a social media tool john rash social disorder tunisian mohamed bouazizi neck.	Rash reports a social media tool john rash tunisian mohamed neck bazizi social disorder.
31	thing social medium revolution	C&apos is the social media revolution.	C' is the revolution of the social medium.	C&apos is the social medium revolution.
31	pew internet online american social networking twitter politics campaign internet	On the Web, on the Web, on the US Social Network, on Twitter, on the Web, on the Web, on the Web, on the Web, etc.	On the web, on the web, on the American social network, on Twitter, on the web, on the web, on the web, on the web etc.	On the web, on the web, on the US social networking site, on Twitter, on the web, on the web, on the web, on the web, on the web, etc.
31	political power social medium foreign affair	Political power, social media, foreign affairs, and foreign affairs.	Political power, social media, foreign affairs, foreign affairs.	Political power social medium, foreign affairs, foreign affairs.
31	obama campaign playbook promote agenda social medium	Obama's book on social media campaigning promotes the social media agenda.	The Obama campaign book promotes the social media agenda.	Obama's campaign book promotes social media agenda.
32	alberta ferretti spring rtw	Ferretti Spring rtw.	Alberta Ferretti Spring, rtw.	Alberta ferretti spring rtw.
32	leon payn bottega veneta coming	Leon bottega payn veneta to come.	Leon payn bottega veneta coming.	Leon payn bottega veneta coming up.
32	bottega veneta teal turquoise knot intrecciato snakeskin clutch	Bottega veneta Turquoise teal node Intrecciato skin of snakes clutch intrecciato.	Bottega veneta Sarcelle turquoise knot Intrecciato skin of snakes clutch clutch intrecciato.	Bottega veneta Turquoise teal Intrecciato knot snakeskin clutch intrecciato.
32	bottega veneta rtw spring beautiful fashion art gt	Bottega veneta rtw springtime fashion beautiful art gt gt.	Bottega veneta rtw spring beautiful mode art gt gt.	Bottega veneta rtw spring beautiful art gt.
32	photography check bottega veneta robert longo photo shoot fall winter advertising camp	Photograph check Bottega Veneta Robert Longo photo session Fall photo camp.	Photograph to check Bottega Veneta Robert Longo photo session autumn winter advertising camp.	Photograph check Bottega Veneta Robert Longo photo session autumn advertising camp winter.
32	straight catwalk stan jouk	This is Stan's right hand bridge.	Okay, right footbridge, Stan jouk.	Right footbridge stan yak.
32	trend spring	Spring's trend.	Spring's up.	The spring trend.
32	bottega veneta launch fragrance	Scent-flavored Bottega veneta.	Bottega veneta launch cologne.	Bottega veneta launch flavor.
33	wisconsin detector law family duplex	Duplex from the Wisconsin-based sensor family.	Duplex of the Wisconsin detector family.	Duplex from Wisconsin's detector family.
34	bbc news police lose officer	B.B.C. Loses one officer.	Well, the B.B.C. police are losing an officer.	BBC police lose an officer.
34	government spending cut leave north east forestry commission base saveourforests	Government budget cuts have left the basis of the Northern Forestry Commission-est saves our forests.	The government's budget cuts leave the base of the forest commission-is saves our forests.	The government's budget cuts have left the base of the forestry commission in the north-saves our forests.
34	manchester austerity cut hit frontline service leisure centre library swimming pool public toile	L' austerity of Manchester has hit on the first line center of leisure library library pool toilet public pool leisure center.	L' austerity of Manchester has hit in the first line of center leisure library library swimming pool public toilet pool leisure center.	L' austerity of Manchester has hit first line leisure center library swimming pool public toilet pool leisure center.
34	spending cut toy library jeopardy	To spend on a library of toys, c&apos is to risk of them; to lose there.	Spending money on a toy library is a gamble; it's a gamble.	Spending on a toy library is risking your life.
34	guardian music birmingham city council cut bcmg reversed protest kicking fuss work	Birmingham music guard cut bcmg city council overturned protest kicking chaotic work.	Musique guardienne birmingham city council cut bcmg overturned protest giving kicks to work chaotic.	Guardian music birmingham city council cut bcmg overturned protest kicking chaotic work.
35	disease health risk bed bug bite	Health Risks of Illnesses Bedbug bite.	Health risk Bed bug bite.	Bedbug bite is a health risk.
35	sage advice travel picking bedbug hitchhiker	Tips on choosing a car-bed bug stop.	Some good tips on choosing a-bedbug stopper car.	Some good tips on choosing a car-to stop bugs.
35	rid bedbug	Get rid-of the bed bugs.	Get rid of bed bugs-yourself.	Get rid of the bedbugs.
35	bedbug case clinophobia fear going bed	Bed bugs are afraid to go to bed.	Bed bug clinophobia is afraid to go to bed.	Bed bug clinophobia is afraid of going to bed.
35	bed bug problem bad bed bug summit washington	The Bedbugs Problem The Top of Bedbugs Washington.	You know, the bedbugs problem, the top of the bedbugs, Washington.	The bed bug problem, the top of bed bugs, Washington.
35	bed bug deadbedbugs help fact bed bug treatment	Bed bugs help treat bed bugs with dead bugs.	Dead bugs from bed bugs can help with bed bugs.	Dead bed bugs help with bed bug treatment.
35	lighter note today wrapped second national bed bug summit cue bad joke conference hotel	Lighter note today' hui en envelopé 2nd national summit of the bed bugs replica bad joke hotel conference joke.	Note lighter today' hui enveloped second national summit of bed bugs replica bad joke conference hotel joke.	Lighter note today; wrapped hui second national bed bug summit replica bad joke conference hotel joke.
35	deadbedbugs fact bed bug cover	The dead bedbugs have been the cover of the bedbugs.	Dead bedbugs are the cover of bed bugs now.	Dead bed bugs are the bed bug blanket.
35	bedbug rapidly evolving fight pesticide tech news	Bedbugs are a fast-moving, anti-pesticide technology.	Bed bugs are rapidly evolving, fighting against the pesticide technologies.	Bed bugs evolve rapidly, fight pesticide technologies.
35	national summit address bedbug epidemic	The National Summit deals with the issue of bed bugs.	The national summit deals with the epidemic of bed bugs.	The national summit will address the epidemic of bed bugs.
35	fed crack bedbug	Crack-fed bed bugs.	Fed up with crack bed bugs.	Feeding crack bed bugs.
36	extremely good analysis difficult will murdoch money daily blog	Extremely good hard Murdoch analysis money daily blogger.	Extremely good hard analysis murdoch money daily blog.	Extremely good analysis difficult murdoch money daily blogger.
36	daily review murdoch ipad newspaper rupert murdoch ipad launch daily offer glitzy graphic	Murdoch Daily Journal ipad murdoch ipad rupert daily launch offer scintillating graphics.	Daily journal murdoch ipad journal rupert murdoch ipad daily launch offer glittering graphics.	Daily journal murdoch daily murdoch ipad daily journal rupert murdoch ipad launch offer scintillating graphic.
36	faster forward news corp launch tablet daily app ipad designed scratch dail	The company's daily front-end launch tablet; scratch-designed daily information ipad application.	The company's front-end daily launch tablet; daily application information designed scratch dail.	The front daily launch tablet of the company of l' information ipad daily application designed scratch dail.
36	web daily stunning slow day launch daily ipad newspaper ipad	Daily web surprisingly slow daily ipad daily ipad journal ipad daily launch day.	Surprisingly slow daily web launch day ipad daily ipad daily newspaper ipad daily.	Surprisingly slow daily web day launch daily ipad journal ipad daily ipad journal.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction number diet plan	It's a good way to reduce your weight, and it's a good way to reduce your weight.	The amaitist diet at bay provides healthy weight reduction.	The amaitist diet with bays and berries makes for a healthy weight reduction.
37	health acai berry effective colon cleanse ingredient acai berry rightly desc	It's a good way to keep your nose clean, and it's a good way to keep your nose clean.	L&apos, an effective cleansing ingredient for the colon, d&apos berries, acaj, acaj, acaj, acaj.	L&apos, effective cleansing ingredient for the colon, d&apos berries; acaj, rightly descends.
37	skinny burn fat	Burning grease.	It's lean grease.	Skinny burn grease.
37	maqui berry newest effective losing weight	Maqui Berry is the most effective yet to lose weight.	Maqui berry more effective again weight loss.	More effective maqui berry again weight loss.
37	acai berry weight loss confusing	There is a lot of confusion about how much weight the berries are losing.	Loss of weight of the berries; açaï, confusing.	Misunderstanding of weight loss of bay d'apos.
37	will acai berry help lose weight acai berry renowned natural weight loss supplement hea	The berries will help to lose weight The berries d' açaï are a well-known supplement for the loss of natural weight.	Bays will help you lose weight Bays d&apos are a recognized supplement to natural weight loss.	D'apos berries; açaï will help to lose weight D'apos berries are a natural weight loss supplement.
37	acai berry diet succeed hoodia gordonii site acai berry cultivated acai palm	The plant has a wide range of plant and animal life, and is one of the world's most important plant and animal species.	The d&apos berries' diet replaces that of the gordonii of the d&apos berry site; acai grown from the palm tree; acai.	The diet of the d&apos berries replaces that of the gordonii of the d&apos berries; d&apos cultivated acai palm.
37	acai berry supplement help weight loss bamadems reason acai ambria dealcenter	The extra d&apos berries will help you to lose weight while you're doing business.	The supplement of bays d' it helps the loss of weight bamadems reason acai ambria dealer.	The extra d&apos berries assist in weight loss bamadems reason acai ambria dealer.
37	weight loss diet acai berry weight loss diet plan diet diet food weight loss beauty sally beauty bea	Dietary Weight Loss Acai Bays Dietary Weight Loss Diet Dietary Weight Loss Bea Sally Bea Diet.	Dietary weight loss acai b ber diet weight loss diet diet weight loss dietary weight beauty sally bea.	Dietary weight loss diet diet diet weight loss diet weight loss beauty beauty sally bea.
37	love finding stuff acai berry juice drinking weight loss lookin sally	J' loves to find things like fresh berry juice; açaï while drinking berry juice.	J' loves to find things like softberry juice; açaï while drinking weight loss.	J' loves to find things like berry juice while drinking weight loss.
37	acai berry powder ehow acai berry powder acai berry extraordinarily	Powder d'apos; acai berry ehow powder d'apos; extraordinary acai berry.	Powder d' acai berry ehow acai berry powder d' acai berry extraordinary.	Poudre d'apos; acai berry ehow acai berry powder d'apos; acai berry extraordinaire.
37	buy acai berry weight loss product read buy acai berry weight loss product	"Purchase a weight-loss product from d&apos berries; read ""Buy a d&apos berry weight-loss product; acai."""	"Buy a weight loss product from d&apos berries; read ""Buy a weight loss product from d&apos berries; acai."""	"Purchase dock berry weight loss product; read ""Buy dock berry weight loss product; acai."""
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction number diet plan	It's a good way to reduce your weight, and it's a good way to reduce your weight.	The amaitist diet at bay provides healthy weight reduction.	The amaitist diet with bays and berries makes for a healthy weight reduction.
37	best weight loss pill acai berry advantage king bop loved appreciated solely lucky en	The best pill of weight loss acai-advantage bberries king bop-appreciated only lucky.	The best weight loss acai-advantage bberries bop berries loved only appreciated lucky.	The best weight loss pill acai advantage bberries beloved bop beloved only lucky bberries.
37	amazon acai berry weight loss expectation acai berry amazon named super fruit cl	Amazone acai berry loss of weight waiting acai berries amazone named super fruit clazone.	Amazone acai berry weight loss waiting acai amazone berries named super fruit clazone.	Amazone acai berry weight loss expectation acai amazone berries named super fruit clazone.
37	best lose weight acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction	Increase your weight loss by reducing your weight by reducing your weight.	Better lose weight acai baies weight loss diet plan a healthy weight reduction.	Better lose weight acai baies weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction.
37	acai berry supplement weight loss associated content heard oprah win	Açaa berry is a weight loss supplement associated with the content you want to win.	Açaa berry weight loss supplements associated with content heard oprah win.	Açaa berry supplements of weight loss associated with content heard oprah win.
37	acai berry scam free trial weight loss genius scam associated acai berry supposed	L'apos, a scam from the bay d'apos; Açaï, without a trial, the genius of weight loss; l'apos, a scam associated with the bay d'apos; Açaï, supposed to be a scam from the bay d'apos; Açaï.	Apos bay scam; Açaï without trial, weight loss genius; l&apos bay scam; Açaï supposed to be a bay d&apos scam; Açaï.	L&apos, bay d&apos scam, Açaï without trial, weight loss genius, l&apos, scam associated with bay d' Açaï supposed to be a scam from the bay d' Açaï.
37	weight loss diet plan acai juice equal nutritional claim acai	Dietary allowance for weight-loss, diet, diet, diet, diet, etc.	Dietary diet; acai equals nutrition claim acai acai.	Diets weight-loss plan juices; acai equals nutritional claim acai acai.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction	A diet that slows down to the bay d'apos; Acaï provides a healthy reduction in weight.	Acai's Berry Losing Plan provides for healthy weight reduction.	A healthy weight reduction is part of a diet that slows down to bayberries.
37	healthy weight loss acai berry bamadems acai berry ambria dealcenter	Weight loss-acai bamadems acai bryryry ambria dealcenter.	Weight loss-health acai bamadems acai bryryry ambria dealcenter.	Weight loss-acai bamadems acai bryryry ambria dealcenter health.
37	acai berry health benefit weight loss improvement	Açaï baies santé profit de perte de poids improvement de la perte de poids.	Açaï healthy berries benefit weight loss weight improvement weight loss.	Açaï healthyberries benefit weight loss improvement weight loss.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction number diet plan	It's a good way to reduce your weight, and it's a good way to reduce your weight.	The amaitist diet at bay provides healthy weight reduction.	The amaitist diet with bays and berries makes for a healthy weight reduction.
37	weight loss diet plan south american acai berry currently american lose	Dietetic Plan for South Acai Bay Weight Loss-American currently lose.	Dietetic plan of weight loss South acai bays-American currently losing.	South Bay acai weight loss diet plan South Bay-American currently lose.
37	acai berry capsule review acai berry benefit letspost jone dow acai berry capsule well	The capsule can be used in a variety of ways, such as in the case of ice cream, in the case of ice cream, in the case of ice cream, in the case of ice cream.	Seed-capsing review; acai bays acai d' acai bays provide a good display of the capsule d' acai joneow dai bays acai.	Apos capsule review; acai bay acai joneow dai bay acai pods are well-advertised by acai bay pods.
37	weight loss diet plan acai berry antioxidant popular supplement include antioxidant rich acai berry	Anti-oxidant plan thinning d&apos berries; acai supplement popular include anti-oxidant rich d&apos berries; acai rich anti-oxidants.	Slimming diet antioxidant planberries d' acai popular supplement includes rich d&apos berries; antioxidant rich acai.	Slimming antioxidant plan d&apos berries; acai popular supplement include antioxidant rich d&apos berries; acai rich in antioxidants.
37	weight loss diet plan acai berry antioxidant popular supplement include antioxidant rich acai berry	Anti-oxidant plan thinning d&apos berries; acai supplement popular include anti-oxidant rich d&apos berries; acai rich anti-oxidants.	Slimming diet antioxidant planberries d' acai popular supplement includes rich d&apos berries; antioxidant rich acai.	Slimming antioxidant plan d&apos berries; acai popular supplement include antioxidant rich d&apos berries; acai rich in antioxidants.
37	madwrite weight loss minimal technique numerous acai berry pulp diet benefit leave conse	Minimal techniques for weight loss Madwrite has many dietary advantages of d&apos berry pulp; acai leaves the result.	Minimal technique of weight loss Madwrite many dietary advantages of pulp of d&apos berries; acai leave the result.	Minimum techniques of madwrite weight loss many dietary advantages of d&apos berry pulp; acai leave the result.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry adi news acai berry promote weight loss imp	Weight loss dietary plan adi berries d' healthy new berries d' promotion of weight loss impedes weight loss.	Dietetic plan of weight loss adi berries d' healthy acai new berries d' promotion of weight loss impedes weight loss.	Dietary plan of weight loss adi berries d' healthy acai new berries d' acai promote weight loss impulse weight loss.
37	acai berry fact lose weight acai berry lose super online deal net lfittips	Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa	Acaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa	Acaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa
37	acai berry effective weight loss pill current health article tafdropdn blue acai berry effective	Acai Berry Effective Weight Loss Pill current acai berry blue tafdropdn health product effective tafdropdn.	Effective weight loss pill acai berry current health item tafdropdn blue acai berry effective tafdropdn.	Effective weight loss pill acai berry current health article tafdropdn blue acai berry effective tafdropdn.
37	acai berry chocolate tasting weight loss diet plan demand acai berry eventually lead	Açaa Chocolate Lifestyle Weight Loss Tasting Regime berries possibly require lead acai.	Açaa chocolate berries diet weight loss tasting diets requires possibly lead acai berries.	Açaa bberries chocolate tasting weight loss diet requires possibly lead acai berries.
37	random concept explicit acai berry weight full excitement	Random concept explicitly acai full-weight excitation berry.	Random concept explicitly acai berry full weight excitation.	Exact random concept acai berry full weight excitation.
37	acai berry diet linda acai berry diet acai berry weightcrushers ambria dealcenter	Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa	Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa	Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa
37	weight loss diet plan acai juice equal nutritional claim acai	Dietary allowance for weight-loss, diet, diet, diet, diet, etc.	Dietary diet; acai equals nutrition claim acai acai.	Diets weight-loss plan juices; acai equals nutritional claim acai acai.
37	losing weight best acai berry benefit report elmerfizz people reduce fat	Losing weight Best acai berries profits elmerfizz people ratio reduces fat.	Losing Weight Best Benefit acai berries ratio elmerfizz people reduce fats.	Losing weight Best profit acai berries ratio elmerfizz people reduce fats.
37	madwrite acai berry colon cleansing diet visit post acai fruit deto	Acwrite acai colon berry-cleaning diet visits-acai post fruit.	The acai colon madwrite berry-cleaning diet comes to visit acai-post fruit.	The cleaning regime with the berries of madwrite acai colon visits the fruits of post-acai.
37	acai berry diet weight loss include increase body energy level increased immune system	The weight loss of the diet of the bay d'apos; includes an increase in the level of body energy, an increase in the immune system.	Weight loss in the bay diet includes an increase in body energy levels, and an increase in the immune system.	Loss of weight in the diet of bay berries includes increased body energy levels, increased immune system.
37	acai berry diet side effect lose weight fast acai berry diet side effe	It is also important to keep in mind that there is a risk to the health and safety of Canadians.	L' side effect of acai berry diet loses weight l' side effect of fast diet acai berry.	Lapos; acai berry diet side effect loses weight lapos; acai berry fast diet side effect.
37	acai berry chocolate tasting weight loss diet plan adi news scientifically prov	Açaï chocolate with tasting berries and weight loss diets dietary plan scientifically new prov.	Chocolate acai tasting tasting berries diet weight loss dietary plan scientifically new prov.	Chocolate acai with tasting berries weight loss diets dietary plan adi news scientifically prov.
37	losing excess weight amazon acai berry weight loss people overweight obe	Excessive weight loss Amazon acai berry people are losing weight ob oboe oboe oboe obe obe obe obe obe obe obe obe obe obe obe obe weight.	Excessive weight loss Amazon acai berry weight loss obe ob obe obe obe obe obe obe obe obe weight loss.	Excessive weight loss Amazon acai berry weight loss people ob obe obe obe obe obe obe obe obe obe obe obe weight.
37	acai berry weight loss formula program flush pound lose weight free bottle	Weight-loss program for d&apos berries, flush, weight-lossless bottle.	Weight loss program for d&apos berries; açaï, flush, bottle without weight loss.	D&apos berry weight loss program; açaï, flush, bottle without weight loss.
37	top weight loss pill include acai berry purchased	Weight-loss pills include purchased berries.	The weight-loss pill includes berries that have been purchased.	The pill for weight loss includes the berries d'apos; açaï purchased.
37	acai berry effective weight loss health benefit article will explain aca	It is also important to note that there are many factors that influence the health of Canadians.	The article on the health benefits of diabetes will explain the health benefits of diabetes.	The health benefits article will explain the benefits of apo; aca for health.
37	acai berry weight loss confusing helen arsenault january talk mogul op	The loss of weight of the bay d'apos caused Helen Arsenault to be confused in January.	Helen Arsenault was confused by the weight loss of the d'apos berries in January.	The weight loss of the d'apos berries confused Helen Arsenault in January.
37	acai berry improve health lose weight acai acai berry fruit	Berries are improving health, berries are losing weight, and berries are losing fruit.	The berries d' açaï improve health, lose weight, and the fruits of the berries d' açaï decrease.	Berries improve health, weight falls, and fruits from berries decrease.
37	amazon acai berry weight loss expectation acai berry amazon named super fruit cl	Amazone acai berry loss of weight waiting acai berries amazone named super fruit clazone.	Amazone acai berry weight loss waiting acai amazone berries named super fruit clazone.	Amazone acai berry weight loss expectation acai amazone berries named super fruit clazone.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry adi news acai berry promote weight loss imp	Weight loss dietary plan adi berries d' healthy new berries d' promotion of weight loss impedes weight loss.	Dietetic plan of weight loss adi berries d' healthy acai new berries d' promotion of weight loss impedes weight loss.	Dietary plan of weight loss adi berries d' healthy acai new berries d' acai promote weight loss impulse weight loss.
37	acai berry acai diet info acai berry detox product curious acai berry	Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa	Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa	Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa
37	amazon rain forest safe acai berry diet power attributed	Amazon Rainforest, acai-safe bays with food allocation power.	Amazon rainforest safe acai bays diets allocated power.	Rain forest Amazon safe acai bays dietary allocated power.
37	weight loss acai berry bitcomet blog acai berry diet acai diet acai bromelain weight loss acai pow	Bitcomet acai berry weight loss blog acai baies diet acai bromelain acai weight loss pow acai pow acai pow.	Bitcomet acai berry weight loss blog acai bays acai diet acai bromelain diet acai weight loss acai pow acai pow.	Bitcomet acai berry weight loss acai bberries acai diet acai bromelain weight loss acai pow acai pow.
37	reading acai berry weight loss diet plan cardiovascular health diet weight loss	You may also want to check your diet to see if it's safe to eat.	Read acai bberries diet weight loss Cardiovascular fitness plan diet weight loss.	Read acai baies diet weight loss Cardiovascular health plan diet weight loss diet.
37	acai berry product real wait loss brand question fezangee acai berry pro	Açai produção de bays d'apos; realmente question mark d'attente fezangee acções de bays d'apos; fezangee.	Açai produces dapos bays; real expectation mark mark issue fezangee acai pro bays d' waiting fezangee.	Açai produce dapos berries; real expectation mark issue of loss fezangee acai pro bays; waiting fezangee.
37	acai berry medicine food acai berry benefit northcountry boypost ron duckett acai berry	It's a place where you can enjoy the beauty of the sea, the beauty of the sea, the beauty of the sea, the beauty of the sea and the beauty of the sea.	Berries, berries, food, berries, aça, let's take advantage of North Boypost, ron duckett acai, bays d' açaï.	Berries, berries, food, bayberries, aça, northern boypost, ron duckett acai, bay d' açaï.
37	essential weight loss diet pill guide best acai berry diet help promoting	Essential weight-loss pills guide the best bay diets; açaï.	The essential weight-loss pill guides the best diet to d'apos berries; açaï.	The essential diet pill will guide you to the best diet in the bay.
37	acai berry best healty fruit pinoy pen article acai create originates acai berry	Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa	Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa	Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa
37	leanspa acai berry diet fact fiction acai berry weight loss fad buyer	Leanspa acai diet à la baie Facts Fiction acai baies loss of weight fad buyer fad.	Leanspa acai diet bays Fiction Facts acai bays weight loss fad purchaser fad.	Leanspa acai bays Fiction Facts acai bays weight loss fad buyer fad.
37	thin link burn fat	The fine-grained links will burn the burnt fat.	Fine links burn burned fat.	Fine links burn fat that burns.
37	acai berry acai berry juice weight loss	Açai berries Açai berries Loss of weight of berry juice.	Azai berries Azai berries Weight loss of berry juice.	Açai berries Azai berries Berries berry juice weight loss.
37	weight loss diet plan south american acai berry currently american lose	Dietetic Plan for South Acai Bay Weight Loss-American currently lose.	Dietetic plan of weight loss South acai bays-American currently losing.	South Bay acai weight loss diet plan South Bay-American currently lose.
37	weight loss diet plan acai juice equal nutritional acai berry hit health	A weight-loss diet based on Dapos juices; a diet based on Dapos berries; and health benefits.	A weight-loss diet based on apple juice; equal nutritional benefits based on potato berries; health benefits.	Dapo juice-based diet; equal nutritional acai based on potato berries; acai affects health.
37	acai berry diet side effect lose weight fast acai berry diet side effe	It is also important to keep in mind that there is a risk to the health and safety of Canadians.	L' side effect of acai berry diet loses weight l' side effect of fast diet acai berry.	Lapos; acai berry diet side effect loses weight lapos; acai berry fast diet side effect.
37	lose weight world effective nutrition acai weight loss acai berry weight loss	Effective global weight loss acai weight loss acai weight acay ber berries weight loss berries.	Global weight loss effective nutrition acai weight loss acai weight loss acai ber berries weight loss berries.	Loss of weight worldwide effective nutrition acai weight loss acai weight loss bay berries.
37	loss weight acai berry capsule benefit	Loss of weight in the acai berry capsule.	Weight loss acai berry capsule profit.	Loss of weight acai berry capsule profit.
37	acai berry chocolate tasting weight loss diet plan adi news scientifically prov	Açaï chocolate with tasting berries and weight loss diets dietary plan scientifically new prov.	Chocolate acai tasting tasting berries diet weight loss dietary plan scientifically new prov.	Chocolate acai with tasting berries weight loss diets dietary plan adi news scientifically prov.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction number diet plan	It's a good way to reduce your weight, and it's a good way to reduce your weight.	The amaitist diet at bay provides healthy weight reduction.	The amaitist diet with bays and berries makes for a healthy weight reduction.
37	acai berry social bookmarking net acai berry latest weight loss buy acai berry best colon cleanse	Addition of d' a social label to d&apos berries; acai latest bay weight loss; acai Best colon cleansing of d&apos berries; acai.	Addition of d' a brand name for d&apos berries; acai The last weight loss of d&apos berries; acai The best colon cleansing of d&apos berries; acai.	Addition of a brand-social page to the bays; acai The latest weight loss of the bays; acai The best colon cleansing of the bays; acai.
37	real acai berry supplement deal rapid fast weight loss well ordered acai berry blast	It's also a great way to help you keep your weight down and keep your weight down.	The real dapos berry supplements allow you to lose weight quickly and in an orderly fashion.	The real supplements to the bays d'apos; açaï allow a fast and well ordered loss of weight.
37	acacia berry diet acacia berry acai weight loss hcg diet plan happened account parti	The acacia berry acacia berry acry weight loss diet hcg plan s&apos is part of the diet.	The acacia berry acacia berry diet acry acry weight loss hcg plan s' is produced taking into account part.	The diet acacia berry acacia berry acry weight loss hcg plan s' is produced taking into account part.
37	ready thin ready don burn fat	Ready-made, ready-made, burns fat.	Preparing thoroughly does burn fat.	You know, getting ready doesn't burn fat.
37	secret natural weight loss food acai berry benefit	Loss of natural weight is a secret to acai food and berries.	Natural weight loss secret acai food benefit berries.	Loss of natural weight secret food acai profit berries.
37	told thin ready burn fat	Said thin, ready, burnt fat.	Said thin fat ready, burnt fat.	Said thin ready burn fat.
37	told trim fat ready check burn fat	Prepare the fat to check the fat that has been burned.	Preparate fat ready to check for fat burn.	Set fat ready check the burnt fat.
37	acai berry eating regimen review lose lb rapid zwak org info acai berry benefit yo	Examination of the diet of dried berries; fast loss of information on profitable berries.	We are looking at the diets of bay berries and bays; we are rapidly losing information on the benefit of bay berries.	L'apos; examination of the diet of the berries d'apos; quickly loses lb rapid or information acai profit yo berries.
37	weight loss diet plan acai juice equal nutritional claim acai	Dietary allowance for weight-loss, diet, diet, diet, diet, etc.	Dietary diet; acai equals nutrition claim acai acai.	Diets weight-loss plan juices; acai equals nutritional claim acai acai.
37	swanson vitamin review weight review acai berry buy calorie control weight swanson vitam	Swanson Vitamin Review Critical Weight acai berries buy control of Swanson Vitamin Swanson Calorie weight.	Swanson vitamin review critical weight acai berries buy control of calorie Swanson vitamin Swanson weight.	Swanson vitamin review acai berries critical weight buy Swanson weight calorie control Swanson vitamin weight.
37	acai berry juice drinking weight loss juice will help	Berry juices; if you drink weight-loss juices, you may be able to help.	Juice from potato berries; drinking weight-loss juice will help.	Softberry juice; drinking weight loss juice will help.
37	reason acai berry weight loss diet case half popula	This is why half of the population suffers from weight loss in the bay diet.	This is why the bay diet's weight loss affects half of the population.	That's why the weight loss of the bay diet affects half of the population.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry	Dietary plan Dietary plan Dietary plan Dietary plan Dietary plan Diet diet.	Slimming Diet Plan Healthy living acai berry.	Slimming diet plan Healthy acai berry lifestyle.
37	acai berry detox scam acai berry detox scam rachel weight loss blog acai weight loss experien	Acai berry detox acai berry detox scam rachel blog weight loss acai weight loss experience acai weight loss experience.	Acai berry detox acai berry detox scam rachel weight loss blog acai weight loss experience acai weight loss experience.	Acai berry detox scam acai berry detox scam rachel weight loss blog acai weight loss experience acai weight loss experience.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction number diet plan advertised sugge	Açai weight-loss regimen of the Healthy Weight Reduction Plan Blueberry Regime Regime.	Acaai weight-loss diet of the bay Health weight-loss plan number diets advertised sugge.	Açai weight loss diet berries health weight reduction plan number diets advertised sugge.
37	acai berry diet sexy acai berry scam warning acai berry diet	Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa	Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa	Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa
37	burn pound today day check burn fat	Burn the book today; oil, check the burnt fat.	Burn the pound today; oily, check for burnt grease.	Burn book today; oil, check burn fat.
37	lt gt acai berry lt gt weight loss side effect improvement	Gt acai berry gt to improve the quality of your body.	Gt acai berry gt improved weight loss side effects.	Gt acai berry gt weight loss side effects improved.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry people sticking	Weight-loss plan Healthy acai berry lifestyle people glue people together.	Dieting Plan Healthy living acai berry people sticking to people's necks.	Dieting plan Healthy living acai berry people sticking to people.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction number diet plan	It's a good way to reduce your weight, and it's a good way to reduce your weight.	The amaitist diet at bay provides healthy weight reduction.	The amaitist diet with bays and berries makes for a healthy weight reduction.
37	pure acai berry thorough article pure acai berry buy pure acai berry acai berry extracteveryone se	Dapos berries; dapos berries pure article; can buy dapos berries; dapos berries pure acai; dapos berries; can extract everyone.	D'apos berries; acai pure article baies d'apos; acai buy baies d'apos; acai pure baies d'apos; acai baies d' acai extracte all the others.	Dapos berries; pure pure article dapos berries; can buy dapos berries; pure acai dapos berries; acai dapos berries; can extract everyone.
37	exactly acai berry diet pill wrk yahoo answer acai berry diet pill	The diet pill acai berry wrk yahoo exactly respond to the diet pill acai berry.	The diet pill exactly acai berry wrk yahoo meet the diet pill acai berry.	The diet pill exactly acai berry wrk yahoo meet acai berry diet pill.
37	acai berry work lose weight lose weight heard acai berry pe	Work on d'apos bays is losing weight.	The work on the bay d'apos; açaï loses weight.	The weight of the work on the d'apos bays is being reduced.
37	acai berry cena austin meyer acai berry weight loss acai berry thin acai berry thin ra acai berry thin frum	Austin meyer berry acai berry weight loss fine acai berry fine acai berry fine frum berry.	Cena austin meyer acai berry weight loss acai berry fine acai berry fine acai berry fine frum frum.	Acai berry cena austin meyer acai berry weight loss acai berry fine acai berry fine acai berry fine frum frum.
37	acai berry work reading help understand acai berry work acai berry	Reading the d&apos bays helps you understand the d&apos bays.	The reading of the d&apos berries helps to understand the work of the d&apos berries.	The d&apos berries are read to help understand the work of d&apos berries.
37	told skinny today day burn fat	J&apos, a.k.a., a.k.a., a.k.a.	J&apos, said thin today; oil day to burn day after day.	J&apos, thin today, fat day to burn day after day.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry people sticking	Weight-loss plan Healthy acai berry lifestyle people glue people together.	Dieting Plan Healthy living acai berry people sticking to people's necks.	Dieting plan Healthy living acai berry people sticking to people.
37	amazon acai berry weight loss expectation acai berry amazon named super fruit cl	Amazone acai berry loss of weight waiting acai berries amazone named super fruit clazone.	Amazone acai berry weight loss waiting acai amazone berries named super fruit clazone.	Amazone acai berry weight loss expectation acai amazone berries named super fruit clazone.
37	acai berry juice diet regime operate excess weight heading answer question soo	The Soo Soo Soo question is answered by using too much weight in the diet of d&apos berry juice.	The diet of d&apos berry juice products uses excess weight to answer the Soo Soo question.	Berry juice diet d&apos uses excess weight to answer Soo Soo question.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry adi news acai berry promote weight loss imp	Weight loss dietary plan adi berries d' healthy new berries d' promotion of weight loss impedes weight loss.	Dietetic plan of weight loss adi berries d' healthy acai new berries d' promotion of weight loss impedes weight loss.	Dietary plan of weight loss adi berries d' healthy acai new berries d' acai promote weight loss impulse weight loss.
37	acai berry weight loss confusing industry analyst acai berry directly re	Apos Bay Weight Loss; Causal, Confusing to L&apos Analyst; D&apos Bay Industry; Acai.	Weight loss of potato berries; cause confusion for growers; analyst; bay industry; acai.	Weight loss of potato berries; Causal, confusing for growers; potato analyst; potato berry industry; acai.
37	food burn belly fat don	Food burns the fat from Don's belly.	The food burns the fat off Don's belly.	The food burns Don's belly fat.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan cardiovascular health diet weight loss shedd	Cardiovascular health plan diet weight-loss diet.	Acaa weight-loss diet cardiovascular health diet weight-loss.	Acaa diet weight-loss plan cardiovascular health diet weight-loss diet.
37	heard acai berry diet acai berry heard diet purchasing	It is not a good idea to buy food from a restaurant, but it is a good idea to do so.	J&apos heard that d&apos berries açaï diet berries d&apos açaï hear dietary shopping.	J&apos heard that d&apos berries açaï diet bays d' açaï heard dietary shopping.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction number diet plan	It's a good way to reduce your weight, and it's a good way to reduce your weight.	The amaitist diet at bay provides healthy weight reduction.	The amaitist diet with bays and berries makes for a healthy weight reduction.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry	Dietary plan Dietary plan Dietary plan Dietary plan Dietary plan Diet diet.	Slimming Diet Plan Healthy living acai berry.	Slimming diet plan Healthy acai berry lifestyle.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction	A diet that slows down to the bay d'apos; Acaï provides a healthy reduction in weight.	Acai's Berry Losing Plan provides for healthy weight reduction.	A healthy weight reduction is part of a diet that slows down to bayberries.
37	acai year weight loss diet plan acai berry purplish fruit harvested palm tree	L'est-à-la-vie de l'île de l'Est; l'année de l'apos; c'est-à-la-vie de l'île de l'Est; c'est-à-vie.	Diet plan of weight loss of the year of the plants; apple acai harvested with purple fruits from the berries of the plants; acai.	Weight-loss diet plan; year of birth; apple fruit harvested with purple berries; acai.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction	A diet that slows down to the bay d'apos; Acaï provides a healthy reduction in weight.	Acai's Berry Losing Plan provides for healthy weight reduction.	A healthy weight reduction is part of a diet that slows down to bayberries.
37	acai berry chocolate tasting weight loss diet plan demand acai berry eventually lead	Açaa Chocolate Lifestyle Weight Loss Tasting Regime berries possibly require lead acai.	Açaa chocolate berries diet weight loss tasting diets requires possibly lead acai berries.	Açaa bberries chocolate tasting weight loss diet requires possibly lead acai berries.
37	buy acai berry cicerone superiority lfittips	Buy your own berry cicerone superiority ifittips superiority.	Buy acai berry cicerone superiority ifittips superiority.	Buy acai berry cicerone superiority ifittips.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry	Dietary plan Dietary plan Dietary plan Dietary plan Dietary plan Diet diet.	Slimming Diet Plan Healthy living acai berry.	Slimming diet plan Healthy acai berry lifestyle.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry adi news acai berry promote weight loss imp	Weight loss dietary plan adi berries d' healthy new berries d' promotion of weight loss impedes weight loss.	Dietetic plan of weight loss adi berries d' healthy acai new berries d' promotion of weight loss impedes weight loss.	Dietary plan of weight loss adi berries d' healthy acai new berries d' acai promote weight loss impulse weight loss.
37	acai berry powder content health weight loss hard figure	It's a great way to make a difference in the world.	Powdered yogurt and yogurt; acai for health.	D&apos berry powder content; acai pour la santé.
37	acai berry nutrient power weight loss diet plan acai berry popularity expanded rain	Diet Plan for Nutritional Weight Loss of Daposberries; açaï has increased rainfall.	Dairy Berry Nutritional Weight Loss Plan; açaï The popularity of potato berries has increased the rain.	Dietary plan for nutrient weight loss of d'apos berries; açaï The popularity of d'apos berries has increased rain.
37	goodbye pound acai berry weight loss pill acai ultima making larg	It's a good idea to take a few minutes to relax and enjoy the sunshine.	Bye-bye, weight-loss pills for daisies and berries; acai ultima make great.	Bye weight loss pill for d&apos berries; acai ultima make great.
37	weight loss acai berry diet improvement acai berry diet individual large amount accept	Loss of weight acai bberries improve the diet acai bays individual diet large quantity accept.	Loss of weight acai bays diet improvement acai bals large individual diet accept.	Weight loss acai bberries diet improvement acai bberries individual diet large amount accept.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction	A diet that slows down to the bay d'apos; Acaï provides a healthy reduction in weight.	Acai's Berry Losing Plan provides for healthy weight reduction.	A healthy weight reduction is part of a diet that slows down to bayberries.
38	venezuela chavez mark year power	Venezuela has been marking the year of power.	Venezuela marked the year of power.	Venezuela marked the year of power.
38	venezuela chavez reelection written caracas venezuelan president hugo chavez sunday	Venezuela chavez written re-election caracas Venezuelan president hugo chavez on Sunday.	Venezuela chavez re-election written caracas Venezuelan president hugo chavez Sunday.	Venezuela chavez re-election written caracas venezuelan president hugo chavez Sunday.
38	chavez mark year office venezuelan president hugo chavez mark year power promising news	Chavez Mark a Venezuelan bureau president, hugo chavez mark a power that promises news.	Chavez mark a Venezuelan office president hugo chavez mark a power promising news.	Chavez mark a Venezuelan office president hugo chavez mark a power promising news.
38	hugochavez venezuelan commemorate democracy day january rebelleft	Chuchochavez Venezuelan commemorate the Day of Democracy Rebelft January rebellft January.	Chuchochavez Venezuelan commemorate the day of the democracy rebellef January rebellft January.	Come hugochavez comeuelen commemorate the day of democracy January rebellft rebellft January.
38	venezuela chavez threatens seize bank efe president hugo chavez threatened expropriate venezuelan	Venezuela Chavez is threatening to foreclose on bank president Hugo Chavez, threatening to expropriate Venezuela.	Venezuela Chavez threatens to seize the president of the bank Hugo Chavez threatens to expropriate Venezuela.	Venezuela Chavez threatens to seize bank president Hugo Chavez threatens to expropriate Venezuela.
38	golf venezuelan president hugo chavez enemy golf venezuelan president hugo chavez	Venezuelan golf president hugo chavez Venezuelan golf enemy hugo chavez.	Venezuelan golf president hugo chavez Venezuelan golf enemy president hugo chavez.	Venezuelan golf president hugo chavez enemy golf Venezuelan president hugo chavez.
38	chavez mark year office venezuelan president hugo chavez mark year power promising press	Chavez Mark a Venezuelan bureau president, hugo chavez mark a power that promises the press.	Chavez mark a Venezuelan office president hugo chavez mark a power promising the press.	Chavez mark a Venezuelan office president hugo chavez mark a promising press power.
38	hugo chavez apologizes venezuelan people ahead election	Hugo Chavez would like to apologize to the Venezuelan people for the upcoming elections.	Chavez apologizes to the Venezuelan people for the upcoming elections.	And hugo chavez apologizes to the Venezuelan people for the upcoming elections.
38	venezuela chavez enemy golf	Venezuela Chavez Enemy golf.	Venezuela Chavez enemy golf.	Venezuela Chavez enemy golf course.
38	right group claim chavez judiciary foe	The right-wing group claims the apos; the criminal enemy chavez.	The right-wing group has a claim to the apos; the criminal enemy has fallen.	The right group claims the apos; judicial enemy chavez.
38	interview venezuela sweetheart champion chavez venezuelan president hugo chavez speaks meeting	Interview come love champion chavez chavez Venezuelan president hugo chavez talk meeting.	Interview come love champion chavez venezuelan president hugo chavez talk meeting.	Interview come love champion chavez venezuelan president hugo chavez talk meeting.
39	winter storm hit harder chicago toronto	Chicago Toronto was hit hardest by the winter storm.	The storm hit the city of Chicago in the winter.	The winter storm hit Chicago Toronto hardest.
39	comed crew restoring power customer chicago	Chicago Electrical Customer Service.	Electrical repair crew Chicago.	Apo restoration crew; Chicago customer electricity.
39	national guard called chicago snow storm woow snow chill people	It's called the Chicago snowstorm, and it's called the snow chill people.	National Guard called the Chicago snowstorm woow snow chill people.	National guard called Chicago snow chill people woow snowstorm.
39	city regional service brace storm bracing approaching blizzard ldquo historic proportion rdquo city	The city's regional service prepares for the storms at the beginning of the year; approaches to the blizzard.	The regional service of the city prepares the storms to the west; approach of the blizzard ldquo historical proportion rdquo city.	The city's regional service prepares storms at home; approaching blizzard ldquo historical proportion rdquo city.
39	save poptarts tmr chicago foot snow hour forecaster	Save Poptarts from the Chicago Snow Hour Forecaster.	Save the poptarts of the Chicago snowmobile forecaster.	Save the forecaster's poptarts from Chicago's snow time.
39	crazy lake shore drive downtown chicago shut	The entire lakefront road leading to downtown Chicago has been closed.	The lakeside road to downtown Chicago is closed.	The road down the lake to downtown Chicago is closed.
39	foxchicago blizzard trap driver lsd hour	Foxchicago blizzard blizzard driver trap lsd hour.	Foxchicago blizzard trap driver lsd hour.	Foxchicago blizzard trap driver lsd hour.
39	chicago city sneer snow brought chicago reuters chicago city sn	Chicago City railler bring snow to Chicago Reuters Chicago city railler Chicago.	Chicago City mocking snow brought Chicago Reuters Chicago city sn Chicago.	Chicago city taunts snow brought Chicago Reuters Chicago city sn Chicago.
39	mayor closed chicago public school	Chicago Public School has been shut down by the mayor.	The mayor's closed down the public school in Chicago.	The mayor closed down the public school in Chicago.
39	foot snow hour chicago latest blizzard warning don travel stay indoors chicago breaking news	Canadian soldiers take part in Calgary Stampede Calgary, AB – Soldiers from 12e Régiment Blindé du Canada showcase Quebec ́s 400th anniversary.	Chicago snow time Last blizzard warning not to travel to the interior of Chicago Latest news.	Chicago's Snow Hour Forecast The latest blizzard warning doesn't travel to Chicago's interior.
39	lake shore drive closed blizzard	Driving on the shore of Lake Blizzard closed blizzard.	Driving along Blizzard Lake shoreline closed blizzard blizzard.	Driving on shore of closed blizzard Lake.
39	chicago foot snow hour bout blizzard heading hater	Chicago soccer soccer match hour blizzard heading to the top of the league.	Chicago football snow hour blizzard match heading out of hate.	Chicago soccer snow hour match blizzard heading to hateful.
39	timesxemail chicago warned brace blizzard barrelling chicago emergency official offe	Warning message from Chicago to Blizzard Blizzard Barricading the Apos; Chicago E.R. Officer.	Message from Chicago notifying Blizzard Blizzard Barricading the Apos; Chicago E.R. Officer.	Chicago-based voice mail alerting Blizzard Blizzard Barricading the Apostles; Chicago-based E.R.O.
39	pm latest chicago free blizzard update flight cancelled storm	The last free flight from Chicago to the blizzard bay has canceled the storm.	The last free flight from Chicago to the blizzard canceled the storm.	The last free blizzard flight from Chicago canceled the storm.
39	chicago blizzard closed lake shore drive entire length notice	Chicago Blizzard, closed shoreline of the lake, will conduct all the length notice.	Chicago Blizzard closed shore of the lake conducting all notice length.	Chicago Blizzard closed lake bank conduct the entire length notice.
39	blizzard break chicago snow record inch expected	Blizzard broke the Chicago snow record.	That blizzard broke the Chicago snow record.	The blizzard broke the snow record in Chicago.
39	chicago fire department snow mobile reach folk stranded lake shore drive blizzard	The Chicago Fire Department snowfalls to the blizzards on the shores of the lake.	The Chicago Fire Department snowfalls to the blizzards on the shores of the lake.	The snow from the Chicago Fire Department reaches as far as the blizzards on the shores of the lake.
39	chicago lake shore drive death trap closed stranded car blizzard	Car blizzard shut down on Lake Chicago shore.	Car blizzard closed on the Lake of Chicago shore.	Closed-up car blizzard on the shores of Lake Chicago.
39	lake shore drive closed chicago blizzard	Closed Lake Drive Chicago blizzard closed.	Lake Drive closed Chicago blizzard closed.	Lakefront drive closed Chicago blizzard closed.
40	aurobindo pharma receives usfda approval levofloxacin tablet news	Aurobindo Pharma obtains approval from Ufda for new information on the use of levofloxacin tablets.	Aurobindo Pharma obtains approval from l' Ufda for news of the levofloxacin tablets.	Aurobindo Pharma obtains approval from Ufda for levofloxacin tablet news.
40	fda approves drug reduce risk preterm birth risk pregnant woman silver spring md feb	The FDA approves a drug that reduces the risk of pregnancy-induced premature birth.	The FDA approves a drug that reduces the risk of pre-term birth and the risk of premature birth in pregnant women.	FDA approves a drug that reduces the risk of preterm birth in pregnant women.
40	fda approves rituxan maintenance follicular lymphoma chemo	The FDA approves chemo for the treatment of follicular lymphoma; maintenance of rituxan.	FDA approves the chemo for follicular lymphoma d' rituxan maintenance.	FDA approves rituxan maintenance chemo for follicular lymphoma.
40	fda ok viibryd treat depression fda approved drug called viibryd treat adult major depressiv	Fda ok viibryd treat the fda depression approved medication called viibryd treat major adult depressive disorder.	Fda ok viibryd treat the approved fda depressive medication called viibryd treat adult major depressive disorder.	Fda ok viibryd treat fda approved depression drug called viibryd treat adult major depressive.
40	so sleep update fda clear pgxhealth depressive disorder drug viibryd health treatment	So, sleep update clear fda depressive disorder pgxhealth drug viibryd health treatment.	So, um, sleep update fda clear depressive disorder pgxhealth drug viibryd health care.	So, sleep update fda clear depressive disorder pgxhealth drug viibryd health treatment.
40	fda approves pharma preterm birth drug embattled drugmaker pharmaceutical reported health reg	The FDA approves the health plan reported by the manufacturer of the drug product for the purpose of preventing premature delivery in a pharmacy.	The FDA approves the drug manufacturer's reported health plan for pre-term delivery at pharmacies.	The FDA approves the drug manufacturer's reported health plan for preterm delivery in pharmacies.
40	viibryd approved treat depression adult psych central news	Viibryd has approved the treatment of adult psychic and central information depression.	Viibryd has approved the treatment of depression of adult psychic central information.	Viibryd approved the treatment of adult psychic depression central information.
40	fda approves drug treat depression	FDA has approved the drug treatment of depression.	Well, the FDA approves the drug treatment for depression.	FDA approves drug treatment for depression.
40	fda approved injectable drug called makena reduce risk preterm delivery week	The FDA-approved injectable drug, called makena, reduces the risk of the first week of pregnancy; premature delivery.	The FDA-approved injectable drug called makena reduces the risk of the week of birth; premature delivery.	The FDA-approved injectable drug called makena reduces the risk of preterm birth.
40	fda approves premature birth drug philadelphia inquirer share friend top news health	FDA Approves Preterm Birth Drug (PBD) Philadelphia inquire to share friends of first-time health news.	FDA approves drug for premature births Philadelphia inquire share friend of first health news.	FDA approves premature birth drug Philadelphia inquire share friend of first health news.
40	fda approves drug reduce risk premature birth time	The FDA will approve a drug that reduces the risk of premature birth.	FDA approves a drug that reduces the risk of premature birth.	A drug that reduces the risk of premature birth is FDA approved.
40	fda approves drug prevent premature birth yahoo share friend health smoking sto	FDA Approves Preterm Birth Prevention Drugs yahoo Share Healthy Friends Smoking Sto.	FDA approves preterm birth prevention (PB) drugs yahoo share health friends sto smokers.	The FDA approves drugs for the prevention of premature birth yahoo share health friends sto smokers.
40	fda approves drug treat nerve pain shingle	FDA approves drugs for the treatment of nerve pain.	Well, the FDA approves drugs to treat nerve pain.	FDA approves drugs to treat nerve pain.
40	myl mylan awarded fda approval generic protonix delayed release tablet gerd	Myl mylan obtained generic protonix germ-delayed-release tablet fda approval.	Myl mylan has obtained the following approval: generic protonix tablet delayed release gerd.	Myl mylan obtained the epos; generic protonix gilded delayed release tablet fda approval.
40	npr fda approves drug prevent preterm birth	Drugs that prevent premature births are approved by the npr fda.	The npr fda approves drugs that will prevent premature births.	The npr fda approves preterm birth prevention drugs.
40	pharma news fda clear pgxhealth depressive disorder drug viibryd	Pharmaceutical info clear depressive disorder pgxhealth drug viibryd.	Pharmaceutical info fda clear depressive disorder pgxhealth drug viibryd.	Pharmaceutical info fda clear pgxhealth drug viibryd depressive disorder.
40	bioportfolio news fda approves drug reduce preterm delivery risk pharmaceutical busi bioportfolio news	Biochemical Portfolio News The FDA is endorsing biopharmaceutical portfolio news to reduce the risk of premature delivery.	Biochemical Portfolio News The FDA approves biopharmaceutical portfolio news items to reduce the risk of premature delivery.	Biochemical Portfolio News FDA approves biopharmaceutical portfolio news to reduce early delivery risk.
41	beck rating plummeted	Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re	Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re	Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re
41	glenn beck rating year ago fb	Glenn Beck a year ago.	Glenn Beck, a year ago!	Uh, Glenn Beck, a year ago.
41	sharing neocon robert kagan beck call panic monger	Sharing the Neocon Robert Kagan Beck prompts panic to monger.	Sharing the neocon Robert Kagan Beck calls for monger panic.	Well, sharing the neocon Robert Kagan Beck calls for panic monger.
41	glenn beck post biggest rating drop cable news january fb	It's been a long time since we've been able to do this, but it's been a long time.	Glenn Beckk posted the highest rate of downloads; listen to news from January cable fb.	Glenn Beckk posted the highest take-home rate; listen to January cable news fb.
42	huge outdoor slated feb wft newsfrom trophy elk deer hunt trout ba	D' huge news of trophy trout deer hunting ba.	D' tremendous news from the trophy trout deer hunt ba.	D' huge news from the trophy deer hunt to trout ba.
42	fishing rule federal panel table kevin wadlow annual harvest popular recreational fish	Fishing Rules Federal Panel Table Kevin Wadlow annually harvests a popular harvest of recreational fish.	Fishing Rules Federal Panel Table Kevin Wadlow is a popular annual recreational fish harvester.	Fishing Rules Federal Panel Table Kevin Wadlow harvests popular recreational fish annually.
42	better saltwater fishing general	Best salt-water fishing.	Best saltwater fishing.	Best saltwater fishing in the world.
42	caption contest win ticket gear fly fishing film tour tim romano fly fishing film tour kick	Subtitle Contest @-@titles Win the Fly Fishing Ticket; Fly Fishing Tournament Fly Fishing Tournament Timano Fly Fishing Coup d' Fly Fishing Tour mailing.	Subtitle contest @-@titles win fly-fishing ticket Fly-fishing equipment Fly-fishing tour romano shot d' fly-fishing movie tour sent.	Subcontest @-@titles win the ticket d' fishing equipment to the fly fishing tour of the timano fly fishing film d&apos romano coup d' fly fishing movie tour.
42	prettyman annual fish porn provider coming fly fishing film festival bring subject called	Prettyman, an annual supplier of porno fish to come to the Flyfishing Festival bringing the subject matter known as the so-called topic.	Prettyman, annual porno fish supplier come fly-fishing festival bring the subject matter called topic.	Prettyman, annual porno fish supplier come fly-fishing festival bring subject called topic.
42	sedative free whale fishing	Sedative whaling.	Whaling without sedatives.	Whale fishing without sedatives.
42	cook gun shop offer amp firearm gunsmithing service hunting fishing accessory	They are available in a variety of sizes and sizes, and can be used in a variety of sizes, sizes and sizes.	D'apos stores; firearms for cooks offers a service of d'apos armoury; fishing tackle hunting.	D&apos stores; firearms for cooks offers a service d' armoury d' addendum for hunting fishing accessories.
42	brown trout fishing tip yahoo answer wfnewsi headed alberta july	The board of fishing for brown trout yahoo response has recently been directed to Alberta July alberta news.	The brown trout fishing board yahoo response has recently been directed Alberta July new Alberta.	The brown trout fishing board yahoo response has recently been directed Alberta July alberta news.
42	river monster breede saltwater fishing general fishing fish	River Monster Breede is a saltwater fishing species.	Breede river monster saltwater fishing general fishing fish.	River monster breede saltwater fishing general fishing fish.
42	saltwater fish marine aquarium fish saltwater aquarium	Aquarium for marine fishes; salt water aquarium for marine fishes; salt water aquarium.	Marine fish aquarium; saltwater marine fish aquarium; saltwater aquarium.	Marine fish aquarium; saltwater fish aquarium; saltwater aquarium.
42	info topic fish tank heater aquarium stuff technorati tag aquarium heater aquariu	Information about aquarium aquarium aquarium aquarium aquarium heating technorati tag aquarium.	Information about heating aquarium aquarium aquarium stuff technorati tag aquarium heating aquariu.	Aquarium aquarium heating information aquarium stuff technorati tag aquarium heating aquariu.
42	minnesota week extreme ice fishing rescuer boat save stranded fisherman	Minnesota Week Extreme Ice Fishing Rescueer boat saves a fisherman who is in distress.	Minnesota Week Extreme Ice Fishing Rescue boat saves a stranded fisherman.	Minnesota Week Extreme Ice Fishing Rescue boat saves stranded fisherman.
42	relevance fly fishing rod fly fishing outdoor activity fly fishing seriously exciting fan	Relevance Fly fishing with fishing rods Fly fishing outdoors Fly fishing with a passionate fan.	Relevance Fly fishing with fishing rods Fly fishing outdoors Fly fishing with a seriously exciting fan.	Relevance Fly fishing with fishing rods Fly fishing outdoors Fly fishing seriously exciting fan.
42	trout steelhead fly fishing supply stretched canvas poster steelhead trout image	Rainbow trout-@-@-@-@-sky Rainbow trout-flyfishing-@-@ in sky.	Rainbow trout-in-sky Rainbow trout-in-in-in-in sky.	Rainbow trout-@-@ en-ciel The fly fishing for rainbow trout-en-ciel shows the rainbow trout-en-sky.
42	sedative free whale fishing care news network	Non-sedated whaling information.	Réseau d'apos; information on non-sedative whaling.	Canadian Council on the Status of Endangered Wildlife in Canada.
42	general fishing newscoarse fish today meeting ifi aci angling ireland	The meeting will be held on Wednesday morning at 10 a.m. and will be followed by a press briefing.	General news on the fishing of big fish today; meeting si aci fishing in Ireland.	General big fish fishing news today; today meeting si aci fishing in Ireland.
42	wisconsin fishing report posted	Wisconsin National Fishery Report posted.	View Wisconsin fishing report.	Wisconsin fishing report posted.
42	eu urged overhaul fishing policy	I have been urging him to review his fishing policy.	I urged a review of his fishing policy.	I urged him to review his fishing policy.
42	fish eat complete fishing guide	Fish eat the entire guidebook.	Fish eat the complete fishing guidebook.	The fish eat the complete fishing guide.
42	cabo san lucas cabo san lucas fishing report january early don plan making dinner	Cabo san lucas cabo san lucas report fishing January morning Don plans to prepare dinner.	Cabo san lucas cabo san lucas fishing report Morning January Don plans to prepare dinner.	Cabo san lucas cabo san lucas fishing report Morning Don is planning dinner.
42	check price fly fishing lure ebay store info	Check fly-fishing bait prices.	Check the price of bait for fly fishing.	Check the price of the fly fishing bait.
42	bigger boat albert pujols biggest fish catch cardinal chum reel	The largest ship Albert pujols the largest fish catches the Chum salmon coil cardinal.	The biggest ship Albert pujols the biggest fish catches chum salmon coil cardinal.	Biggest ship Albert pujols biggest fish catches the chum salmon coil cardinal.
42	trout biting tackle read urban phoenix az metro lake fishing trip local park	Plate-trout bite fishing form read the urban azro fishing phoenix of the local metro lake park.	Plate-trout bite fishing form read azro urban fishing phoenix from local metro lake park.	Plate-form of fishing trout bite read the urban phoenix azro fishing trip of the metro lake local park.
42	interesting south indian river fishing report lt lt	Interesting Report on Fisheries in the South of India.	Interesting report on fishing in southern Laos; India.	An interesting report on fishing in southern India.
42	friday time pack week ice fishing check canadian	On Friday, Icefishing Week, Canada's national icefishing season.	Ice fishing week, Canadian fisherman, Friday.	On Friday, ice fishing week, Canadian fisherman.
42	fishing technique fishing maine surf fishing striped bass	Fishing techniques Longline The longline fishery.	Fishing techniques Longline fishing Longline fishing.	Fishing techniques Longline fishing The longline fishery.
42	interested fly fishing guide prague	Fly Fishing Guide Prague interested.	Fly fishing guide for Prague interested.	Interested fly fishing guide Prague.
42	gill net fishing closed early ton rockfish poaching bust capital news service photo kerry davis	Gillnet fishing has closed the early poaching of redfish to the Capital News Source Photo Service Kerry Davis.	Gillnet fishing has closed the early poaching of rockfish to the Kerry Davis photo service.	Gillnet fishing closed early rockfish poaching to the Capital News Source Kerry Davis Photo Service.
42	celebrity gossip fishing madison river montana	Gossip from celebrities fishing in the Madison Montana River, right?	It's just gossip from celebrities fishing in the Madison Montana River.	Celebrity gossip fishing the Madison Montana River.
42	mike iaconelli bass fishing ike hook big bass difficult situation video ratin	Mike Iaconelli Bass fishing Ike hook Big Bass hook rattle difficult video situation.	Mike Iaconelli Bass fishing fishing Ike hook Big Bass situation difficult video ratin.	Mike Iaconelli Bass fishing Ike hook hook Big Bass difficult situation video ratin.
42	fishing tackle box zebco ready tackle telescopic multi combo fishing kit	Zebco Fishing Box ready telescoping multi-combo fishing kit.	Zebco fishing box ready kit for fishing telescopic multi-combo.	Fishing box zebco ready multi-como telescoping fishing kit.
42	indicator point great fall steelhead fishing	Rainbow trout autumn-in-sky.	Great fishing point indicator; rainbow trout autumn-in-sky.	Indicator point great fishing d' autumn rainbow trout-en-sky.
42	wilmington nc inshore winter fishing report	Winter Inshore Report.	Wilmington nc Inshore Winter Fisheries Report.	Wilmington nc A report on the inshore winter fishery.
42	cook trout fresh water fish grilling fish heart healthy recipe cook trout	Cook the trout d' freshwater fish grill heart fish healthy recipe cook the trout.	Cook trout d' freshwater fish grill heart fish healthy recipe cook trout.	Cook d&apos trout; freshwater fish grill fish heart healthy recipe trout cook.
42	catch catfish hand	Grab the fish fingers-chat.	Grab the fish's hand-chat.	Catch hand of fish-cat.
42	blog post tunkwa leighton lake ice fishing report	Tunkwa leighton reports the lake's ice fishing.	Tunkwa leighton blog reports ice fishing in the lake.	The blog tunkwa leighton reports ice fishing in the lake.
42	youghal bridge fished ther time year small cod angling fishing	Youghal Bridge hooked the little cod this year.	Youghal Bridge fished for the little cod on the hook this year.	Youghal Bridge fished for small cod on the line this year.
42	dress winter steelhead fishing	Winter trout fishing-in-sky.	Winter fishing dressed in rainbow trout,-in-sky.	The winter fishing dressed with rainbow trout-in-sky.
42	bass fishing contest android game shuixing casual	Android Shuixing soft-shuixing bass-fishing contests.	Relaxed android shuixing bass fishing contest.	Android shuixing casual android bass fishing contest.
42	complete book fly fishing	A full-on book on fly-fishing.	A full book on fly fishing.	It's a complete book on fly fishing.
42	saltwater deep sea fishing net will full standard fishing virginia seve	The seine nets will be fully standard for fishing virginia seve.	The saltwater offshore fishing net will be fully standard virginia seve fishery.	Offshore saltwater fishing net will be fully standard fishing virginia seve.
42	angling free fishing access wft newsby cathy pelletier chronicle dunnville peopl	Free access to news via Dunnville Peopl Chronic Furry Cathy.	Angling: free access to news via the Dunnville Peopl Chronic Furry Cathy.	Angling: free access to news via Dunnville peopl Chronic Foam Cathy.
42	saltwater aquarium secretthriving marine aquarium secret pet shop dont	Aquarium d' salt water, secret marine aquarium, secret marine aquarium, secret marine aquarium, pet store that does not contain animals.	Aquarium d' salt water, secret marine aquarium, secret marine aquarium, pet store where the shop does not contain any animals.	Aquarium d' salt water, secret marine aquarium, secret marine aquarium, pet shop which does not contain animals.
42	hatteras jack fishing report rodanthe monday january nailed striper	Hatteras Jack fishing report rodanthe Monday nailed January strip-teaseuse.	Hatteras Jack fishing report rodanthe Monday Janvier nailed strip-teaseuse.	Hatteras Jack fishing report rodanthe Monday Janvier nailed strip-teaseuse.
42	fishing exclusive popular sporting wft newssimple sharp sp	Exclusive wft newssimple sp.	Exclusive fishing popular wft newssimple sp.	Exclusive and popular fishing wft newssimple sp.
42	family ice fishing clinic derby idaho fishing idaho	Family Derby Idaho Ice Fishing Clinic fishing Idaho.	Family derby idaho fishing idaho fishing clinic.	Family ice fishing clinic derby idaho fishing idaho.
42	kayak fishing extreme sport wavewalk fishing kayak angler kayak fishing extreme sport	Sport fishing kayaking Extreme wave walking kayaking kayaking kayaking sport fishing line.	Recreational fishing kayak extreme wave walking kayak fishing kayak fishing kayak fishing to the sport fishing line.	Sport Fishing Kayak Extreme wave walking kayak kayak kayak fishing kayak fishing line extreme sport fishing.
42	ice fishing iowa	Ice fishing, Iowa.	Ice fishing in Iowa.	Uh, ice fishing in Iowa.
42	fly fishing program host replaces columbia country wft newsbob asbury producer	L&apos, host of the fly-fishing program, replaces Asbury, a Colombian newspaper producer.	L&apos, host of fly fishing program, replaces Colombian newspaper producer Asbury.	L' host of the fly fishing program replaces Colombian newspaper producer Asbury.
42	checkout fishing fishinggear deal save	If you are a fisher do not hesitate to contact us.	If you are a fisherman, please feel free to contact us.	If you are a fisherman, don't hesitate to contact us to find out more.
42	competitive fishing tactic fly everyday fisherman thinking man	Competitive fishing tactic, daily fishing fly, daily fishing fly, man-thinking fisherman.	Competitive fishing, daily fishing fly, man thinking sinner.	Competitive fishing tactic, everyday fishing fly, fisherman thinking man.
42	saltwater fish tank harmful human help	The project is expected to be completed by the end of the year.	Dapos fish tank; noxious salt water; noxious human assistance.	Reservoir for fish; salt water harmful to the environment; harmful human assistance.
42	aquarium fish breeding angel fish best technique started breeding angel fish buy	Aquarium Reproduction fish angel fish the best technique has started to reproduce fish angel fish buy angel fish.	Aquarium fish reproduction angel fish the best technique started to reproduce fish angel fish buy angel fish.	Aquarium fish reproduction angel fish best technique started to fish reproduction angel fish buy angel fish.
42	news annual ice fishing derby	News of the annual Ice Fishing Derby.	News from the annual ice fishing derby, please.	News of the annual ice fishing derby season.
42	man tased mpd fight fishing tourney jan year cable wisconsin man	Man Taser MPD Fight Fishing Tourney Jan Year of Wisconsin Man cable.	Man Taser MPD Fight Fishing Tourney Jan Year of Wisconsin Man cable.	Man Taser MPD Fight Fishing Tourney Jan Cable year Wisconsin Man.
42	lazer trokar return sponsor boatus collegiate bass fishing championship	Lazer trokar return sponsoring boatus collegial fishing to the bass championship.	Lazer trokar return to sponsor boatus collegial fishing at l'apos; bass championship.	Lazer trokar return sponsor boatus collegial fishing to l' bass championship.
42	mastering big chill outdoors fishing news ice fishing kind	Mastering the Severe Cold of Fishing Outdoors New Ice Fishing Like Fishing.	Curbing the coldness of the ocean floor; outdoors of the fishery New ice fishing such as fishing.	Master the cold fishing outdoors New fishing on ice fishing like fishing.
42	hooked ice fishing small sled fishing gear pulling contained fish targeting	Fishing by hook, fishing by hook, fishing by hook, towing by sledge of small fishing gear, targeting of fish.	Fishing by hook and line, fishing by hook and line, tow of small fishing gear by sledge, targeting of fish.	Fishing fleets, fishing fleets, fishing hooks, small sled fishing gear towing, fish targeting.
42	florida sportsman fishing boating saltwater fly fishing stalking red kayak	A Florida sportsman catches a blue fly; salt water catches a red sea kayak in pursuit of a blue fly.	A sportsman from Florida catches a fly; saltwater catches a red kayak in pursuit of a fly.	Saltwater fishing for a red kayak in pursuit of a fly.
42	american fishing wire duo lock snap size lb sizescorrosion resistant black finish	Lapo Size; U.S. Fishing Fir Duo Lock Lb. Dimensions Corrosion-resistant Black finish.	Size of the l−apos; lock of the American fishing wire duo Lb dimensions Black finish resistant to corrosion.	L&apos size; U.S. fishing wire duo lock Lb. dimensions Corrosion resistant black finish.
42	fishing find freshwater fishing lure cheap ebay buy	To fish in fresh water fishing attract cheap ebay buy ebay.	Fishing in freshwater fishing gear lure cheap ebay buy ebay.	Fishing in freshwater fishing lure cheap ebay buy ebay.
42	watch shearon harris lake jun top water bass fishing	Watch as Shearon Harris Lake fishes Jun Lake's top sea bass.	Watch as Shearon Harris Lake fishes the water from the top of Jun Lake.	Watch Shearon Harris Lake fishing bass d'apos; water from the top of Jun Lake.
42	carp fishing book effective angling step step king bop carp fishing book	Book on Effective Harvesting King bop carp book on Harvesting carp.	Book on Effective Carp Fishing King's bop carp angling book on carp fishing.	Book on effective carp fishing King bop carp angling book on carp fishing.
42	find better deal offshore saltwater fishing boat ebay check	Find a better business off the coast of the fishing boats ebay check ebay.	Find a better business offshore fishing vessel ebay check ebay.	Find a better offshore fishing boat ebay check ebay.
42	fishing news banner website	Fishing information, web site.	Bannière d' fishing information, web site.	Bannière d' fishing information website.
42	discus fish aquarium	Aquarium discus.	Discussed fish tank.	A discus fish tank.
42	boatsshopping fishing headline oklahoma metro trout fishing pond instructional clinic pave exciting winter angling html	The Oklahoma Salmon Trout Fishery features the Pacific Salmon Trout Fishery; Apos Pond; Oklahoma.	The Oklahoma Trout fishery features the trout fishery of l'apos; pond; Oklahoma.	Trout fishing in Oklahoma highlights trout fishing in l'apos ponds; Oklahoma.
42	ice fishing bro brohsdahl jason mitchell byron eckhardt special ice fishing schtick	Brohsdahl jason mitchell byron eckhardt fishing on ice.	Brohsdahl jason mitchell byron eckhardt fishing on special ice shtick.	Brohsdahl jason mitchell byron eckhardt special ice fishing schtick.
42	best fishing spot lm clickrealstyle	Best site for fishing in old age.	Best fishing site at l'apos; old.	This is the best fishing site in the world.
42	watch montauk kayak fishing blitz video fishing news video	Watch Montauk kayak peach blitz video fishery video video video video news.	Watch Montauk kayak peach blitz video fishing video video video news video news.	Watch Montauk kayak fishing blitz video fishing video video news video.
42	twenty question walleye pro jimmy bell hunting big life fishing	I'd like to ask you a couple of questions, but I'd like to ask you a few questions.	Questions 20 walleye pro jimmy bell hunts long life fishing to long life.	Questions 20 walleye pro jimmy bell long-life fishing long-life hunt.
42	yap palau sport fishing promotional sport fishing video produced video rating	Yap Palau Promotion of Sport Fishing of Sport Fishing video product video filing.	Yap palau promotes the sport fishing of the sport fishing video product video classification video.	Yap palau promotes sport fishing video fishing video product video filing.
42	ice fishing trip frozen connecticut river vic attardo outdoors current strong flow	Ice fishing excursion on the Connecticut River Vic attardo at the high current.	An ice fishing excursion on the Connecticut River, Vic attardo, at l'apos; the river's current outdoors.	Connecticut River ice fishing trip Vic attardo at l'apos; current outdoors.
42	redfishing great cape fear backwater warmer day light wind	In addition, there are a number of small-scale fishing activities in the area.	The large cape fishery fears the light wind from a warmer day at the bottom of the ocean.	The great cape fishery fears the light wind from the sea; a warmer day in the bottom waters.
42	caught lb yellowfin tuna flick fishing flickfishing	J&apos, a longline fishery; yellowfin, a yellowfin, a longline fishery.	J' caught yellowfin, yellowfin as part of a longline fishery.	Fishing for yellowfin tuna, yellowfin tuna and longline.
42	going fishing today friend hatteras hope find catch fishing cabo slow	I'm fishing today; oil friends Hatteras hope to find slow fishing cod.	I'm going fishing today; o hui amis Hatteras hope to find slow fishing cabo.	I'm going fishing today; oil friends Hatteras hope to find slow fishing cabo catches.
42	yell cast jr hartley ad digital era author search fly fishing book dj hunt book read	Yell cast jr hartley and l&apos Numerical era author of research on the book fishing to the dj hunting book read.	Yell cast jr hartley and l' digital era author of research on the hunting book d.e.c. fly fishing book.	Yell cast jr hartley and l' digital era author of hunting fly fishing book dj book read.
42	colorado river colorado fly fishing condition report kynd	Colorado River colorado fishing condition to fly report kynd.	Colorado River colorado fly fishing condition reporting kynd.	Colorado River colorado fly fishing condition report kynd.
42	pensacola salt water fishing guide undoubtedly best tourist destination map unite	Pensacola saltwater fishing guidebook probably the best joint tourist destination map.	Pensacola guide fishing in salt water probably the best tourist destination map unite.	Pensacola saltwater fishing guide probably the best tourist destination map unite.
42	eric sharp hot spot ice fishing eric sharp detroit free press eric sharp wisp smelt vi	Ice fishing hot-spot Eric Rive d' Détroit Free Press Rive d'lapos; hardwood smelt.	Hot-spotted Eric from ice fishing Hot-spotted Eric from Detroit Free Press Hot-spotted Eric from whitewater; hardwood smelt.	Eric hot spot in ice fishing Riveted Eric from Detroit free press Rive Eric from l'apos; smelt hardwood.
42	flyfishing big earth publishing flyfishing barry reynolds bass walleye buy john	Fly-fishing The Big Land Industry Fly-fishing Barry Reynolds John John would be bought by the walleye.	Fly-fishing The Big Earth Industry Fly-fishing Barry Reynolds The yellow walleye would buy John.	Fly fishing The great earth industry Fly fishing Barry Reynolds Yellow walleye would buy John.
42	discus fish aquarium	Aquarium discus.	Discussed fish tank.	A discus fish tank.
42	interesting community fishing derby feature angler ice lt lt	Interesting community angling contest showcases anglers.	An interesting community fishing contest features anglers.	There is an interesting community fishing contest featuring anglers.
42	tropical fish tank help aquarium fish tank tropical fish tank fish clean	L&apos, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium.	L' aquarium helps l' aquarium to clean fish of tropical aquarium.	L' aquarium helps l' aquarium to clean fish from l' tropical aquarium.
42	trout fishing duo slated lmfa longview news journal local event trou	Trout fishing duo lmfa longview News local news hole event.	The duo trout fishing lmfa longview News local news event hole.	The trout fishing duo lmfa longview News, local news event hole.
42	treasure coast fishing report jan trout action good river angler sight cast	Atlantic Coast scallop fishery report.	Report on Atlantic Coast scavenging.	Treasure fishery report on the coast of Atlantic Canada.
42	three ton striped bass seized illegal fishing net	Illegal fishing nets have seized three tons of striped bass.	Three tonnes of striped bass have been seized from illegal fishing nets.	Three tons of striped bass were seized in illegal fishing nets.
42	sow bug round north american fly fishing forum time march mountain	Planting bugs around the North Fly Fishing forum-U.S.A. is moving towards the mountains.	Planting bugs around the North Fly Fishing Forum-U.S. is going up the mountain.	Planting bugs around the-U.S. fly fishing forum is moving towards the mountain.
42	red fishing knot book book fishing harry	Book of knots Harry redfish fisherman.	Harry fisherman red fishing node book.	Book of red fishing knots harry fisherman.
42	cold weather put chill clear lake bass fishing cold weather slowed bass fishing crawl	Cold temperatures caused the coldness of the fishing lake; cold temperatures slowed down fishing for bass.	Cold weather made the fishing lake cooler; cold weather bass slowed bass fishing; bass.	The cold weather caused the clear cold of the fishing lake to freeze; bass in cold weather slowed fishing; bass.
42	eye rise fishing field stream	It is the most important river in the world.	Elevation of the riverbank; fishing eye of the river field.	L'apos elevation; fishing stream eye of the river field.
42	fishing bait bait trout fishing trout fishing type equipment dictate	Fishing gear; fishing gear; fishing gear; fishing gear; fishing gear; fishing gear; fishing gear; fishing gear; fishing gear; fishing gear; fishing gear; fishing gear.	L' fishing equipment; brook trout-bait fishing gear; trout baiting equipment; trout fishing equipment.	Fishing equipment; brook trout fishing gear; fish bait; trout bait fishing equipment; trout fishing equipment.
42	trout fishing tip learn wedding preparation trout fishing tip help catch bigger	Trout Fishing Tips to Prepare for Marriage Trout fishing tips to help catch larger fish.	Wedding Trout Fishing Tips Trout fishing tips to help catch larger fish.	Trout fishing tips for wedding planning Trout fishing tips to help catch bigger fish.
42	cold huge impact fishing bradenton herald	Huge cold fishing impact, bradenton herald.	Cold, cold, huge impact of fishing bradenton herald.	Cold huge impact fishing bradenton herald bradenton.
42	american fishing book guide value	Guide Value of the U.S. Fishing Book.	Guide value of the American fishing book.	U.S. fishing book guide value.
42	colorado fishing blog fish explorer bernie keefe	Colorado blog fishing bernie keefe exploratory fish blog.	Colorado fishing blog bernie fish explorer keefe bernie.	Colorado fishing blog fish explorer bernie keefe.
42	aquarium fish aquarium success good common sense will fir	Aquarium fish success aquarium good sense fish will be sapine.	Aquarium fish success common sense aquarium will be pine.	Aquarium fish success aquarium common sense will be fir.
42	hearing heated sea bass fishing usual fishing year black sea bass specie june	For more information, please visit the Fisheries and Oceans Canada website at http://www.fish.ca/fisheries/fisheries/fisheries.html.	Hear warm sea bass fishing d' habit year fishing black bass june species June.	Hear seabass warm fishing d' fishing habit year black sea bass june species June.
42	fishnewseu issf urge limit tuna fishing capacity international seafood sustainabili eu tweet daily	Fishnewseu are eager to limit the capacity of international tuna fishing for sustainable seafood had daily tweet.	Fishnewseu are eager to limit international tuna fishing capacity for sustainable seafood has tweeted daily.	Fishnewseu press to limit international tuna fishing capacity for sustainable seafood had daily tweet.
42	barbel fishing float short edited clip barbel day way series top barbel angler mic wo	The barbed fishing floating wire short barbed wire clip daytime barbed wire series high barbed wire fishing wire mic wo wo.	The barbed fishing floating wire short barbed wire clip daytime barbed wire series high barbed wire fishing mic wo wo.	The fishing barbed wire floating short clip barbed wire diurnal series barbed wire high fishing wire mic wo wo.
42	popular fly fishing smallmouth bass auction	The most popular of these auctions was the sale of smallmouth bass for fly fishing.	The popular smallmouth bass fly-fishing auction.	The popular smallmouth bass auction for fly fishing.
42	eastern sport outdoor harrisburg hunting fishing idea marcus schneck patrio	Outer sport East Harrisburg hunts idea of fishing marcus schneck patrioke idea.	Outer sport East Harrisburg is hunting fishing idea marcus schneck patrioke idea.	East sports Harrisburg hunting fishing idea marcus schneck patrioke idea.
42	guided fly fishing muskegon river trout	Moskegon River Trout Guided Fly Fishing.	Fishing for the guided fly with the river trout muskegon.	River muskegon trout guided fly fishery.
42	crappie fishing wild fish recipe fishing tip minnesota fishing news wi	Harvesting wild crayfish Minnesota fishing advice fishing new wi news.	Fishing with wild crappie fish fishing recipe advice Minnesota fishing news fishing wi news.	Harvesting wild crayfish fishing advice Minnesota fishing fishing news wi new.
42	south indian river fishing report snook fishing pretty quiet jetty	Fishing in the southern part of the island, India, was carried out on a rather quiet pier.	Fishing in the south of India was carried out on a rather quiet pier.	The fishing in the south of l'apos; India was practiced on a rather quiet pier.
42	gear salmon fishing	Salmon Fishing with Fishing Gears.	Fishing for salmon with fishing gear.	Fishing gear salmon fishery.
42	fishing report feb surf pier richie knuth fishin shack heard thi	Fishing Report February Surf Wharf Richie Knuth Fishin Shack heard that it was there.	February surf dock Richie Knuth Fishin Shack heard that it was there.	Fishing report February surf wharf Richie Knuth Fishin Shack heard it was there.
42	fly fishing kunaplaza kunaplaza	Fishing for kunaplaza kunaplaza kunaplaza kunaplaza flies.	Kunaplaza kunaplaza fly fishing kunaplaza.	Fly fishing kunaplaza kunaplaza kunaplaza.
42	wind blowing east amazing fishing nearby island gonna plan trip catch barracuda	The wind is blowing from the sea; is amazing fishing in the vicinity of the island; will plan a trip to catch barracuda.	The wind blowing from the Apos; is amazing fishing near the Apos; a trip of catching barracuda will be planned.	The wind blowing from l'apos; is amazing fishing near l'apos; island will plan a trip catching barracuda.
42	fishing hunting pike year sam biever rice lake caught inch northern pike fis	In the year of the pike hunt, Sam biever Rice Lake was captured in northern pike.	In the year of the pike hunt, Sam biever rice lake was caught in northern pike.	Sam biever rice lake was caught in northern pike in the year of the pike hunt.
42	canada fly fishing canada fly fishing free online article directory submit article top author top	Fly-fishing in Canada Fly-fishing in Canada Fly-fishing in the open air Directory of Fly-fishing in Canada.	Fly-fishing in Canada Fly-fishing in the open air Directory of tips; online articles to submit; first author article.	Fly fishing in Canada Fly fishing in the open air Directory of tips; online articles submit the tips; article 1st author.
42	fact fly fishing rod overstock	Fly rod surplus facts.	Facts on surplus stock of fly fishing rods.	Facts on the fly fishing rod surplus.
42	ice fishing social medium explosion	Explosion of the Social Medium of Ice Fishing.	The explosion of the social medium of ice fishing.	Ice fishing social medium explosion.
42	simple tip holding white koi fish pond	A single point containing a pond with white koi fish.	It's a single point containing a white koi fish pond.	A simple tip containing a white koi fish pond.
42	flambeau outdoors bazuka pro rod case florida fishing tip wfnewshinged door ea	Flame at the top; outside Bazuka case case of fishing floridian point again hinge door ea.	Flame at the apos; outside Bazuka case of fishing floridian point again door ea hinge.	Flame at the apos; outside Bazuka floridian fishing case point again door ea hinge.
42	thought dolphin caught pearl hogy rigged oz jig head fish	J' believed that dolphins catch beads, hogy, oz, jig-head fish.	They thought dolphins caught beads, hogy, oz, jig-head fish.	J&apos believed dolphins caught pearls, hogy, oz, fish with jig heads.
42	brytec fly fishing box brytec fishing	Brytec brytec brytec Flycatch Box brytec peaches.	Brytec brytec fishing reel brytec fishing brytec fishing.	Brytec brytec fly fishing box brytec peaches brytec peaches.
42	carp secret homemade fish bait recipe catch bigger carp pole bending time tested fish bait	The secret recipe for carp bait catches larger fishes.	The secret recipe for the carp's fish bait catches bigger fish.	The secret fish bait recipe of carp catches bigger fish.
42	discus fish secret review discus fish secret	Discus secret fish to revisit discus secret fish discus secret fish.	Discus secret fish review discus secret fish discus secret fish.	Discus secret fish revisit discus fish secret discus fish secret fish.
42	fly fishing	Fly fishing.	Fly fishing.	Uh, fly fishing.
42	fishing warm weather fish cold front litening fish feed read fishingreports	Fish fishing in hot weather before cold, throw out fish food read fishing reports.	Fishing fish in hot weather in cold weather, discarding fish feeds, read fishing reports.	Catch fish in cold weather, discard fish feed read fishing reports.
42	aquarium fish basic plant container garden pl	Fish from the sea; aquarium, garden garden.	Fish from l' basic garden garden aquarium.	Pisces of fishes; basic aquarium garden garden.
42	cressi spear fishing america black snorkel	Throwing crescent trees fishing for the black tuba of d' America.	Crescent throw fishing black tuba d' America.	Throwing crescent-shaped fishes fishing the black snorkel of d' America.
42	sedative free whale fishing researcher tactic save endangered whale tangled	Free and Sedative Whaling Research Tactics to Save Ended Endangered Whales.	A research tactic for free-ranging and sedative whaling to save entangled endangered whales.	Free-ranging, sedative whaling research strategy to help rescue entangled, endangered whale whales.
42	southern oregon fly fishing club	South Coast Fly Fishing Club; Oregon.	Ontario Ministry of Agriculture, Food and Fisheries.	Fly fishing club in southern Oregon.
42	connecting bass fishing	Fishing connectivity; bass.	Fishing connectivity; bass.	Connection of fishing fleets; bass.
42	interesting deep sea fishing knowing tide outdoors	Interesting deep-sea fishing, tide-knowing outdoors.	Fishing on the high seas, knowing the tide at home; outdoors.	Interesting deep sea fishing, knowing the tide at the outside.
42	patagonia fishing kayak beach hat size tag nr kayak wft newspatagonia fishing ka	Kayak Fishing Patagonia ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka	Kayak Fishing Patagony size tag hat nr kayak wft < unk > fishing atagonia ka ka ka.	Kayaking kayaking hat size tag nr kayak wft < unk > ka ka fishing atagonia.
42	fishing southwest ohio realtime article copious system air force job health care medic	Fishing to the south-west of lapos; Ohio real-time article plentiful healthcare system of lapos; army of lapos; air working doctor.	Fish to the south-west of l'apos; Ohio article in real time abundant health care system of l'apos; army of l' air doctor of work.	Fisheries to the south-west of lapos; Ohio real-time article plentiful health care system; air doctor working.
42	news fishing derby today lake neshonoc west salem friend lake neshonoc ice day fishing der	New fishing derby today; Lake Neeshonoc oil west salem friend Lake Neeshonoc ice fishing day at Lake Neeshonoc.	New fishing derby today; lake oil neshonoc west salem friend lake neshonoc fishing day on lake neshonoc ice.	New fishing derby today; lake oil neshonoc west salem friend lake neshonoc ice fishing day der neshonoc lake.
42	fly fishing catch day magnificent fishing lodge	This is a beautiful fishing lodge.	Fly-fishing day, magnificent fishing lodge.	Fly fishing day, magnificent fishing lodge.
42	check fish report fishmyrtlebeach	Run the reports on the beach fish.	Check the reports on the beach fish.	Check the beach fish reports.
42	virtual master real brings augmented reality fishing hand chris scott barrfishing nice	The real virtual master brings with it the augmented hand fishing reality Chris Scott barrfishing Nice.	The real virtual master brings the augmented reality hand fishing Chris Scott barrfishing Nice.	The real virtual master brings augmented reality hand fishing Chris Scott barrfishing Nice.
42	reel augmented reality fish human takara tomy fishing reel augmented reality	Augmented takara takara human fish increased fishing reel reality augmented.	Augmented realty human fish takara tomy fishing reel increased realty.	Reality augmented human fish takara tomy fishing reel augmented reality augmented.
42	calgary gal fish tank aquarium amp stand access price dropped	The price of the aquarium, the aquarium, the aquarium, the aquarium and the aquarium have all fallen.	The price of fish; access to fish tank; fish tank; fish tank; fish tank; fish tank.	The price of fish; access to fish tank; fish tank; fish tank; Galician aquarium has fallen.
42	successful ice fishing perch depth finder successful ice	Successful Discovery of Ice Fishing Pole Depth Successful discovery of ice.	Successful discovery of depth of ice fishing boom Successful discovery of ice.	Successful discovery of ice fishing pole depth Successful discovery of ice.
42	vancouver men busted illegal ice fishing three ice fishing prohibited barbed hook ba	Vancouver men demolished three legally prohibited barbed-wire fishing boats on the ice.	Vancouver men demolished illegal ice fishing boats three barbed-wire hooks that were prohibited by law.	Vancouver men demolished illegal ice fishing boats three barbed-wire hooks prohibited by law.
42	sedative help free whale fishing whale oceanshash sedative help	Sedative to release whaling whales, oceanic hash sedative.	Sedative to release whaling whales, sedative to ocean hash.	A sedative to release whaling whales, a sedative for oceanic hash.
42	share bass fishing fayetteville	Share the Fayetteville pole fishing.	Share the pole fishing in Fayetteville.	You can share the fishing with the perch in Fayetteville.
42	pro fisherman season shop learn tip great guy help teach fish skar	Professional fisherman learns tricks, good guy helps teach skar fish.	A professional fisherman learns from things a good guy helps teach skar fish.	A professional fisherman learns stuff a good guy helps teach skar fish.
42	celebrity gossip start fly fishing	The gossip of celebrities is really starting to catch on.	Celebrity gossip is starting to fly.	Well, celebrity gossip is starting to fly.
42	kaufmann streamborn northwest fly fishing blog st steelhead	"Kaufmann s&apos's blog, ""Steelhead"", about fishing with the northern fly,-west."	Northern fly fishing blog-West by Kaufmann s&apos titled Steelhead.	Kaufmann s&apos's northern fly fishing blog-west titled steelhead.
42	fishing spot small fish soft bait	Soft bait fishing spot.	Fishing spot Soft bait small fish.	Fishing spot small soft bait fish.
42	fly fishing magazine guide	Fly Fishing Magazine Guide.	Fly fishing magazine guide.	A fly fishing magazine guide.
42	fishing striped bass ll fight hard fish pull force lake norman st	Striped Bass Fishery Struggle with hard-bodied fishes Drawing Norman Lake st.	Striped bass fishery he hard fish fighting pull Norman Lake st.	Striped bass fishery ll fight hard fish draw force Lake Norman st.
42	gear salmon fishing	Salmon Fishing with Fishing Gears.	Fishing for salmon with fishing gear.	Fishing gear salmon fishery.
42	planning fly fishing trip	Plan your fly-fishing trip.	Plan a fly-fishing trip.	Plan fly fishing trip.
42	fishing tackle summary	Fishery article summary.	Summary of fishing gear.	A summary of fishing gear.
42	annual trout fishing derby set mckinney park department will host annual trout fishing derby	Each year, McKinney Park will organize a trout fishing tournament.	Each year McKinney Park will host a trout fishing tournament.	Each year, the service at McKinney Park will host an annual trout fishing tournament.
42	wild sport fishing sailfish mutton grouper shark wild sport fishing	Wild Recreational Fishing Shark @-@shark sheep-Blue Mole Wild Recreational Fishing.	Wild sports fishing shark-shark sheep-blue mole Wild sports fishing shark.	Recreational wild fishing shark @-@mouton shark-blue mole Wild sports fishing.
42	cressi spear fishing america black snork america black cressi	Throwing harpoon crescents fishing for the apoes; Black America snaps them; Black America is black.	Throwing in crescent harpoon fishing the apos; black America tuba lapos; black America cresso black.	Throwing of harpoon in crescent fishing boats; Black America tuba lapos; Black America black cressi black.
42	tip fishing salmon alaska	Fisheries and Oceans Canada, Department of Fisheries and Oceans.	Tip from Alaska salmon fishery.	Salmon fishing tip from Alaska.
42	check week water fishing forecast	Check fishing forecasts for the week.	Check the week's fishing forecast.	Check the fishing forecast for this week.
42	good fishing tip finding fish	Fishing advice, find some fish.	Good fishing advice, finding fish.	Well, good fishing advice, finding some fish.
42	aquarium fish handbook tropical aquarium fish handbook tropical aquarium fish book discus bree	Aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium.	Fish Handbook; aquarium Fish Handbook; Tropical aquarium Book of fishes; Tropical aquarium discus bree.	Handbook of fishes; aquarium fishes; tropical aquarium Book of fishes; tropical aquarium discus bree.
42	wanting fish chesapeake checkout virginia beach fishing charter ad	I would like to take a look at some of the best fishing spots in the world.	You want fish chesapeake checkout virginia beach fishing charter pub.	Want fish chesapeake checkout virginia beach fishing charter pub.
42	best worm bait fishing thom conroy helium	Best bait for fishing with thom conroy helium.	Best bait for thom conroy helium fishing.	Best thom conroy helium fishing worm bait.
42	love fishing fly fishing reel hot seller ebay info	J' loves fly fishing, fly fishing, the salesman on ebay info.	J&apos loves fly fishing, fly fishing, seller on ebay info.	J' loves fishing with flies, fly fishing, ebay info salesman.
42	apalachicola florida fishing report	Apos fishery report; Apalachicola florida.	Fishing report for l'apos; Apalachicola florida.	Fishing report of l'apos; Apalachicola florida.
42	minnesota walleye ice fishing good morning walleye fishing north eastern minnesota fishing	Minnesota Walleye Ice Fishing Hello North Walleye Fishery-Eastern Minnesota.	Minnesota walleye ice fishing Hello North walleye fishing-eastern Minnesota.	Minnesota Winter walleye ice fishing Hello North American walleye fishing-eastern Minnesota.
42	southwest fly fishing magazine	South-fishing-west magazine.	South Fly Fishing Magazine-West.	South fly fishing magazine-west.
42	crappie fishing hot percy priest wft newsanyone bass percy priest reall	It's the first time I've heard that I've heard of it, but I don't know if it's true.	The groundhog fishing for the sexy priest announced that someone was the priest percy percy.	Groundhog fishing for sexy percy priest announced that someone was the percy priest.
42	yell cast jr hartley ad digital era author search fly fishing book dj	Yell cast jr hartley and l' Numerical Age author of fishing fly search DJ.	Yell cast jr hartley and l' digital fishing fly search author DJ.	Yell cast jr hartley and l' digital era author of the search for fishing fly DJ.
42	greatest walleye fishing trip canada	Canada's Best Walleye Fishing Trip.	The best ever walleye fishing trip in Canada.	Best walleye fishing trip in Canada.
42	fishing piece pmd cycle top bottom fly assortment pale morning dun prolific hatche	Fishery pmapo cycle; light-moment upper-floor flies assorted a prolific hat.	Fishery item pmd cycle of the apo; flies assorted from the top of the light-coloured bottom of a prolific hat.	Fishery item pmd cycle of the apos; assortment of upper light-dark flies morning prolific hat.
42	top spinning reel inshore salwater fishing	Saltwater inshore fishing begins.	Beginning of inshore fishing by saltwater windmill.	Begin inshore reel fishing in salt water.
42	bass pro shop rapala pro bass fishing rod peripheral rapala pro bass fishing rod peripheral list	Peripheral list of bass-style fishing rods, pro shop rapala pro bass, on the periphery of rapala pro bass.	Peripheral list of bass pro shop rapala pro bass fishing rods on the periphery of rapala pro bass.	Peripheral bass pro shop rapala pro bass fishing rods on the periphery of rapala pro bass.
42	poway hold youth fishing derby nathan scharn angler will chance test	Poway hold Young anglers at the derby Nathan scharn fisherman will be lucky to be tested.	Poway hold Young anglers derby line Nathan scharn fisherman will be lucky tested.	Poway hold Young anglers at the fishing derby Nathan scharn fishing line will be tested.
42	big sport fishing lite android bjd production blog wft newsbig sport fishing	Blog bjd bjd blog production wft newsbig sport fishing.	Big sport fishing lite android bjd blog production wft newsbig sport fishing.	I'm a big sport fishing lite android bjd blog production wft newsbig sport fishing.
42	levelled fishing levelled fishing skill level runescape	It is important to keep in mind that there is a high level of fishing activity.	The level of fishing effort is low; fishing ability is low.	Levelled fishing is a high level of fishing ability.
42	game fish seek ferret finding volunteer arizona game fish department offering rare opportuni	Fish-chat is looking for ferrets in the-volunteer fish-hunting service of l'apos; Arizona offers rare fishing opportunities.	The fish-chat looks for ferrets in the fish service-volunteer hunters of l'apos; Arizona offers rare fishing opportunities.	The fish-chat is looking for ferrets in the Arizona volunteer fish service, which offers rare fishing opportunities.
42	fishing delaware water gap national recreation area article delaware water gap national recreation	L' article on the National Recreational Area of the Recreational Area of the Recreational Area of the Recreational Area of the Fishing Area of the Delaware.	Article on the national recreational zone of the recreational zone of the recreational zone of the recreational zone of the delaware fishing zone.	L' article on the national recreational zone of the recreational zone of the recreational zone of the delaware fishing zone.
42	neddesmond posted fishing pic tuesday quiz specie gofishn	Neddesmond posted a picture of fishing on Tuesday's special gofishn quiz.	Neddesmond posted a fishing photo on Tuesday's special gofishn quiz.	Neddesmond posted this fishing photo on Tuesday's gofishn special.
42	tx fishing news coolfishing day guna fishing	Tx news of cane fishing's fresh-day fishery.	Tx news from the fresh-day fishing rod.	Tx Fresh Day fishing news of cane fishing.
42	grant fishing smile set grant arizona game fish department ki	Giving a smile together Arizona Game Fish Department Ki.	Grant fishing smile together Arizona Game Fish Department Ki.	Grant fishing smile together deal Arizona Game Fish Department Ki.
42	carp carp fishing carp fishing usualy involves ultra light rig lb test small tr	Fishing for Carp Carp Carp is usually fished on flat, lightweight, ultra-@-@ forms.	Carp Fishing Carp fishing is usually carried out on light, ultra-@-@, flat plates.	Carp Fishing Carp fishing carp fishing is usually conducted on flat, ultra-light shapes.
42	fishing ski report detroit free press ice fishing continues heavy snow will travel	Detroit Fishing Ski Report Press freedom on the fishing ice continues to snow heavily.	Report of fishing skiing in Detroit free of the press on the fishing ice continues to snow heavily.	Detroit's fishing ski report, free of the press and on the fishing ice, continues to snow heavily.
42	fishing check special closeout item great fly fishing gear buy fishwest check	Fly fishing; help from a special fly-fishing closure scheme.	Fishing by fleets; help from fleets; a special fly-fishing closure scheme.	Fishing by fleets; help from fishers; a special fly fishing closure.
42	fishing find fly tying material tool cheap ebay info	Fly fishing find material to link cheap tool ebay info on ebay.	Fly fishing find material to link tool cheap ebay info on ebay.	Fly fishing find material link tool cheap ebay info on ebay.
42	fish casting bubble bet find	The fishes are throwing bubbles of hope.	The fish throw the bubbles of hope.	The fish throw bubbles d'apos; hope.
42	fly fishing photo essay canada greatest freshwater adventure explore canada greatest fly fishing adventu	Fly Fishing Photo Trial Canada's Greatest Freshwater Adventure Explore Canada's Greatest Fly Fishing Adventure.	Fly Fishing Photo Trial Canada's Greatest Freshwater Adventure Canada's greatest fly fishing adventure.	Fly fishing photo essay Canada's greatest freshwater adventure Explore Canada's greatest fly fishing adventure.
42	type fishing rod	Kind of fishing rod.	Fishing rod type.	It's a fishing rod type.
42	extreme fishing kayak fishing monster fish bluewater jon bluewaterjon bluewater jon schwartz	Extreme kayaking fishing fish monster jon blue water jon blue water jon blue water jon schwartz.	Extreme fishing kayak fishing fish monster jon blue water jon blue water jon blue water jon schwartz.	Extreme fishing kayak fishing monster fish jon blue water jon blue jon blue water jon schwartz.
42	choosing fly fishing gear requires patience start	Choosing fly-fishing requires patience.	Fly fishing gear requires patience.	Choosing a fly fishing gear requires patience.
42	fishing report jetty beach good weather brought handful surf fishe	Fishing Report Beach of the Jetty Weather brought a handful of fish to the surf.	Fishing Report Jetty Beach Weather brought a handful of fish to the surf.	Jetty Beach The good weather brought a handful of fish to the surf.
42	good info fishing team winner	It's the first time I've seen it, it's the first time I've seen it.	Winner of the news fishing team is a good IT guy.	The winner of the news fishing team is a good IT guy.
42	england fishing community current management system broken edf	The Fishing Community Management System; Anxiety, Fishing Community Management System; Anxiety, Fishing Community Anxiety, Fishing Anxiety, Fishing Anxiety, Fishing Anxiety, Fishing Anxiety; Anxiety.	The management system of the fishing community; anxiety, the management system of the fishing community; anxiety, l' antivirus, l' aneurysm.	Anxiety, the management system of the fishing community; Anxiety, l' Antivirus, l' Aneurysm.
42	caught lb pike flick fishing flickfishing	J' fished for the pike in a film of angling.	J&apos caught pike in an angling film.	J' caught pike in an angling movie.
42	missouri fly fishing website	Missouri Fly Fishing Site.	This is a fishing site for the Missouri Flycatcher.	Missouri fly fishing site.
42	wanting fish chesapeake checkout virginia beach fishing charter good ad	I'd like to take a look at some of the best fish in the world.	Want fish chesapeake checkout virginia beach fishing charter good advertising.	Want fish chesapeake checkout virginia beach fishing charter good advertising.
42	mainenance fishing rod preserving rod read	D'apos hand fishing rod; work to preserve the fishing rod.	D'apos hand fishing rod; works to preserve the fishing rod and rod.	D'apos hand fishing rod; fishing rod preservation work.
42	proper fishing tackle catch fish dream	Fish fishing, fishing, fishing, the dream.	Fishing for fish, fishing for fish, fishing for fish, fishing for dreams.	Fish fishing, fish fishing, fish fishing, dream fishing.
42	fishing tackle field stream store hook poking tip barb wine	Catch fish; help fish; fish net; water.	Fishing with help of a fishing net; water.	It's a good idea to go fishing in the mountains.
42	fly lt gt fishing lt gt film tour showing providing comfy winter escape	It's a great place to go, and it's a great place to go, and a great place to go.	Fly fishing and the shooting of apos; a film showing a comfortable winter escape.	Fly fishing and the filming of Apos, a film showcasing a comfortable winter escape route.
42	pm pm hosting baited sea fishing contest prize st	PDF hosting the Baited Sea Fishing Contest st.	Pm mp hosting the st prizes baited sea fishing contest.	Pm mp hosting the baited sea fishing contest st prizes st.
42	pocketwatch posted ice fishing shack lake tomahawk	The pocket watch showed the Tomahawk Lake ice-fishing cabin.	The pocket watch depicted the Tomahawk Lake ice fishing cabin.	The pocket watch showed Tomahawk Lake's ice fishing cabin.
42	best fly fishing website	Best fly-fishing site.	Best fishing fly site.	The best fly fishing site in the world.
42	fishing lure bait rig crankbait crankbaits floating lure diving lip bill	Fishing bait bait crankbait floating grankbait bait decoy-plunging hare beak.	Fishing lure bait crankbaits bait floating grankbaits lures the beak-plunging hare.	Fishing lure bait crankbaits floating grankbait bait lures the beak-of plunging hare.
42	fishing report jan illinois winter steelhead fishing good driftboaters cop	Fishing report Jan illinois rainbow trout-@-@-arc sky-@-@ drift canoe trolling.	Fishing Report Jan illinois winter rainbow trout-en-sky arc-en-sky fishing for good policeman canoe drift.	Fishing report Jan illinois winter rainbow trout-en-sky arc-en-sky fishing good canoe policeman drifting.
42	session mayo mark people myselfduration pm pmtide started angling fishing	The mayonnaise session mark people me-same duration pm pmtide has also started fishing with the line.	Mayonnaise session mark people me-same duration pm pmtide started fishing with the line.	Session mayonnaise mark people me-same duration pm pmtide started angling.
42	florida top freshwater fishing destination	Florida is the main destination for fishing in the fresh water.	Florida is the most popular fishing destination in the world.	The main freshwater fishing destination is Florida.
42	md striped bass fishing season early	Striped bass season begins at the beginning of the season.	The fishing season for striped bass begins at the beginning of the season.	Start of striped bass fishing season at the beginning of the season.
42	cold water aquarium fish water temperature factor consider choosing fish	Temperature factor; water; aquarium; cold water for fish.	Temperature factor for fish; water for fish; aquarium for fish; cold water for fish.	Water temperature factor; water temperature; fish aquarium; cold water for fish.
42	toyota texas bass classic continue support texas park wildlife department athens toyota texas	Classic Texas Toyota continue to support Texas Wildlife Department Toyota Texas Park.	Classic Toyota texas continue to support the park texas department of wildlife athens texas toyota.	Toyota Texas classic continue to support the park texas department of wildlife athens toyota texas.
42	toledo bend report chicken coop providing hot crappie action love bass fishing bu	Toledo fold fold report chickens Coop provide warm action marmot of l' love of drunken bass fishing.	Toledo fold fold report chicken Coop provide warm action marmot of l' love of drunken bass fishing.	To fold report chicken Coop provide hot action marmot of l' love of bass fishing drunken.
42	gear salmon fishing	Salmon Fishing with Fishing Gears.	Fishing for salmon with fishing gear.	Fishing gear salmon fishery.
42	fishing rapala original floater fishing lure original floating rapala fished fishingkahuna	Original floating hawala fishing original hawala fishing floating kahuna fishing.	The fishing for the original rapala floating the fishing for the original rapala floating the fishing for the kahuna.	The fishing for the original floating rapala, fishing for the original rapala floating the fishing for kahuna.
42	annual ice fishing extravaganza draw hundred annual jig ice fishing extravaganza held wee	The annual extravaganza fishery yields one hundred pounds of extravaganza fishing on small ice.	The annual extravaganza ice fishing draws 100 pounds annually from extravaganza ice fishing kept small.	The annual ice fishing extravaganza draws 100 pounds annually from extravaganza ice fishing kept small.
42	gallon fish tank rutherfordton gallon fish tank bought year didnt long month	Tank of fish gallon rutherfordton aquarium gallon bought year n' not a long time.	Gallon fish tank rutherfordton aquarium gallon purchased year n' not a long time.	Rutherfordton gallon aquarium gallon fish tank bought year n' not long.
42	caught lb blue marlin flick fishing flickfishing	J' fished for the blue marlin in a film of angling.	J' caught the blue marlin in an angling movie.	J' caught blue marlin in an angling movie.
42	mainenance fishing rod preserving rod read	D'apos hand fishing rod; work to preserve the fishing rod.	D'apos hand fishing rod; works to preserve the fishing rod and rod.	D'apos hand fishing rod; fishing rod preservation work.
42	patrick asks obama intervene fishing regulation dispute	Patrick has asked Obama to intervene in the fishery-regulation dispute.	Patrick asked Obama to intervene in the dispute over the regulation of the fishery.	Patrick asked Obama to intervene in the dispute over fishing regulations.
42	interesting fishing remains good rest week lt lt	Well, an interesting fishery is still a good week's rest.	An interesting fishing is a restful week.	A good week's rest is an interesting fishing experience.
42	best deal fishing bait lure ebay best price	Ebay is the best fishing market in the world.	Best bait fishing market ebay best price.	Best market fishing lure ebay best price.
42	fish stock exploited thirty percent fish stock monitored fao depleted	Fish stocks were exploiting a 30% fish stock and monitoring faecal depletion.	Fish stocks exploited a 30% fish stock and monitored fauna depletion.	The fish stock exploited a 30% fish stock and monitored its depletion.
42	reading girl guide hunting fishing	Girl Guide Book for the Fishing Hunt.	Fishing-hunting reading guide.	Girl reading guide to fishing hunting.
42	channel cat north american fly fishing forum dual purpose thread figure post	Chemin chat nord-U.S. fly-fishing forum double-goal, double-goal station line.	Chemin chat north-U.S. fly fishing double-purpose forum thread double-purpose.	North Chemin chat-U.S. fly fishing double purpose forum dual purpose mail thread figure.
42	fishin break fishing fish	Fish, broken fish, fish, fish, fish.	Broken fish... fish fish fish fish.	Broken fish fish fishing fish fish.
42	spartan newsletter spartan fishing team ihsa bass fishing high	Spartan fishing team is a group of fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen.	Bulletin d' Spartan fishing team ihsa high-end fishing.	Bulletin d' information spartan fishing team ihsa high-end fishing.
42	platypus dead illegal fishing net animal environment fishing	Ornithorynut dead, illegal netting, wildlife.	Dead ornithorynut, illegal net fishing, animal environment.	Ornithorynut dead, illegal fishing nets, animal environment.
42	catchcatfish posted fishing video bait hook shad gofishn	The fish-chat posted the video fishing hook gofishn gofishn bait.	Fish-chat posted fishing bait video gofishn gofishn bait.	Fish-cat posted fishing video bait gofishn gofishn bait.
42	steven wright year fishing salvador dali dotted caught fish	The Year of El Salvadoran Fishing.	Steven l' Year of Salvadoran Fisheries.	Steven l&apos, the year of El Salvador's fishing season.
42	tip fly fishing brook trout stream manual angler ten tip fly	Fly Fishing at Lapos; Brook Trout Manual line fishing at 10-point line.	Fly fishing at l'apos; brook trout Ten-point angling line.	Fly fishing at l'apos; brook trout Manual angling at the 10-point line.
42	post pet care aquarium fish care basic thing beginner review complete guide tropical aquar	After the care of the pet aquarium fish aquarium basic care thing begin to review tropical guide complete aquar.	After the care of pet aquarium fish basic care basic thing begin to review tropical guide complete aquar.	After pet care aquarium fish basic care basic thing begin to review tropical guide complete aquar.
42	reel report bass bite best thing going absence fishing graphic today good	It's good to have a good fishing experience, but it's good to have a good fishing experience.	Low biting report best of all; no graphical fishing today; good fishing oil.	The report of the low bite best of l'apos; no graphical fishing today; good fishing oil.
42	fishing live bait	Fishing for live bait.	Fishing live bait.	We're fishing live bait.
42	charge fee saltwater fishing license	Fee Requirements Saltwater Fishing Licences are required.	Saltwater fishing licence fee.	Fee charged Saltwater fishing licenses.
42	fishing relaxing rejuvenating sport fishing relaxing sport solo	Fishing relaxation rejuvenation fishing sport only sport.	Fishing rejuvenation fishing sport relaxation sport only sport.	Recreation fishing rejuvenation sport fishing relaxation sport only.
42	good set fish stock cleaned ich tank fish today community tank	This is a good example of the kind of fish that has been washed away from the fish.	A good stock of fish cleaned the fish of the fish; communal aquarium d' today.	A good fish stock cleaned fish from the community's fish tank today.
42	st augustine travel guide florida fishing licence online travel florida usa tour tourism news vacation tip	St Augustine Travel Guide Florida Online Fishing Trip License Florida uses Tour Tour touristiques new vacation tip.	St Augustine travel guide Florida online fishing license travel Florida usea tour tour touristiques new vacation tip.	St Augustine travel guide Florida online fishing license travel Florida use tour tour tourist vacation tip vacation.
42	update fly fishing tip beginner ultimate guide learn fly fish pro	Update Fly Fishing Advice beginner guidebook learn fish fly pro fish.	Update Fly fishing tips begin guide to learn how to fly fish pro fish.	Update Beginning fly fishing advice ultimate guide learn fish fly pro fish.
42	spinner fishing trout proven system tackle technique strategy catching trout learn	Proven trout-fishing technique in line; wait time The trout-fishing technique is learning.	Track-and-line trout fishing technique proven; waiting The trout fishing technique is learning.	Proven technique for fishing trout in line d'apos; wait The trout fishing technique learns.
42	fishing news freshest fishing content delivered directly browser matter web	Fisheries news the latest content of fishing delivered directly to the web of the browser material.	Fisheries news the latest fishing content delivered directly to the web of the browser material.	Fisheries news latest fishing content delivered directly to the web browser material.
42	pound test bass fishing rod yahoo answer	Fishing rod response; impound test.	Response of fishing rod of bass d'apos; impound test.	Fishing bass fishing rod response; impound trial.
42	news photo gallery fly fishing marlboro	Photo Gallery of New Flies Fishing Marlboro.	Photo gallery of new flies fishing for marlboro.	Photo gallery of new marlboro fishing flies.
42	fishing report fishnotes caught bass gofishn	Fishing notes have been taken.	Fishing notes have caught some gofishn bass.	Some fishing notes have caught gofishn bass.
42	best book aquarium owner book best gain knowledge subject fish	This book is the first of its kind in the world to be published in the United States.	Best fish owner book; aquarium delivers better fish subject knowledge.	Better book owner of the aquarium delivers better d' acquire knowledge subject fish.
42	fly fishing largemouth bass tip manual fly fishing largemouth bass tip lisa gove break st	Fly Fishing Tip of the Spike; Bigmouth Bass Manual Fly Fishing L' Bigmouth Bass L' Bigmouth Bass.	Fly-fishing Tip of the tongue; largemouth bass Fly-fishing L' largemouth bass L' largemouth bass L&apos.	Fly fishing Tip of the tongue; largemouth bass Manual fly fishing L' largemouth bass L' largemouth bass.
42	tackle buy fishing fishing	Get your own boat.	Buy-yourself a fishing boat.	Buy a fishing boat-yourself.
42	water sport fishing holden beach vacation rental travel holdenbeach	Pêche nautique Holden holiday rental at the beach holden beach beach beach beach beach holden beach.	Sailing fishing Holden holiday rental at the beach beach holden beach beach beach holden beach.	Boat fishing Holden vacation rental at beach holden beach beach beach beach holden beach.
42	fly box folly north american fly fishing forum ongoing effort achieve system perfection	The Forum on Fly Fishing in North America, a craze for flycrafts, continues to strive for the ultimate perfection of the system.	The North American Fly Fishing Forum, a flybox madness, continues its efforts to achieve system perfection.	The forum on fly fishing in North America, a flybox madness, continues its efforts to achieve system perfection.
42	fishing north coast weather steelhead caught	Rainbow trout fishing-@-@ in-sky arc-in-North Coast rainbow caught.	Rainbow trout fishing-@-@ sky arc-@-@-north coast sky caught.	Rainbow trout fishing-in-sky arc-in-sky of the north coast captured.
42	catch fish banjo minnow	Fish banjo minnow.	To catch the fish banjo minnow.	Fishing banjo minnow fish.
42	south indian river february fishing forecast	Fishery forecasts for February and February in southern India.	Fishery forecasts for February in the south of the country.	February fishing forecast in the south of India.
42	fish umbra fishhotel aquarium umbra fishhotel award winning modern finned friend mo	This hotel is located in the heart of the old town, in the heart of the city.	Fish umbra fishhotel aquarium umbra fishhotel rewarded with a d&apos award; modern friend with fins.	Fish umbra fishhotel aquarium umbra fishhotel award-winning modern finning friend.
42	fish recipe cleaning preparation fillet round fish	Fish recipe, fish round-net cleaning preparation.	Fish recipe, round net cleaning preparation of fish.	Fish recipe, cleaning preparation round fish net.
42	variety freshwater aquarium fish	Varying fishes; fresh water from the island; aquarium.	To vary the fish of the fish; freshwater of the fish; aquarium.	Vary the fish in the freshwater aquarium.
42	tbf flw outdooors introduce national high school fishing program national high school fishing program	Tbf flw outdooors introduce the National Fishing Program of l' High School National Fishing Program of l' High School.	Tbf flw outdooors introduce the national fishing program of l' high school national fishing program of l' high school.	Tbf flw outdooors introduce national fishing program of l' high school national fishing program of l' high school.
43	cnn al wrap hu visit cnn jaime florcruz served time magazine long time bureau	CNN al wrap hu visit CNN Jaime Florcruz has served long desk magazine time.	CNN al wrap hu visit CNN Jaime Florcruz has served the time magazine long desktop office.	CNN al wrap hu visit CNN Jaime Florcruz served time magazine long desktop office.
43	powell hu visit success yep powell suck turncoat	Powell hu visit successful yep powell suck the renegade.	Powell hu visit success yep powell suck the renegade.	Powell hu visit success yep powell suck renegade.
43	hu jintao meet obama china relation today time	Meet Obama China relationship today; time.	Hu jintao meet Obama China relationship today; ile time.	Hu jintao meet Obama China relationship today; time.
43	china praise hu trip fruitful yahoo news	China praises hu trip yahoo-hoo news successful yahoo.	China praises trip hu yahoo yahoo news successful yahoo.	China praise hu trip yahoo news successful yahoo.
43	chinese president lost translation powerful leader meet expect tran	The Chinese president has lost the powerful translation meet meet wait-you in tran.	The Chinese president has lost the powerful translation meet leader wait-you in tran.	The Chinese president has lost the translation powerful leader meet wait-you tran.
43	china half import tax consumer electronics president hu news china will halve	China half tax; e-importing to the general public President and CEO China half as much as China.	China half tax; mass e-import president hu news China half as much as China.	China half tax; mass-market e-import president hu news China half China half.
43	summit obama praised china reducing tension korea china deal nk shelling	Summit Obama praised the stress-relieving porcelain in South Korea.	Summit Obama praised the porcelain that reduces tension in South Korea.	Summit Obama praised china as a means of reducing tension in South Korea.
43	hu jintao visit fails thaw chinese relation north korea	Visit hu jintao fails to defrost the relationship of China North-Korea.	Visite hu jintao fails to defrost Chinese relationship north-Korean.	Hu jintao visit fails Chinese North relationship defrost-Korean.
44	love good upcycle starbucks terrifying trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	Love good upcycle Starbucks terrifying glass of trenta containing whole bottle of wine.	Love good upcycle Starbucks terrifying glass of trenta wine containing whole bottle of wine.	Love good upcycle Starbucks terrifying trenta glass containing entire bottle of wine.
44	gross starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	The Starbucks trenta mug has a whole bottle of wine in it.	The Starbucks trenta cup contains an entire wine bottle.	Starbucks trenta cup contains an entire bottle of wine.
44	filler starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	The Starbucks trenta fill cup contains a whole bottle of wine.	The Starbucks® trenta mug contains an entire bottle of wine.	Starbucks trenta fill cup contains an entire bottle of wine.
44	starbucks terrifying trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	Terrifying Starbucks cup of trenta contains a whole bottle of wine.	Terrifying Starbucks cup of trenta contains entire bottle of wine.	Starbucks terrifying trenta cup contains entire wine bottle.
44	starbucks trenta hold entire bottle wine people cougartown	Starbucks trenta contains entire bottles of Cougartown People wine.	Starbucks trenta contains entire bottles of wine from people cougartown.	Starbucks trenta contains a whole bottle of people cougartown wine.
44	wine problem solved starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	Wine Problem Resolved Starbucks trenta cup containing whole bottle of wine.	Wine problem solved Starbucks wine trenta cup containing whole bottle of wine.	Wine problem solved Starbucks trenta cup full bottle of wine.
44	definitely nuit blanche starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	Definitely white night Starbucks trenta cup containing a whole bottle of wine.	Definitely an all-nighter, Starbucks trenta cup containing an entire bottle of wine.	Definitely white night Starbucks trenta cup containing an entire bottle of wine.
44	starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine ounce room spare	The Starbucks trenta mug contains wine bottles.	Starbucks trenta cup contains bottles of wine.	The Starbucks trenta cup contains a bottle of wine.
44	te boozing news starbucks huge trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	L' Starbucks huge cup of trenta contains whole wine.	L' alcohol Starbucks huge cup of trenta contains whole bottle of wine.	L' Starbucks enormous cup of trenta liquor contains entire bottle of wine.
44	starbucks cup hold entire bottle wine	The Starbucks cup contains a whole bottle of wine.	This Starbucks cup contains an entire bottle of wine.	Starbucks cup contains an entire bottle of wine.
44	guy starbuck cup size trenta hold entire bottle wine	The Starbuck cup guy trenta cup contains whole bottle of wine.	The Starbuck cup guy size trenta has entire bottle of wine.	The guy Starbuck cup size trenta contains entire bottle of wine.
44	thought sbux couldn fantastic starbucks huge trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	Thought sbux could fantastic Starbucks huge cup trenta contain whole bottle of wine.	I thought sbux could fantastic Starbucks huge cup trenta contain whole bottle of wine.	I thought sbux could fantastic Starbucks huge trenta cup bottle of whole wine.
44	venti trenta starbuck ounce supersize offer crazy fb	Venti trenta starbuck onces super sized offer fb crazy fb.	Venti trenta starbuck onces supersize offer fb mad fb.	Venti trenta starbuck onces supersize offer fb crazy fb.
44	news day starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	News of the day Starbucks trenta cup contains a whole bottle of wine.	Daily News Starbucks trenta cup contains entire bottle of wine.	Today's Starbucks trenta cup news contains entire bottle of wine.
44	seriously wonder american overweight starbucks trenta cup unhealthy detail	I seriously wonder if Starbucks American overweight trenta cups of unhealthy details.	Well, I seriously wonder if American Starbucks overweight trenta cup unhealthy details.	I seriously wonder if American Starbucks overweight trenta cup unhealthy details.
44	american wine glass hairpin starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	The Starbucks Trenta cup, made of American wine glass hairpin, contains an entire bottle of wine.	The Starbucks trenta American wine glass hairpin mug contains an entire bottle of wine.	The American wine glass hairpin Starbucks trenta cup contains an entire bottle of wine.
44	bigger beverage bigger american gottlieb memorial hospital loyola university health system	Larger American Drinking Gottlieb Memorial Loyola Hospital University Health System.	The largest beverage in the United States is Gottlieb Memorial Hospital, Loyola University Health System.	Biggest drink American Gottlieb memorial hospital Loyola University health system.
44	case needed reason love trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	If you want to have a drink, you should have a drink with a bottle of wine.	Case need reason l' love cup of Trenta contain a whole bottle of wine.	Case need reason l' love cup Trenta contain an entire bottle of wine.
44	dangerous starbucks cup hold bottle wine watch	Dangerous Starbucks mug holds wine bottle, watches wine.	The dangerous Starbucks cup holds the bottle of wine watches wine.	The dangerous Starbucks cup holds the wine watch bottle.
44	trenta cup hold entire bottle wine wrong	The whole bottle of wine doesn't fit well in the trenta cup.	The cup of trenta does not contain the entire bottle of wine.	The trenta cup contains the entire bottle of wine.
44	vooov starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	Vooov Starbucks trenta cup contains a whole bottle of wine.	Vooov Starbucks trenta cup contains the entire bottle of wine.	Vooov Starbucks trenta cup contains entire bottle of wine.
44	starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine random starbucks trenta college	Starbucks Trenta Cup contains an entire bottle of random Starbucks trenta College wine.	Starbucks trenta cup contains an entire bottle of random Starbucks trenta wine.	Starbucks trenta cup contains an entire bottle of random Starbucks trenta college wine.
44	hahaha good news wino starbucks trenta hold bottle	Hahaaha, ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha, ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha	Hahaaha good news Wino Starbucks is holding bottle.	Hahaaha good news Wino Starbucks trenta hold bottle.
44	starbucks trenta size hold entire bottle wine drink	The size of the starbucks trenta contains a whole bottle of wine.	The starbucks trenta size wine contains whole bottles of wine.	The starbucks trenta size contains whole wine bottles.
44	fit entire bottle wine starbucks trenta scary	The whole bottle of spooky Starbucks wine.	The whole bottle of Starbucks wine was creepy.	The entire bottle of Starbucks wine is scary.
44	starbucks trenta size hold entire bottle wine god bless america	Starbucks size trenta contains whole bottle God bless the wine; America.	Starbucks size trenta contains entire bottle of wine.	Starbucks trenta size contains entire bottle of God bless America wine.
44	don care starbucks trenta cup bigger stomach	Don't worry, Starbucks trenta cups bigger stomach.	Don't you worry Starbucks trenta cup bigger stomach.	Don't worry Starbucks trenta cup bigger stomach.
44	tanning iced coffee tazo iced tea hello trenta	Tanned tazo iced coffee, iced tea, hello, trenta.	Iced coffee tan tazo iced tea greeting trenta.	Taco tanned iced coffee tazo iced tea hello trenta.
44	starbucks size trente hold entire bottle wine enjoy	I mean, Starbucks size 30 hold the whole bottle of wine to enjoy.	Starbucks size 30 hold whole bottle of wine enjoy.	Starbucks size 30 hold entire bottle of wine enjoy.
44	starbucks trenta hold entire bottle wine	Starbucks trenta contains a whole bottle of wine.	Starbucks trenta has an entire bottle of wine.	Starbucks trenta wine contains an entire bottle of wine.
44	excess best omg starbucks huge trenta sized drink hold entire bottle wine	It's the best drink in the world and it's the best drink in the world.	L' excess Starbucks omg best giant drink Trenta size contains whole bottle of wine.	An excess of Starbucks all the best huge-sized drink Trenta contains entire bottle of wine.
45	justin bieber jon stewart body snatching victim video	Justin Bieber Jon Stewart was killed removing the victim's video.	Justin Bieber Jon Stewart died taking out the victim's video.	Justin Bieber Jon Stewart removed the video of the victim and died.
45	fantastic wonderful	Wonderful and fantastic.	Wonderful and fantastic!	Yes, wonderful and fantastic.
45	biebs switch body jon stewart	Biebs is switching bodies with Jon Stewart.	Biebs switched bodies with Jon Stewart.	Biebs switching body Jon Stewart.
45	justin bieber jon stewart exchange role mtv news quote day	Justin Bieber Jon Stewart exchanges the new day quote role mtv.	Justin Bieber Jon Stewart exchanges role mtv new day of quotation.	Justin Bieber Jon Stewart exchange the role mtv new day of quotation.
46	read goldman sachs manipulated red light photo industry geico ticket higher insurance rate	You'll be able to enjoy a wide range of entertainment, entertainment and entertainment options.	Reading Goldman is manipulated red light photo industry geico ticket d' higher insurance.	L'read Goldman sachs manipulated red light photo industry geico ticket d' higher insurance.
46	legal news study red light camera save life nwindiana	The latest legal news is studying the red light camera to save Nwindiana's life.	Legal news study red light saving nwindiana life camera.	The legal news study red light camera save nwindiana life.
46	traffic depot update oceanside green light red light camera ticket traffic	Update of the depot on the edge of the island; ocean, green light, red light, camera ticket.	Updating of the traffic depot on the edge of the ocean, green light, red light, ticket camera.	Updating of traffic depot on edge of island; ocean, green light, red light, camera ticket.
46	oceanside will install additional red light camera mid march camera helpful hurtful	Oceanside will also install an additional red-light camera in the middle of the walk.	Oceanside will install an additional red-light camera in the middle of the walkway.	Oceanside will install an additional red light camera in the middle of the walk.
46	traffic depot update study city red light camera fewer fatal accident traffic camera	Updating the depot to study the red city less deadly camera less fatal traffic camera.	Traffic depot update study red city less deadly camera red accident camera.	Traffic depot update study red city less deadly traffic camera red camera accident.
46	study red light camera save life	Study the life-saving red-light camera.	You can study the red-light camera and save your life.	Study red light camera save life.
46	biggest drop fatal crash involving red light running chandler ariz death dropped	The biggest fatality involving a running red light to Chandler Ariz's death came down.	The biggest fatal fall involving a red light running towards Chandler Ariz's death has fallen.	Biggest fatality involving a red light running towards Chandler Ariz's death fell.
46	deadly red light camera return va	I'll have a death-light camera back.	There'll be a deadly red light camera back.	A deadly red light camera will return.
46	red light camera save life budget star ledger editorial board star ledger file photored ligh	A red camera saves your life, a budget ledger, a big book from the editorial board, a big book from the stars, a photogenic light.	A red camera saves life, a budget ledger, an editorial board ledger, a great book of stars, a photogenic light.	Red camera saves life, budget ledger, editorial board ledger, grand book of stars, photogenic light.
47	lady army health initiative model fitness nutrition usa today	The Women's Health Initiative (WHI) of the U.S. Army's Model Fitness Nutrition Service was used today.	The Women's Health Initiative of the Model Army of Fitness Nutrition was used today.	L' women's health initiative of the Army model fitness nutrition used today; hui.
47	michelle obama coming atlanta bob keefe washington lady michelle obama planning travel	Michelle Obama arrives in Atlanta Bob Keefe Washington Lady Michelle Obama plans a trip.	Michelle Obama arrives in Atlanta Bob Keefe Washington, D.C. Lady Michelle Obama is planning a trip.	Michelle Obama arrives in Atlanta Bob Keefe Washington Lady Michelle Obama is planning a trip.
47	obama praise military healthy initiative lady michelle obama visited army largest training	Obama praises the military initiative; Lady Michelle Obama visited the largest formation of the military.	Obama praises the Apos; healthy military initiative Lady Michelle Obama visited the largest formation of the army.	Obama praises it; healthy military initiative Lady Michelle Obama visited the army's largest formation.
47	michelle obama coming atlanta lady discus childhood obesity atl	Michelle Obama arrives in Atlanta, California as a recording artist.	Michelle Obama arrives in Atlanta, a woman who is a discus performer.	Michelle Obama arrives in Atlanta female disco; atl childhood obesity.
47	lady press ahead fitness campaign fort jackson sc obama battling childh	Woman squeezing the Fort Jackson Sc Obama child-fighting fitness campaign.	Woman hurrying fitness campaign Fort Jackson Sc Obama fighting boyhhh.	Women hurry the fitness campaign Fort Jackson Sc Obama fighting childhh.
47	michelle obama coming atlanta	Michelle Obama arrives in Atlanta.	Michelle Obama is coming to Atlanta now.	Michelle Obama's coming to Atlanta.
47	michelle obama visit army find whip couch potato shape	Michelle Obama visits the Maple Army to find whipped potato shapes.	Michelle Obama visits the army find whipped cream in the shape of potatoes.	Michelle Obama visits the apos; army find whipped potato shape.
47	lady press ahead fitness campaign daily caller obama tell abc good morning america	Women press the daily fitness campaign calling on Obama to say hello to the people of the Americas.	Woman hurry daily fitness campaign calling Obama to say hello to Apos; America.	Women press the daily fitness campaign urging Obama to say hello to America.
47	michelle obama atlanta move campaign	Michelle Obama d' Atlanta moving campaign.	Michelle Obama d' Atlanta, moving campaign.	Michelle Obama d' Atlanta, campaign to move.
47	lady obama call move fitness nutrition campaign national	This is what Lady Obama calls a national fitness promotion campaign.	Lady Obama calls this a national fitness promotion campaign.	Lady Obama calls it a national fitness promotion campaign.
47	uk news lady take campaign childhood obesity army base	A journalist from the UK @-@Uni takes the military base of the campaign against children's obesity.	A journalist from the UK takes the military base of the campaign against childhood obesity.	UK journalist @-@United takes military base in campaign against childhood obesity.
47	healthy skepticism wal mart healthy push michelle obama partnered wal mart	Healthy skepticism is associated with healthy Michelle Obama growth.	Healthy skepticism goes hand in hand with healthy Michelle Obama growth.	A healthy skepticism goes hand in hand with a healthy Michelle Obama push.
47	lady focus military family childhood nutrition overstatement chi	It's a great way to get a sense of what it's like to live in a military environment.	Women of concentrated military family on the food of l'apos; childhood chi overestimate dietary chi.	Woman of military family concentration on food; childhood chi over-nutrition chi.
47	michelle obama coming atlanta washington lady michelle obama planning travel atlanta	Michelle Obama comes to Atlanta Washington, Lady Michelle Obama plans a trip to Atlanta.	Michelle Obama is coming to Atlanta, Washington, D.C. Lady Michelle Obama is planning a trip to Atlanta.	Michelle Obama is coming to Atlanta, Washington Lady Michelle Obama is planning a trip to Atlanta.
47	walmart embrace lady nutrition campaign	Walmart s' engages in a Women's Nutrition Campaign.	Walmart s&apos engages in a women's nutrition campaign.	Walmart s' engages in women's nutrition campaign.
47	lady army health initiative model fitness nutrition mimi hall usa today time	L' Women's Health Initiative; Model Army of Fitness and Fitness Mimi Hall used today; time of death; time.	L' women's health initiative of l' army model of physical conditioning mini hall used today; hui de l' time.	L' women's health initiative; model fitness armour mimi hall used today; time; time.
48	three journalist tf detained cairo jan mubarak egypt egipto fb	Three journalists detained in Cairo Jan Mubarak egipto egipto ebgypt fb.	Three journalists detained in Cairo Jan Mubarak egippt egipto fb egypt fb.	Three Cairo detained journalists Jan Mubarak egypt egipto fb egypt fb.
48	update al jazeera english reporting egypt security police arrested al jazeera arabic bureau clief aj journalist cairo	Al-Jazira reports that Egyptian security police have arrested Arabic bureau d&apos reporter ajairo al-Jazira.	Al-Jazira in English reports that Egyptian security police have arrested the Arab bureau reporter ajairo d' al-Jazira.	Al-Jazira in English reports that Egyptian security police arrested ajairo journalist from the Arabic bureau d' al-Jazira.
48	foreign secretary described intimidation harassment journalist unacceptable egypt	The Egyptian Foreign Affairs Minister described the Egyptian journalist's attitude to harassment and harassment as unacceptable.	The Minister of Foreign Affairs described the Egyptian journalist's attitude toward harassment and intimidation as unacceptable.	The Minister of Foreign Affairs described the attitude of the Egyptian journalist toward harassment and intimidation as unacceptable.
48	egypt journalist targeted hilton hotel cairo pro mubarak supporter led army rio	Targeted Egyptian journalist, Hilton Hotel Cairo pro Mubarak supporter, run by the Rio Army.	Targeted Egyptian journalist Hilton Hotel Cairo pro Mubarak supporter led by the Rio Army.	Egyptian journalist targeted Hilton Hotel Cairo pro Mubarak supporter led by Rio Army.
48	list journalist attacked egypt	The journalist on the list, he attacked the apos; Egypt.	The journalist on the list attacked L'apos; Egypt.	The list journalist attacked Apos, Egypt.
48	attack journalist escalate egypt	Scaling up of the Apos; Egypt.	He was a journalist; he was attacked by the climbing of the Apostles.	A journalist from D' an attack on Egypt.
48	yikes list journalist attacked egypt hour abc news	Yikes list attacked Egyptian Hour Press Abc News.	Yikes attacked Egyptian hour journalists list abc news.	Yikes list journalist attacked Egyptian hour abc news abc.
48	nut war medium continues al jazeera journalist arrested cairo camera equipment seized egypt jan aljazeera	The journalist d' Al-Jazira has stopped Cairo's seized camera equipment in Egypt.	Cairo reporter-Jazira stopped camera equipment seized in Egypt Jan al-Jazira.	Egyptian journalist d' Al-Jazira has stopped Cairo camera equipment seized in Egypt Jan al-Jazira.
48	guardian journalist arrested beaten egypt	Journalist arrested Egypt beaten.	Keeper journalist arrested in the Apos; Egypt beaten.	Guard journalist arrested l' beaten Egypt.
48	day bloody clash egypt foreign journalist arrested	D'apos Day, bloody foreign Egyptian journalist arrested.	D&apos day; bloody Egyptian foreign journalist clash arrested.	D'apos day; Egyptian foreign journalist arrested bloody clash.
48	alarabiya crew attacked pro mubarak protester cairo egypt	Alarabiya attacked Egypt's pro-Mubarak protester.	Alarabiya attacked pro-Mubarak protester cairo egypt.	L' Apos crew; Alarabiya attacked pro protester Mubarak cairo egypt.
48	thing rapidly degenerating egypt attack journalist cairo egypt	What quickly degenerates is the Egyptian journalist's attack on Cairo, Egypt.	What quickly degenerates is the attack of the Egyptian journalist on the island of Cairo, Egypt.	What is rapidly degenerating is the attack on the Egyptian journalist on Cairo.
48	journalist harassed attacked detained cairo nigh cnn ben wedema	He's a stalker who's been held in detention in Cairo, near cnnnn ben wedema.	Harassed journalist detained in Cairo, near cnnnn ben wedema.	Journalist harassed attacked detained in Cairo near cnnnn ben wedema.
48	al jazeera english journalist released detained equipment held	He also said that he wanted to be able to take part in the debate.	The English journalist d' Al Jazeera released the detained material.	English journalist d' Al Jazeera released detained material.
48	reporter including cnn cooper beaten egypt manila bulletin newspaper online	CNN Cooper beat Egyptian online newspaper Manila.	A journalist whose CNN Cooper beat the online Egyptian newspaper Manila.	Journalist whose CNN Cooper has beaten the online Egyptian newspaper Manila.
48	ap journalist attacked mob detained cairo damn liberal medium front line history	Reporter ap attacked mafia detained cairo-fucking liberal media from l' front-line story.	Reporter ap attacked detained cairo mafia fucking liberal media from l' frontline story.	Ap journalist attacked detained cairo mafia fucking liberal media from l' frontline story.
48	list journalist hurt harassed egypt	Hurled the apos; Egypt harassed.	Journalist on the list injured the apos; Egypt harassed.	The list journalist has been harassing Egypt.
48	egypt crack foreign journalist guardian jan	Foreign journalist's caretaker Jan.	The foreign journalist Jan's keeper.	The guardian of the foreign journalist Jan.
48	horrible journalist attacked detained egypt yahoo news	L' horrible journalist has attacked the apos; Egyptian news yahoo detained.	L' horrible journalist attacked the apos; Egyptian news yahoo detained.	L' horrible journalist attacked the detained Egyptian yahoo news.
48	journalist beaten threatened egypt	Beat-up journalist threatens apos; Egypt to death.	A battered journalist threatened Egypt with death.	A journalist who was beaten threatened Apos; Egypt with death.
48	ahmed mansour prominent journalist beaten arrested egypt aljazeera jan	Ahmed Mansour, eminent journalist, beaten, arrested Egypt Aljazeera Jan.	Eminent journalist Ahmed Mansour, beaten, arrested Egypt Aljazeera Jan.	Egypt Aljazeera Jan was arrested by prominent journalist Ahmed Mansour, who was beaten.
48	ki medium journalist egypt targeted beaten detained mubarak support	Middle-Ki journalists targeted Egyptian battered support detained Mubarak.	Middle-Ki Egyptian journalist targeted beaten support detained Mubarak.	Middle ki Egyptian journalist targeted beaten detained Mubarak support.
48	attack journalist send message lt gt cnbc twitter lt gt	It's a good idea to send a message to the editor.	The journalist d' attacks sends a message to gt gt cnbc twitter gt gt.	Attack sends a message to gt cnbc twitter gt gt.
48	reporter attacked attack journalist send message	A journalist from Apos; attacked journalist from Apos; attacked journalist from Apos; attacked journalist from Apos; attacked journalist from Apos; sent a message to Apos; help from Apos; a message.	A journalist attacked journalist D'apos; attacked journalist; attacked journalist J' sent a message to Apos; help from apos; a message.	A journalist d' attack journalist d' attack d' attack journalist j' sent a message to the apos; help d' message.
48	security news medium fire egypt	Egyptian Fire Safety News.	Egyptian fire media safety news.	Egyptian fire media security news.
48	reporting arrest journalist cairo	Arrested in Cairo.	Journalist arrested in Cairo.	Newspaper in a state of repair; arrest in Cairo.
48	journalist attacked cairo journalist covering scene ground target	A journalist assaulted a Cairo journalist who was taking targets on the ground.	A journalist attacked a Cairo journalist who was shooting at targets on the ground.	A journalist attacked a Cairo journalist who was occupying ground targets.
48	condemns attack journalist egypt ap ap white house spokesman robert gibbs systematic	Condemns Egyptian attacker Robert Gibbs-White House spokesman.	Condemns Egyptian journalist d&apos attack Robert Gibbs-White House spokesman.	Condemns the journalist d' Egyptian attack Robert Gibbs, portal-White House word.
48	reporter egypt broad assault	The Egyptian reporter's launched a full-scale assault.	The Egyptian reporter has launched a full-scale assault.	Egyptian reporter launched a full-scale assault.
48	mt committee protect journalist rpts st journo die covering egypt jan	Egyptian journalists are occupied by the Committee for the Protection of Journalists.	The Committee for the Protection of S&apos Journalists employs Egyptian journalists.	The committee to protect journalists s' occupies Egyptian journalists.
48	journalist targeted pro mubarak force egypt video	The reporter targeted the video of Mubarak's force in Egypt.	The journalist targeted video footage of Mubarak's force in Egypt.	The journalist targeted Mubarak's force video in Egypt.
48	egypt turn internet long broadcast violence strongarms journalist leave	Egypte Internet tour long duration of diffusion of the violence; journalists from the D' handguns leave.	Egypt Internet tour long duration of diffusion of violence journalists d' handguns leave.	Egypte Internet tour long duration of violence dissemination, journalists d' handguns leave.
48	mte time cpj journalist targeted egypt	Egypt was the target of the newsmagazine.	This time cpj journalist has targeted Egypt.	Mte time cpj journalist targeted Egypt.
48	network anchor leave egypta amid crackdown increased violence intimidation directed journalist	L&apos, the channel's host, is leaving Egypt in a context of increased repression of intimidating journalists.	Lapos; host of the channel is leaving the apostles; egypta in a context of increased repression of violence against intimidating journalists.	L' anchor of the channel leaves the apos; egypta in a context of increased repression of violence directed against intimidating journalists.
48	journalist beaten website blocked amid protest egypt cpj	Journalist bat site blocked in the midst of Egyptian cpjj protest.	Beat journalist blocked site in the middle of the Egyptian protest cpjj.	Blocked blogger blocked amid Egyptian protest cpjj.
48	egyptian army start rounding journalist jpost	L&apos, the Egyptian army, began to gather the journalist Jpost.	L' Egyptian army begins to gather the journalist Jpost.	The Egyptian army began rounding up journalist Jpost.
48	canadian journalist detained harassed foreign journalist targeted cairo	Canadian journalist detained, foreign journalist harassed, targeted cairo.	Stalked foreign journalist detained Canadian journalist targeted Cairo.	Canadian journalist detained harassed foreign journalist targeted Cairo.
48	cpj egypt instigates medium blackout police target journalist	Cpj egypt causes the police target's average blackout.	Cpj egypt will cause the average blackout of the target police journalist.	Cpj egypt causes average blackout of target police journalist.
48	egyptian army start rounding journalist egyptian military rounded journalist thursday	L&apos, the Egyptian army, began to gather the Egyptian military journalists together on Thursday.	The Egyptian army begins to gather the Egyptian military journalists gathered on Thursday.	The Egyptian army begins rounding up Egyptian military journalists for a meeting on Thursday.
48	ynet egypt police target reporter israel	Ynet egypt font israel israel.com.	Ynet egypt font reporter target israel israel.	Ynet egypt target police reporter israel israel.
48	egyptian demonstrator attack journalist cnn will madness	The Egyptian journalist at the airport, who had been attacked by a protester, is about to go crazy.	Egyptian journalist de l'apos; attacked Dapos; a protester will go mad.	Egyptian journalist de l'apos; attack d'apos; a protester will go mad.
48	risk taker mike cairo january afp egypt police arrest al jazeera english journalist channel	Risk taking Egyptian police Cairo January afp Egyptian arrest al Jazeera English TV journalist al Jazeera.	Taking risks mike Cairo afp Egyptian police January arrest al Jazeera English journalist TV channel al Jazeera.	Risk taking mike Cairo Afp Egyptian police arrest al Jazeera English TV channel al Jazeera.
48	list journalist threatened attacked detained reporting egypt	The reporter on the list threatened to kill prisoners in Egypt.	The journalist on the list threatened to kill prisoners in Egypt.	The list journalist threatened to assassinate prisoners in Egypt.
48	gang hunt journalist right worker egypt nytimes jatkhs	Gang-hunting journalist, right-wing egypt-jatkhs sometimes jatkhs.	Gang-hunting journalist, right-wing egypto-jatkhs sometimes jatkhs.	Gang-hunting journalist, right-wing worker and egypto-jatkhs sometimes jatkhs.
48	french journalist arrested cairo	Cairo was arrested by the French journalist.	The French journalist has arrested Cairo.	French journalist arrested Cairo.
48	skipped romanian crew journalist threatened attacked detained reporting egypt	A journalist from the Romanian crew has dropped, threatening to assault a detainee who is bringing home the apo; Egypt.	A journalist from the Romanian crew has dropped out of prison, threatening to assault an inmate who is reporting to the prison; Egypt.	A Romanian crew journalist dropped threatening to assault a prisoner who is bringing home the apo; Egypt.
48	egypt protest gauntlet officer beating stick	An Egyptian officer batting a stick protesting gantelet.	Gantelet of protest Egyptian officer beating.	Egyptian protest gantelet officer beating stick.
48	journalist attacked detained egypt big hollywood	The reporter just attacked the fat Hollywood man being held in Egypt.	The reporter attacked the Hollywood fathead held in Egypt.	The journalist attacked the fat Hollywood man held in Egypt.
48	happy changed headline egyptian protester attack foreign journalist prejudicial	Egyptian protester attacks damaging foreign journalist.	Happily changing the title An Egyptian protester attacks a foreign journalist.	Happy title change Egyptian protester attacks damaging foreign journalist.
48	engel today egyptian unrest continues journalist targeted egypt jan	It's the first time I've heard of the Egyptians, and it's the first time I've heard of them.	L' Egyptian agitation d' today; ongoing The journalist targeted the Jan of Egypt.	L' agitation egyptian d' today; hui continua The journalist targeted the Egyptian Jan.
48	journalist van trouw mishandeld ro nieuws	I'm a journalist, and I'm a journalist.	Journalist van trouw mishandeld ro nieuws.	Journalist van trouw mishandeld ro nieuws.
48	egyptian journalist dy gunshot wound egyptian reporter shot clash week ago died	The Egyptian journalist DY GSW The Egyptian journalist who was shot and killed died a week ago.	Egyptian journalist DY Gunshot wound Egyptian journalist shot dead a week ago.	Egyptian journalist DY Gunshot wound Egyptian journalist was shot and died a week ago.
48	journalist egypt brutally silenced equipment confiscated freedom press	The Egyptian journalists brutally silenced the equipment that had been confiscated from the free press.	Egyptian journalists brutally silenced l' equipment confiscated from the free press.	Egyptian journalists brutally silenced equipment confiscated from the free press.
48	egyptian army start rounding journalist egypt jan medium journalist	L&apos, the Egyptian army, began to arrest the Egyptian journalist Jan, an average journalist.	L' Egyptian army starts to arrest the Egyptian journalist Jan average journalist.	The Egyptian army begins arresting Egyptian journalist Jan Middleman.
48	guardian journalist arrested beaten alongside protester egypt secretly record ordeal	Beaten by an Egyptian protester secretly taping the proof.	Journalist arrested guard beaten alongside apos; an Egyptian protester secretly records the event.	A journalist arrested beaten alongside of apos; an Egyptian protester secretly records the proof.
48	al jazeera journalist detained cairo police hotel room equipment confiscated jan	Jazeera was detained in Cairo, and the equipment of the hotel was confiscated Jan.	Journalist d' Al Jazeera, detained in Cairo, apos; equipment in room d' police hotel was confiscated Jan.	Al Jazeera detained in Cairo, Apos room equipment; police hotel was confiscated Jan.
48	cbc news foreign journalist attacked egypt	Foreign journalists from the CBC attacked L'apos; Egypt.	Egyptians were attacked by foreign CBC journalists.	CBC foreign journalists attacked l'apos; Egypt.
48	american journalist bloodied detained egyptian force dozen foreign journalist egypt attac	Bloody American journalist detained by Egyptian forces dozens of Egyptian foreign journalists attacked.	Bloody American journalist detained Egyptian force dozens of foreign Egyptian journalists attacked.	American journalist bloodied detained Egyptian force dozens of foreign Egyptian journalists attacked.
48	egyptian army start rounding journalist	L' army of the Egyptians starts to gather the journalists.	L' Egyptian army begins to gather the journalists.	L' Egyptian army starts gathering journalists.
48	foreign policy day hunting journalist ashraf khalil	On foreign-policy day, journalist Ashraf Khalil is hunting.	Journalist Ashraf Khalil hunts on foreign policy day.	On foreign policy day, journalist Ashraf Khalil hunts.
48	yikes egyptian army start rounding journalist	L&apos, the Egyptian army, began to arrest journalists.	L' army of Egyptians begins to arrest journalists.	L' Egyptian army starts arresting journalists.
48	journalist attacked detained egypt rtdna condemns assault	The journalist attacked the Egyptian detainee, Rtdna, who had been held in prison, condemning the attack.	The journalist attacked the apartment; Egyptian detained rtdna condemns the assault.	The journalist attacked detained Egyptian rtdna condemns the aggression.
48	breaking al jazeera journalist arrested cairo egypt crowd grows tahrir	It's the first time in the history of the world that you've had a good time.	Arrest the journalist d' Al Jazeera in Cairo The Egyptian mob cultivates tahrir.	Arresting journalist d' Al Jazeera in Cairo Egyptian crowd cultivates tahrir.
48	al jazeera english journalist freed cairo state dep asked release egypt jan	Al Jazeera, a British journalist who was released from Cairo, has called for Jan Egyptians to be released.	Al Jazeera, a liberated English journalist from Cairo, called for Jan Egyptien's release.	Al Jazeera, a British journalist released from Cairo, called for the release of Jan Egyptien.
48	desperate gasp dying regime list journalist detained beaten egypt	The desperate list of the dying prison-afflicted journalist in Egypt.	The desperate list of the dying regime journalist detained beaten in Egypt.	The desperate list of dying regime journalist detained beaten in Egypt.
48	amazing guardian journalist record audio arrest transport egypt police van jan	An unbelievable journalist and security guard recorded the video; arresting the transport of the Egyptian police.	An amazing newswire records the arrest of the Egyptian police van Jan.	Incredible journalist guard tapes apos; audio arrest transport of the Egyptian police van Jan.
48	list journalist beaten jailed missing	List of beaten journalists who have been imprisoned.	List of imprisoned journalists beaten to death.	List of beaten journalists missing in prison.
48	extraordinary stuff arrested beaten egypt police	Extraordinary thing has been stopped and it's beaten the Egyptian police.	Something extraordinary stopped beat the Egyptian police.	Something extraordinary has been arrested has beaten the Egyptian police.
48	abc news compiled list journalist threatened attacked detained egypt	The list of journalists at risk from the attack on the Apostles, Egypt, has been compiled.	L' newsabc compiled a list of journalists threatened by Egypt detained.	The abc news compiled a list of journalists threatened with apo attacks; Egypt detained.
48	bloodied beaten bbc journalist camera report going hospital egypt democracynow	A battered and bloody BBC reporter's video camera announces that the Egyptian hospital is now a democracy.	A battered and bloody BBC reporter's camera announces that the Egyptian hospital is now a democracy.	BBC's battered and bloody journalist camera reports that the Egyptian hospital is now a democracy.
48	wash post tweet cairo bureau chief photographer reportedly arrested egypt	It is alleged that the chief photographer of the office in Cairo stopped l'apos; Egypt.	The chief photographer of the Cairo office arrested l'apos; Egypt.	The Cairo office's chief photographer reportedly arrested l'apos; Egypt.
48	mubarak silencing voice egypt journalist targeted read jan tahrir	Mubarak silent voice Egyptian targeted journalist read Jan tahrir Jan tahrir.	Mubarak silent Egyptian journalist targeted voice read Jan tahrir Jan tahrir.	Mubarak silent voice Egyptian journalist targeted read Jan tahrir Jan tahrir.
48	egyptian military rounding journalist egypt pm issue apology star egypt live blog jan	L' Egyptian army round up Egyptian journalist pm d' blogger apologies live Egyptian star Jan.	L' army Egyptian rounded Egyptian journalist pm d' apologies Egyptian star live blog Jan.	L' Egyptian army rounded Egyptian journalist pm d' apology star Egyptian live blog Jan.
48	reporter attacked attack journalist send message	A journalist from Apos; attacked journalist from Apos; attacked journalist from Apos; attacked journalist from Apos; attacked journalist from Apos; sent a message to Apos; help from Apos; a message.	A journalist attacked journalist D'apos; attacked journalist; attacked journalist J' sent a message to Apos; help from apos; a message.	A journalist d' attack journalist d' attack d' attack journalist j' sent a message to the apos; help d' message.
48	hillary clinton egypt state hillary clinton treatment journalist coveri	Hillary Clinton in Egypt Hillary Clinton's treatment of covert journalist.	Hillary Clinton in Egypt Hillary clinton treatment journalist coveri cover.	Hillary Clinton in Egypt Hillary clinton treatment journalist coveri cover.
48	clinton bugun misir hk nededi secretary clinton condemns attack demonstrator journalist egypt vide jan	In the meantime, the blogosphere is being used as a source of news and information for the blogosphere.	Clinton bugun betir hk nedi clinton secretary condemns the apos; Egyptian Demo journalist attack Jan video.	The clinton bugun betir hk nededi clinton secretary condemns the apos; attack Egyptian demonstration journalist Jan video.
48	fox news correspondent beaten hospitalized fleeing molotov cocktail egypt video treated spy military	Correspondent of hospitalized Fox News fleeing the Egyptian Molotov video called military espionage.	Correspondent of Fox News battered hospitalized fleeing the Egyptian Molotov cocktail video treated military espionage.	Correspondent for Fox News hospitalized fleeing the cocktail Molotov Egyptian video treated military espionage.
48	journalist return central cairo threat remain	The threat from the reporter back in Cairo is still central.	The threat from the journalist who has just returned to Cairo remains central.	The threat from the returning journalist remains central.
48	catalan tv team foreign journalist detained military police cairo	He is also a member of the International Federation of Journalists (IFPI) and the International Federation of Journalists.	Foreign journalist of l' Catalan television crew detained by military police in Cairo.	Catalan television team detained by the military police in Cairo.
48	pro mubarak rioter chase reporter cairo hotel beaten threatened beheading	Pro Mubarak Rioter Chase cairo reporter battered hotel is threatening beheading.	Pro Mubarak Rioter Chase reporter cairo beaten hotel threatens beheading.	Pro Mubarak Rioter Chase reporter cairo hotel is threatened with beheading.
49	espn nba celtic kendrick perkins knee surgery will season debut tuesday cavalier celtic	The first Celtic cavalry season will be the Celtic Celtic Perkins Celtic Kendrick Perkins knee surgery.	Celtic Spaniard Kendrick Perkins' knee surgery will be the first Celtic cavalry season on Tuesday.	Kendrick Perkins celtic espn nba celtic knee surgery will be the first season on the Celtic horse Tuesday.
49	sending prayer marquis daniel boston celtic pray going okxo	Send Marquis prayers Daniel Boston Celtic praying okxo.	Send marquis prayers Daniel Boston Celtic okxo prayer.	To send marquis prayers Daniel Boston Celtic pray okxo.
49	ainge team month nba trade deadline celtic president basketball	One month; NBA deadline; exchange Celtic president basketball-ball.	One month from now; team of the NBA deadline; exchange Celtic president basketball-ball.	A month ago; NBA team deadline; Celtic basketball president exchange-ball.
49	videotwitter net boston celtic kendrick perkins play cleveland cavalier kendrick perkins coming	Video producer Boston Celtic Kendrick Perkins playing Cleveland rider Kendrick Perkins come on.	Video producer net Boston Celtic Kendrick Perkins play Cleveland horseman Kendrick Perkins come.	Video net Boston Celtic Kendrick Perkins play Cleveland cavalier Kendrick Perkins come.
49	uploaded youtube video nba final lakers celtic game memory highlig	J' put online youtube video nba final highlig lakers celtic game memory.	J' have put online youtube video nba final lakers celtic game memory highlig.	J&apos have uploaded youtube video nba final lakers celtic game memory highlig.
49	tceltics davis leaf game sun sore hamstring boston celtic nbanewsfeed	Tceltics advice foliage soothing sun play boston bamstring celtic nbanewsfeed.	Tceltics advice soothing sun-gaming hamstring boston celtic nbanewsfeed foliage.	Tceltics davis soothing sun game hamstring boston celtic nbanewsfeed foliage.
49	celtic marquis daniel leaf game stretcher	The Celtic marquis, Daniel Buttercup, on a stretcher.	The Celtic Marquis Daniel Buttercup stretcher game.	Celtic marquis Daniel Buttercup stretcher game.
49	boston celtic kendrick perkins play cleveland cavalier ad	Boston Celtic Kendrick Perkins plays Cleveland Cavalier Adventure.	Boston Celtic Kendrick Perkins plays Cleveland Cavalier Adventure.	Boston Celtic Kendrick Perkins will play Cleveland Cavalier Adventure.
49	boston celtic jermaine neal arthroscopic knee surgery recovery period week espn nba	Boston neo-arthroscopic neo-jerry surgery knee recovery period spn nba week.	Boston celtic jermaine neal arthroscopic knee surgery week-long recovery period.	Boston celtic jermaine neal arthroscopic knee surgery period spn nba week.
49	doc river ll wait chris forsberg boston celtic captain paul pierce departed thursday	"""Doc River II is waiting for Chris Boston Celtic,"" Captain Paul Pierce left on Thursday."	Doc River II awaits Chris Boston Celtic, Captain Paul Pierce left Thursday.	Doc River II is expecting Chris Berg Boston Celtic, and Captain Paul Pierce departed Thursday.
50	half men charlie sheen lost teeth	Half the men, Charlie Sheen, lost teeth.	Half the men Charlie Sheen lost teeth.	Half of Charlie Sheen's men have lost teeth in the process.
50	exclusive charlie sheen doesn rehab charlie sheen refusing enter reh	Charlie Sheen does not re-educate Charlie Sheen, who refuses to go back to school.	Charlie Sheen doesn't re-educate Charlie Sheen, refusing to go into re-education.	Charlie Sheen does not re-educate Charlie Sheen refusing to enter re-education.
50	television network cbs write episode half men include charlie sheen	TV cbs write mi episode-men include sheen charlie.	The TV cbs include charlie sheen on the cover of the episode mi-men.	The TV cbs write episode mi-men include charlie sheen.
50	drug rehab work charlie sheen reportedly receiving help clearest benefit pat	Charlie Sheen's rehab work would've been helped.	Charlie Sheen's rehab work would have been helped.	They say that Charlie Sheen's rehab work got some help.
50	porn star kacey jordan wild charlie sheen party scene ve destructive	Kacey porn star Jordan Wild Charlie Sheen Scene party.	Porn star kacey jordan Wild Charlie Sheen Scene of Destruction party.	The porn star kacey jordan jordan wild charlie sheen scene-destruction party.
50	charlie sheen leaf hospital medical emergency	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	Charlie Sheen leaf, medical emergency at the hospital.	Charlie Sheen leaf medical emergency at the hospital.
50	charlie sheen leaf hospital medical emergency	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	Charlie Sheen leaf, medical emergency at the hospital.	Charlie Sheen leaf medical emergency at the hospital.
50	charlie sheen rehabs filed charlie sheen nurse	Charlie Sheen dropped off Charlie Sheen Nursing.	Charlie Sheen dropped off Charlie Sheen Nursing.	Charlie sheen dropped off charlie sheen nursing.
50	teamfollowback charlie sheen rehab tv hold los angeles reuters half aday	The team follows Charlie Sheen Rehab on TV and holds Los Angeles Reuters at mi-time.	L' the team follows Charlie Sheen Rehab on TV and holds Los Angeles Reuters at mi @-@time.	L' team follows Charlie Sheen Rehab on TV and holds up Los Angeles Reuters at mi @-@time.
50	charlie sheen leaf hospital medical emergency	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	Charlie Sheen leaf, medical emergency at the hospital.	Charlie Sheen leaf medical emergency at the hospital.
50	charlie sheen abuse	I think Charlie Sheen's pushing it.	Charlie Sheen's being abusive.	Well, Charlie Sheen's pushing it.
50	charlie sheen abuse	I think Charlie Sheen's pushing it.	Charlie Sheen's being abusive.	Well, Charlie Sheen's pushing it.
50	dtn hollywood charlie sheen troubled timeline charlie sheen trouble pretty alw	Charlie Sheen troubled in time Charlie troubled in time.	Dtn Hollywood Charlie Sheen troubled in time Charlie troubled in time.	Dtn Hollywood Charlie Sheen... troubled in time Charlie troubled in time.
50	whatproblem charlie sheen enter rehab cbs halt production hit series	Oh, what a problem Charlie Sheen getting into rehab cbs stopping the production series of production successes.	What a problem Charlie Sheen getting into rehab cbs stopping production series of production successes.	What a problem Charlie Sheen getting into rehab cbs stopping production hit series.
50	hollywood charlie sheen men team help biggest star	Hollywood Charlie Sheen helps the biggest star.	L' team of apos; Hollywood Charlie Sheen helps the biggest star.	L' team d' Hollywood Charlie Sheen helps the biggest star in the world.
50	sky news charlie sheen enters rehab hospital well	This is the first time Charlie Sheen has ever been in a rehab hospital.	News from the skies Charlie Sheen enters the rehab hospital.	Heavenly news Charlie Sheen enters rehab hospital.
50	charlie rating soar big bonus short rehab	L' Charlie's evaluation is driving up the rehab bonus.	L' Charlie's evaluation makes the bonus of rehab soar.	Charlie's evaluation makes the rehab bonus skyrocket.
51	death rock roll sunday farmer market sunday farmer market crisis bu	Death rock roll on Sunday Farm Market on Sunday Farm Market on Sunday Farm Market Drunk Market Crisis.	Death rock roll on farm Sunday market on farm Sunday market on farm drunk Sunday crisis market.	Death rock roll on Sunday farmer market on Sunday farmer market on farmer drunk market crisis Sunday.
51	molto vega farmer market shut county	The Molto Vega Farmers Market has closed the county.	The farmers' market in Molto Vega has shut down the county.	The Molto Vega farmers' market shut the county down.
51	love farmer market long beach	J' loves the long farm market beach.	J' loves the long beach of the farmers market.	J' loves long beach of farmers market.
52	djokovic murray australian open title ap	Opening title:Djokovic Murray Australia.	The title of the book is open to the public.	Djokovic Australian Murray open title ap ap.
52	murray congratulation djokovic winning men australianopen championship nice work going bed	Murray jjokovic winning australianopen championship men's jokovic beautiful work go to bed.	Murray djokovic congratulations winning men australianopen championship men beautiful work go to bed.	Murray congratulations djokovic winning men australianopen championship beautiful work go to bed.
52	yr russian won australian open	Your Russian wins the Open D' Australia.	Your Russian has won l' Open d' Australia.	Your Russian won the apos; Open d' Australia.
52	djokovic murray australian open final interesting match novak	This is the last game of the game and the last game of the game.	Australian Murray Djokovic Open Final match interesting novak match.	Djokovic Australian Murray Open interesting novak final match.
52	long awaited era djokovic australianopen replay	L' Australian jokovic long-awaited open replay Australian open replay era.	L' long-awaited australian djokovic open replay Australian open replay era.	L' era long awaited djokovic australian open replay australian open replay.
52	murray miss open title	Murray's still missing the open title.	Murray misses his open title.	Murray misses the open headline.
52	novak djokovic win australian open well deserved played amazing couldn help feel andy murray	Novak djokovic Australian open-played surprisingly well-deserved Novak djokovic might help you feel Andy Murray.	Novak djokovic win Australian open play well deserved surprisingly might help to smell Andy Murray.	Novak djokovic win Australian open play well deserved surprisingly might help to feel Andy Murray.
52	djokovic murray australian open title ap	Opening title:Djokovic Murray Australia.	The title of the book is open to the public.	Djokovic Australian Murray open title ap ap.
52	tennis star hoping third time lucky scottish tennis star andy murray set break duck grand	Tennis star Andy Murray is hoping that the third time, Scottish tennis star Andy Murray has staged the big duck break.	The tennis star hopes that the third time, Scottish tennis star Andy Murray staged the big break duck.	Tennis star hopes Scottish tennis star Andy Murray staged the big break duck for the third time.
52	don djokovic pleb tennis equivalent bum fucking murray moment australianopen	Don djokovic pleb tennis is like a bum-fucking-murray australianopen.	Don djokovic pleb tennis equals bum fucking australianopen murray moment.	Don djokovic pleb tennis equivalent bum fucking moment australianopen murray.
52	win djokovic won australian open	Winning the Australian Open Jokovic Championship.	Winning djokovic won Australian Open.	To win djokovic won Australian Open.
52	holy ball bloody omg novak djokovic australian open	D&apos name; a saint name; d&apos name; an Australian open djokovic novak.	Name d&apos, name d&apos, an open Australian djokovic novak.	Name d' saint, name d' an Australian novak djokovic open.
52	yeahboy nadal australianopen djokovic murray	Yup, yup, yup, yup, yup.	Yeahboy nadal australianopen djokovic murray?	Yeahboy nadal australianopen djokovic murray.
52	djokovic murray australian open ap	Djokovic Murray from Australia.	Djokovic Australian Murray open after open.	Australia's Djokovic Murray open ap ap open.
52	murray djokovic happened	Murray Djokovic s&apos is produced.	Murray Djokovic s&apos, is produced.	Murray Djokovic s&apos is the name of the company.
52	novak australian open champion	Australian Champion of D' opening day Novak.	Australian champion d' openness novak.	Australian champion d' novak opening.
52	murray play final pressure	Murray play the final pressure.	Murray to play final pressure.	Murray play final pressure.
52	game set match novak djokovic grand slam defend	Game set novak djokovic great slam defend.	Game set match novak djokovic big slam defend.	Game set match novak djokovic grand slam defend.
52	watch australian open men tennis final live online will history andy murray	Watching the online open Australian men's tennis finals live will be l' story Andy Murray.	Watching the finals of Australian men's tennis open live online will be l' story Andy Murray.	Watching the Australian men's tennis finals live online will be Andy Murray's story.
52	congratulation novak djokovic winning australian open tennis final melbourne played fantastic game	Congratulations novak djokovic Australian Open Final Melbourne played a fantastic game.	Congratulations novak djokovic Australian Open tennis final winner Melbourne played a fantastic game.	Congratulations novak djokovic winner Open tennis final Melbourne played a fantastic game.
52	open golf djokovic murray australian open title cbc	Open djokovic golf murray Australian title open cbc.	Open djokovic Australian murray golf open title cbc.	Open golf djokovic murray Australian title open cbc.
52	mouratoglou murray djokovic classic yahoo	Classic yahoo yahoo yahoo murray djokovic mortatoglou.	Mortatoglou murray djokovic classic yahoo yahoo.	Deathoglou murray djokovic classic yahoo yahoo.
52	australian open final novak djokovic andy murray live blog bleacher report contributor scott	Australian open novak final djokovic Andy Murray live blog blacher blog contributor report Scott.	Australian open novak final djokovic Andy Murray live blog blacher scott contributor report.	Australian open novak final djokovic Andy Murray live blog blacher report contributor scott.
52	andy murray australian open final will face djokovic atptennis yeg	Andy Murray Australian Open Final will face atptennis yeg djokovic.	Australian Open Final Andy Murray will face djokovic atptennis yeg.	Andy Murray Australian Open Final will face djokovic atptennis yeg.
52	andy murray loses australian open final tennis ausopen	Murray lost the Australian Open Tennis Final.	Andy Murray loses the Australian Open Tennis Final match.	Andy Murray loses the Australian open tennis finals.
52	tennis murray set djokovic final andy murray battle reach australian open men single	Tennis Murray set djokovic final Andy Murray battle to reach the Australian men's unmarried and open Australian men.	Tennis Murray set djokovic final Andy Murray battle to reach Australian open unmarried men.	Tennis Murray set djokovic final Andy Murray battle to reach open Australian men singles.
52	murray mania sweep uk good luck message flood andy murray scottish tennis star play	Murray Mania sweeps uk message of good luck flood Andy Murray Scot Scottish game of tennis star.	Murray Mania sweeps uk message of good luck flood Andy Murray Scot Scottish tennis star game.	Murray Mania sweeps uk good luck flood message Andy Murray Scot Scottish tennis star game.
52	djokovic british hope fading usual sorus murray	Jokovic l' l&apos, l&apos, l&apos, l&apos, l&apos, l&apos, l&apos.	Djokovic l' British hope s' fades away; habitual sorus murray.	Djokovic l' British hope s' habitual murray sorus.
52	djokovic thrash murray win australian open	Djokovic Thrash Murray wins the race in Australia.	Djokovic Thrash Murray win Australian Open.	Djokovic Thrash Murray win open Australian.
52	australian open grand slam final live djokovic win rmang	Australian Open Grand Slam final live djokovic will win rmang rmang.	Australian open final grand slam live djokovic win rmang rmang.	Australian grand open slam final live djokovic win rmang rmang.
52	tennis murray crushed djokovic awesomeness murray clinch st break point hope alive	Murray Tennis Crushed djokovic Awesomeness Murray clinch St break hope point alive.	Murray Tennis crushed djokovic awesome live Murray clinch St break point hope.	Tennis Murray crushed djokovic awesome Murray clinch St break point hope alive.
52	congrats novak djokovic played brilliant tennis definitely deserve title	Congratulations novak djokovic playing Brilliant Tennis certainly deserves the title.	Congratulations djokovic novak played brilliant tennis certainly deserves the title.	Congratulations novak djokovic played brilliant tennis deserves the title.
52	dreamed men ship game ausopen murray djokovic great showdown	Ausopen Murray Djokovic, the dream man game, went through a great ordeal of strength.	Ausopen Murray Djokovic, the game of l' dream man, went through a great ordeal of strength.	Ausopen Murray Djokovic, the game of l&apos, went through a great ordeal.
52	djokovic win second set leading stage murray mum shell shocked	Djokovic wins second plateau murray Mum Shell shocked.	Djokovic win second murray plateau Mum Shell shocked.	Djokovic win second murray mum shell plateau shocked.
52	novak djokovic champion australian open	Novak Djokovic Australian Champion is open.	Novak djokovic Australian champion open.	Novak djokovic Australian champion open for business.
52	novak won australian open champion gotta beat champion	And Novak won the Australian Open Champion Must Beat the Champion.	Novak won Australian Open Champion to beat Champion.	Novak won Australian open champion must beat champion.
52	murray djokovic battle fill vacuum	The Battle of Murray Djokovic has filled the void.	The gap is filled by the battle of Murray Djokovic.	Murray Djokovic's battle fills the void.
52	djokovic longer slam wonder novak djokovic enjoyed crushing australian open final triumph andy murray	Djokovic longer novak djokovic novak wonder slam enjoyed the final Australian open triumph overwhelming Andy Murray.	Djokovic longer slam merveille novak djokovic enjoyed the final Australian open triumph, crushing Andy Murray.	Djokovic longer slam merveille novak djokovic enjoyed Andy Murray's overwhelming open final triumph.
52	australian open men final andy murray novak djokovic	Australian Open Men's Final Andy Murray Novak djokovic.	Australian Open Men Andy Murray Novak djokovic final.	Final Australian open men Andy Murray Novak djokovic.
52	tomorrow australian open tennis final men andy murray navok djojovic ganna win murray fan murray	Tomorrow Australian men's tennis opening final and Murray Navok djojovic ganna winning men's tennis Murray fan murray.	Tomorrow will open tennis finals for men and Murray Navok djojovic ganna win the Murray fan murray.	Tomorrow Australian open tennis final men and Murray Navok djojovic ganna win Murray fan murray.
53	love khloe kardashian	J&apos loves Khloe Kardashian.	J' adores Khloe Kardashian.	J' adore the Khloe Kardashian.
53	hate kim kardashian snookie funny	I hate funny snookie kim kardashian.	I hate funky kim kardashian snookie.	I hate kim kardashian snookie fun.
53	keeping wit kardashians mystery hollywood dead	Keeping the spirit of Kardashians... a Hollywood mystery dead.	Keep the apos; spirit Kardashians mystery Hollywood dead.	Kardashians' spirit, Kardashians mystery Hollywood dead.
53	ohhh kardashians will fav stupid	Ohhhh Kardashians is going to favor stupid.	Ohhh Kardashians will favor you.	Ohhh kardashians will favor stupid.
53	eye will definetely glued tv screen love kardashians	L' eye permanently glued to the TV screen, loves kardashians kardashians.	L' permanently glued eye TV screen loves kardashians kardashians.	L' eye permanently glued TV screen loves kardashians kardashians.
53	going watch keeping kardashians love	Watch the kardashian like kardashian.	Go and watch the kardashian like kardashian.	Go watch the kardashian like kardashian.
53	kardashian family	Kardashian family.	Family kardashian.	Hey, Kardashian family.
53	wished looked lucy hale kourtney kardashian pretty	I wish Lucy Hale Kourtney Kardashian was pretty.	J' wished that Lucy Hale Kourtney Kardashian was pretty.	J' wished Lucy Hale Kurtney Kardashian looked pretty.
53	kardashian love yu sooooo	Kardashian t&apos loves so much.	Kardashian t' loves so much.	Kardashian t&apos, love so much.
53	shoutout lmao kim kardashian real live slut	"Yell ""lmao kim kardashian kim kardashian bitch"" live."	Shout lmao kim kardashian real bitch live.	Shout lmao kim kardashian real live bitch.
53	love kardashians	J&apos loves kardashian.	J' adores kardashian.	J' loves the game of kardashian.
53	sunday episode kktny crazy	This Sunday, it's crazy kktny.	Sunday crazy kktny episode.	Sunday episode kktny crazy.
53	kardashians suicide bomb fuck outta shit hate entire internet	Kamikaze kamikaze kamikaze kardashians.	Kardashians kamikaze kamikaze kamikaze kamikaze kamikaze.	Kardashians kamikaze suicide bombers kamikaze suicide bombers.
53	doesn kim kardashian	Is-what is the name Kim Kardashian kim kardashian.	Is-what Kim Kardashian kim kardashian.	Is-what Kim Kardashian kim kardashian is.
53	keeping kardashians family love	To keep the apos; love of the Kardashians family.	Keeping the love of the Kardashians family.	Keep it together; love the family Kardashians.
53	fave kardashian phillyblack fuckin hate khloe kardashian	F Faith phillyblack fucking khloe kardashian kardashian khloe.	Foi kardashian phillyblack whore hates khloe kardashian kardashian khloe.	Foi kardashian phillyblack whore hates khloe kardashian kardashian khloe.
53	love kim kardashian ur hot wooohoooo lol	J' love hot woooooo lol kim kardashian.	J' love kim kardashian ur hot woooooo lol.	J' love kim kardashian ur hot woooooo-o-ol.
53	kardashians pier morgan stupid answer question perfect	Kardashians Pier Morgan stupid perfect question.	Kardashians Pier Morgan stupid answer perfect question.	Kardashians pier morgan stupid answer perfect question.
53	bruce will fave kardashian lol	Bruce avoids Kardashian Lol.	Bruce will avoid Kardashian Lol at all costs.	Bruce will avoid Kardashian Lol.
53	dont imma kourtney kim khloe fave interested	Kourtney khloe khloe khloe that interests me.	The kourtney kim khloe khloe khloe is interesting.	The kourtney kim khloe khloe is interesting.
53	kinda wished lived life kim kardashian	J&apos. would have preferred Kim Kardashian to live her life.	J' would have preferred Kim Kardashian to live her life.	I wish Kim Kardashian had lived her life.
53	watching material keeping kardashians lol love	Watching the hardware keep lol kardashians love.	To watch the material keep kardashians lol love.	Watch material keep kardashians lol love.
53	hey kris big fan watch kardashian lot love day	Hey Kris big fan watch kardashian lot-love day of l' love.	Hey big Kris fan watch kardashian lot love day of l' love.	Hi Kris big fan watch kardashian lot love day of l' love.
53	lovee thee kardashians lt hehe seasonn nee episode righhht noww watch watch watch lt	It's the first time I've seen this episode, and it's the first time I've seen it.	I'll love you, Kardashian, c' it's time to watch this episode.	I am loving you, Kardashian, c' it is time to watch this episode.
53	kardashian love mami	Kardashian loves mami.	Kardashian loves mami.	Kardashian is in love with mami.
53	love kardashian doll fave doll khloe gt	J' loves kardashian and Khloe Gt dolls.	J' loves the kardashian and khloe gt dolls.	J' loves kardashian and khloe gt dolls.
53	loved larry good pier thought kardashians bimbo type fun loving great kudos	J' liked Larry Pier thought bimbo kardashians bardashians fun type liking big kudos.	J' liked Larry Pier thought kardashians bimbo fun big kudos.	J' liked Larry Pier thought kardashians bimbo fun type liking big kudos.
53	love kardashian	J&apos loves Kardashian.	J' loves Kardashian.	J' love Kardashian, love it.
53	love kourtney kardashian	J&apos loves Kourtney Kardashian.	J' adores Kourtney Kardashian.	J' adores the Kurtney Kardashian.
53	watching kourtney kim khloe loving waiting forever	Watching kourtney kim khloe khloe khloe like to wait forever.	Watch kourtney kim khloe like to wait forever?	I mean, watching kourtney kim khloe like to wait forever.
53	kim kardashian fine piece bubble butted sweetness love stuck	Kim Kardashian beautiful bubble piece butted sweet gentleness stuck.	Kim Kardashian beautiful bubble butted sweet stuck love.	Kim Kardashian beautiful piece bubble butted sweetness stuck.
53	joined totally loving khloe kardashian	J' have joined the khloe kardashian, totally in love with J&apos.	J&apos joined the khloe kardashian totally in love.	J' joined the khloe kardashian totally in love.
53	ahh kardashians craziest family television	Ahh Kardashians Family Television, the craziest.	Ahh Kardashians, the craziest family television.	Ahh Kardashians family television craziest.
53	doesn watch kardashians	It doesn't look at the Kardashians.	He's not watching the Kardashians.	He doesn't watch the Kardashians.
53	watching keeping kardashins lol	Watch keep Kardashins Lol.	To watch guard Kardashins Lol.	You know, watching Kardashins Lol.
53	khloe kardashian loved reality star social medium top three month	And Khloe Kardashian loved the reality star, the top three-month social medium.	Khloe Kardashian loved reality star, social psychic top three months.	Khloe Kardashian loved the reality star social medium top three months.
53	love khloe alexandra kardashian biggest fan kuwait will meet	The biggest kuwait fan Khloe Alexandra kardashian will meet Khloe Alexandra kardashian.	The biggest fan kuwait will meet khloe alexandra kardashian.	The khloe alexandra kardashian biggest fan kuwait will meet khloe alexandra kardashian.
53	waiting kktn tonight love kardashians	Waiting for this evening's kardashians love kardashians.	Waiting for tonight kardashians love kardashians!	Waiting tonight kardashians love kardashians so much.
53	crystal clear kim kardashian single fucking idiot	Kim Kardashian, a fucking idiot, one-time-only, crystal-clear, crystal-clear idiot.	Kim Kardashian, a fucking idiot, crystal clear, one-of-a-kind idiot.	Kim Kardashian, a fucking idiot unique, crystal clear and clear.
53	love reali kardashian saludos mexico	J' loves the real Mexican kardashian saludos.	J' loves the real saludos kardashian in Mexico.	J' loves real kardashian saludos in Mexico.
53	prob love	There's another already, and there's still another.	There's already one more, and there's one more.	Well, there's one already, and there's another.
53	favorite kardashian love khloe	The favorite Khloe Love Khloe kardashian.	The favorite khloe khloe love khloe.	The favorite khloe love khloe khloe.
53	kardashians episode good	It's a good game, it's a good game.	Kardashians episode is good.	The Kardashians episode is a good one.
54	head mossad week ago stuxnet set iranian nuke plan decade fox news iran nuke yr	A week ago, Stuxnet put in place an Iranian nuclear plan for Iran nuke yr.	A week ago, Stuxnet implemented an Iranian nuclear plan for the fox news decade Iran nuke yr.	A week ago, Stuxnet put in place an Iranian nuclear plan for the decade fox news Iran nuke yr.
54	citing option iran reject uranium deal diplomat nytimes	The Iranian diplomat, quoting the Iranian option, rejects the text; agreement on uranium.	Citing the Iranian option, Iranian diplomat rejects the text; agreement on uranium.	Citing the Iranian option, Iranian diplomat rejects the uranium deal.
54	iran year nuclear weapon iranelection	L' Iranelection in Iran; Nuclear Weapons of the Iranian Year.	Iran's nuclear weapon, Iran's year.	L' iranelection at the Apos; nuclear weapon of the year Iranian.
54	mi head iran sanction nuke program technical expertise create mat	It's the first nuclear program in the world, and it's the first nuclear program in the world.	L' technical expertise in Iran's nuclear program; and Iran's nuclear program.	Iran's nuclear program technical expertise made it possible to create a piece of equipment.
54	future iran nuclear talk ahmadinejad afp afp iran president mahmoud ahmadinejad	The future Iranian President Ahmadinejad afp afp afp Iran speaks Iranian nuclear mahmoud Ahmadinejad.	Future Iranian president Ahmadinejad afp afp afp Iran speaks Iranian nuclear mahmoud ahmadinejad.	The future president of Iran ahmadinejad afp afp afp Iran speaks Iranian mahmoud ahmadinejad nuclear.
54	idf intelligence chief iran nuclear bomb year haaretz	Iran's Chief of Intelligence, the haaretz of the Year of the Nuclear Bomb.	The head of Iran's secret service, haaretz of the year of the nuclear bomb.	Iranian intelligence chief, haaretz of the year of the nuclear bomb.
55	option credit card debt consolidation loan	Loan d' Credit Card Debt Consolidation Option.	Loan d' option of credit card debt consolidation.	Loan from credit card debt consolidation option.
55	credit card debt bankruptcy alternative legally settle bad credit card debt great economic crisis	L' alternative of bankruptcy of the debt of the credit card legally settle the bad debt of the credit card great economic crisis.	L' alternative to bankruptcy of the credit card debt legally settle bad credit card debt major economic crisis.	L' credit card debt bankruptcy alternative legally settle bad credit card debt major economic crisis.
55	credit card debt consolidation debt settlement option credit card debt consolidation debt sett	Credit Card Debt Consolidation Debt Settlement Option Credit Card Debt Consolidation Credit Card Debt Consolidation Composition.	Credit Card Debt Consolidation Debt Settlement Option Credit Card Debt Consolidation Composition of the consolidation debt.	Credit Card Debt Consolidation Debt resolution option Credit card debt consolidation Composition of consolidation debt.
55	help consolidation consumer debt ehow	The Government of Canada is committed to ensuring that Canadians have access to the services they need.	Contribute to the consolidation of consumer indebtedness.	Contribute to the consolidation of Canada's consumer debt system.
55	post debt consolidation debt consolidation	The Government of Canada's debt-to-GDP ratio is expected to decline in the coming years.	Debt consolidation after debt consolidation.	Debt consolidation after debt consolidation is completed.
55	lower credit card debt	Decrease in credit-card debt.	Decrease of the credit card debt.	Decrease credit card debt.
55	suffering bad credit history bad credit debt consolidation loan pay debt	Bad credit file Bad consolidation credit Debt consolidation credit.	Bad credit file Bad debt consolidation record Debt consolidation credit.	Bad credit history Bad credit history Bad credit history Debt consolidation credit.
55	debt settlement lawyer debt settlement easier lawyer day debt settlement beco	Debt Settlement Advocate Debt Settlement Easier Advocate Debt Settlement Day because they settle debt because.	Debt settlement lawyer Debt settlement easier Debt resolution day lawyer because.	Debt settlement lawyer debt settlement easier lawyer debt settlement day because.
55	debt consolidation help avoid bankruptcy debt consolidation involves single loan	Debt Consolidation Helps Avoid Bankruptcy Debt consolidation also involves a one-time loan.	Consolidating the Debt Helps Avoid Bankruptcy Debt consolidation involves a single loan.	Debt consolidation helps avoid bankruptcy Debt consolidation involves a single loan.
55	offbeat idea eliminate credit card debt month offbeat idea eliminate credit card	It's a good idea to get rid of the credit card debt; the idea of a month's credit eliminates the need for a credit card.	The wrong idea eliminates the credit card debt; the idea of a credit card month will eliminate the credit card.	L' false idea eliminates credit card debt l' idea of credit months eliminates credit card.
55	credit card debt consolidation gt credit card studentloans info conso	Debt Consolidation by Credit Card gt Student Loans information conso conso.	Consolidation of debts by credit card gt credit card student Loans info conso conso.	Credit card debt consolidation gt student credit card Loans info conso conso.
55	credit card debt relief program avoid bankruptcy settle debt day reliable	Debt Reduction and Repayment Program; Credit Card Debt Reduction and Repayment Program Avoid Bankruptcy Debt Repayment Day.	Debt Reduction and Repayment Program; credit card debt relief to avoid bankruptcy reliable debt day.	Credit card debt relief program avoid bankruptcy payment of reliable debt day.
55	debt settlement program ftc law debt settlement better article learn	Debt Settlement Program FTC Debt Settlement Act Better Learn article.	Debt Settlement Program Debt Settlement Act FTC better article learn.	Debt Settlement Program FTC Debt Settlement Act better article apprendre.
55	personal loan debt consolidation	Consolidation of Personal Loan Debts.	Consolidation and consolidation of personal loan debt.	Personal loan debt consolidation.
55	swift debt relief valuable tip debt consolidation consider	Debt relief is provided on a fast-track basis to ensure that the debt consolidation takes into account the debt situation.	Fast-track debt relief to allow for debt consolidation.	Rapid debt relief to make debt consolidation a factor.
55	secured unsecured debt consolidation loan settle credit card debt cost debt consolidation	Unsecured Guaranteed Debt Consolidation Loan (Unsecured Guaranteed Debt Consolidation Loan) to settle debt consolidation related to credit card charges.	Unsecured guaranteed debt consolidation loan to address debt consolidation related to credit card fees.	Unsecured guaranteed debt consolidation loan to settle credit card debt consolidation.
55	debt consolidation augment debt problem finance money	Debt consolidation increases the debt-financing problem.	Debt consolidation increases the problem of debt finance currency.	Debt consolidation increases the debt problem financing the currency.
56	great win packer christina land blunder	Christina Land, the big winner, made a mistake.	Big winner, Christina Land, screwed up.	The big winner, christina land, screwed up.
56	christina aguilera bungle national anthem three thing singing nationa	Christina aguilera bungle bungle national anthem three things singing singing nationa.	Christina aguilera bungle national anthem three things singing nationa.	Christina aguilera bungle national anthem three singing nationa songs.
56	christina aguilera forgets national anthem super bowl	Christina Aguilera has forgotten the Super Bowl national anthem.	Aguilera forgets the Super Bowl national anthem.	Christina Aguilera forgets the national anthem Super Bowl.
56	christina aguilera fluff american national anthem super bowl xlv	Christina Aguilera American fluff, national hymn super bowl xlv.	Christina Aguilera American fluff national hymn super bowl xlv.	Christina Aguilera fluff U.S. national anthem super bowl xlv.
56	christina aguilera wrong lyric usa national anthem superbowl	Christina Aguilera misquoted her lyrics and used them as a national superbowl superbowl song.	Christina aguilera false lyrics used dapos; a national superbowl superbowl hymn.	Christina aguilera false lyrics used a national hymn superbowl superbowl.
56	ifwt video christina aguilera mess national anthem superbowl	If the video Christina Aguilera will spoil the album?	If the video Christina will ruin the album; national anthem superbowl.	If the video Christina aguilera spoil the' national anthem superbowl.
56	endsmeat christina aguilera mess lyric national anthem super bowl	End of the Meat Christina aguilera lyrical mess national hymn super bowl.	End of Meat Christina Aguilera will be singing the lyrical national anthem super bowl.	The end of the meat Christina aguilera messes lyric national anthem super bowl.
56	christina aguilera fumble national anthem lyric super bowl tonight super bowl xlv kickoff christina	Christina Aguilera fumble national lyrical hymn super bowl tonight Christina christina launch super bowl xlv.	Christina Aguilera fumble national lyrical hymn super bowl tonight super bowl xlv launch Christina christina.	Christina Aguilera fumble national hymn lyric super bowl tonight super bowl xlv launch Christina Christina christina.
56	twitter explodes christina aguilera mess national anthem super bowl	Twitter Blows Christina Aguilera Mess National Anthem Super Bowl.	Twitter explodes Christina Aguilera national hymn super bowl mess.	Christina Aguilera mess national anthem super bowl explodes on Twitter.
56	christina aguilera botched national anthem superbowl notice	"Christina Aguilera has botched the ""Superbowl"" national anthem."	Christina Aguilera botched the superbowl national anthem.	Christina Aguilera botched the national anthem superbowl.
56	super bowl xlv christina aguilera repeat national anthem espn	I'm sorry, but I don't think it's a good idea.	Super bowl xlv Christina Aguilera will be repeating the apos; national anthem espn espn espn.	Super bowl xlv Christina aguilera rehearse lyrics; national anthem espn espn.
56	aguilera flub national anthem christina aguileraflubbed belt	Aguilera flub hymn national christina flub aguileraflubbed belt.	Aguilera flub national anthem christina aguileraflubbed belt.	Aguilera flub national anthem christina aguileraflubbed belt.
56	today talker aguilera botch star spangled banner clip survey colt	It's a good idea to have a lot of fun, but it's a lot of fun to do.	Today, the chatterbox will aguilera starbang spangled banner clip poll poll colt poll.	Today, the chatterbox will aguilera starbang spangled banner clip survey colt poll.
56	christina aguilera fluff national anthem	Christina Aguilera mimics the National Anthem.	Christina Aguilera imitates the apos; national anthem.	Christina Aguilera imitates the national anthem.
56	full video super bowl national anthem singer christina aguilera fail imalive	L&apos singer; national Super Bowl anthem, Christina Aguilera, failed imalive.	Christina Aguilera, singer of l' the national anthem of the Super Bowl, failed.	L&apos singer Christina Aguilera, the national anthem of the Super Bowl, failed.
56	local christina aguilera fumble national anthem christina aguilera flubbed belted	Christina Aguilera Local Fumble National Anthem Christina aguilera flubted belt.	Christina aguilera local fumble national anthem Christina aguilera flubted belt.	Christina aguilera local fumble national anthem Christina aguilera flubted belt.
56	artsbeat christina aguilera flub national anthem nytimes share friend art classical musi	Artbeat Christina Aguilera flub hymn national nytimes share classical classical art classic musi musi.	Artbeat Christina Aguilera flub national hymn nytimes share friends classical art musi musi classic.	Artbeat Christina Aguilera flub, national anthem nytimes share her friend classical art, classical musi musi.
56	conan blast christina super bowl anthem blunder time	Christina blowing out the cones of Super Bowl hymn blunder time.	Christina blowing Super Bowl cones hymn blind time blunder.	Christina blowing Super Bowl cones hymn blunder time blunder.
56	watch christina aguilera screw national anthem super bowl	Watching Christina Aguilera fuck her way through the Super Bowl national anthem.	Watching Christina Aguilera fuck the apos; the national anthem Super Bowl.	Watching christina aguilera fuck the apos; national super bowl anthem.
56	christina aguilera national anthem super bowl flub happen york daily news fox	Christina Aguilera National Anthem Super Bowl flub is playing York Daily Fox Fox Journal.	Christina Aguilera national anthem Super Bowl flub takes place York daily fox newspaper fox.	Christina Aguilera national anthem Super Bowl flub is York fox daily newspaper.
56	usa national anthem hard song sing	The song is written in the national anthem, and the song is written in the national anthem.	Usa national anthem song to sing national song to sing.	Usa national anthem song must sing national song song.
56	feel super bowl national anthem fail christina aguilera lion den university	Feeling national super bowl hymn fail Christina will aguil lion the university.	Feeling super bowl national anthem fail Christina will agile lion in college.	Feeling super bowl national anthem fail Christina will aguil lion college.
56	check video christina aguilera super bowl national anthem mistake mess err	Watch the video of Christina Aguilera Super Bowl error of l' national anthem.	Watch this video of Christina Aguilera Super Bowl, a mistake from the national anthem.	Watch the video of Christina Aguilera Super Bowl, national anthem error.
56	christina aguilera flub star spangled banner lyric super bowl sport	Christina aguilera celebrity flub spangled singer-songwriter Super Bowl sports banner.	Christina aguilera star flub spangled lyrical banner Super Bowl sport.	Christina aguilera spangled flub star spangled lyrical Super Bowl sports banner.
56	watch christina agulilera botch national anthem super bowl michael mccarthy usa today heard	Watching Christina Agulilera Botch National Super Bowl Song Michael McCarthy was heard today.	Watching Christina Agulilera botch super bowl national anthem Michael McCarthy heard today.	Watching Christina Agulilera botch national anthem super bowl Michael McCarthy used to hear today.
56	perez hilton christina aguilera mess lyric national anthem super bowl ooop hitechcj	Perez Hilton Christina Aguilera lyrical super bowl super bowl ooop hitechcj.	Perez Hilton Christina Aguilera lyrical mess national hymn super bowl ooop hitechcj.	Perez Hilton Christina Aguilera lyrical mess national anthem super bowl ooop hitechcj.
56	christina aguilera mangle national anthem super bowl xlv superbowlxlv fb	Christina Aguilera mangle hymne national super bowl xlv superbowlxlv fb.	Christina aguilera mangle hymne national super bowl xlv superbowlxlv fb.	Christina aguilera mangle national hymne super bowl xlv superbowlxlv fb.
56	christina aguilera flub national anthem singing er rampart watched gallant	Christina Aguilera national anthem flub singing her rampart looked gallant.	Christina Aguilera flub national anthem song er rampart stared gallant.	Christina Aguilera flub national anthem singing girly watched rampart.
56	haha christina aguilera spelled bad sing fucked national anthem super bowl lol	Ha ha christina aguilera spelled bad singing fucked super bowl super bowl national hymn.	Ha ha christina aguilera spelled bad singing fucked national hymn super bowl lol super bowl.	Ha ha christina aguilera spelled bad song kissed national anthem super bowl lol super bowl.
56	christina aguilera destroys national anthem superbowl	Christina Aguilera destroys the superbowl national anthem.	Christina Aguilera destroys the apos, national anthem superbowl.	Christina aguilera destroys the national anthem superbowl.
56	packer win super bowl christina aguilera national anthem wrong news sky xy	Packer win Super Bowl Christina Aguilera national bad news xy xy national anthem.	Packer Win Super Bowl Christina Aguilera national anthem bad news xy xy xy.	Packer win Super Bowl Christina Aguilera national anthem bad news xy xy.
56	aguilera fluff super bowl anthem	L' hymn of super bowl; aguilera fluff.	L' l&apos de l' aguilera fluff super bowl.	L' lyrics; aguilera fluff super bowl.
56	social medium blast christina aguilera national anthem super bowl flub day social medium	Social means breath Christina aguilera national hymn Super Bowl flub social media day.	Social means breath Christina aguilera national anthem Super Bowl flub social media day.	Social media blows Christina aguilera national anthem Super Bowl flub day social media.
56	christina aguilera mess national anthem start super bowl xlv	Christina Aguilera national hymn mess start Super Bowl Xlvv.	Christina Aguilera national hymn mess start Super bowl xlvv.	Christina Aguilera mess national anthem start Super bowl xlvvv.
56	christina aguilera mangle star spangled banner super bowl abc news sb	Christina Aguilera mangle star spangled Super Bowl banner abc news sb.	Christina aguilera mangle star spangled banner Super Bowl abc news sb.	Christina aguilera mangle star spangled mangle banner super bowl abc news sb sb.
56	airhead christina aguilera screw national anthem super bowl xlv tcot tlot	It's a great game, it's a great game, it's a great game, it's a great game.	Christina Aguilera, head d' egg, fucks l' national anthem, super bowl xlv tcot tlot tlot.	Christina Aguilera, egg head, fuck l' national anthem, super bowl xlv tcot tlot tlot.
56	heard christina aguilera flubbed superbowl national anthem night	Christina will aguilera flirted with the night of l'apos; national superbowl anthem.	Christina will be flirting with the night of the Apostles, the national anthem of the superbowl.	Christina aguilera flirted with the night of the national anthem of superbowl.
56	christina aguilera national anthem politicsthe votechristina aguilera national anthem flubbed itth	Christina Aguilera national political anthem l' national votechristina aguilera flub it flub it.	Christina Aguilera national anthem political l' national anthem votechristina aguilera flub it flub it.	Christina Aguilera national anthem political l' national anthem votechristina aguilera flub it flub.
56	super bowl national anthem singer christina aguilera fail video	L&apos singer; national Super Bowl anthem, Christina Aguilera, failed to make the video.	Super Bowl singer Christina Aguilera, the national anthem of the Super Bowl, failed to make the video.	L&apos singer; national anthem of Super Bowl, Christina Aguilera, fails video.
56	christina aguilera explains super bowl national anthem flub	Christina Aguilera explains the flub of the Super Bowl National Anthem.	Christina Aguilera explains the flub de l' national anthem of the Super Bowl.	Christina Aguilera explains flub de l' national anthem of Super Bowl.
56	bronco christina aguilera flub national anthem kmgh denver	Bronco christina aguilera national kmgh denver hymn flub.	Bronco christina aguilera flub hymn national kmgh denver.	Bronco christina aguilera flub national kmgh denver hymn.
56	aguilera flub national anthem christina aguilera flubbed belted natio nfl steelers	Aguilera fluba national anthem Christina aguilera flubera natio nf steelers belt.	Aguilera flub national anthem Christina aguilera flubtée natio nfl steelers ceinture.	Aguilera flub national anthem Christina aguilera flubted natio nfl steelers belt.
56	super bowl xlv christina aguilera repeat national anthem	The Super Bowl Xlv, starring Christina Aguilera, repeats the lyrics of the anthem.	Super Bowl Xlv Christina Aguilera repeats the national anthem.	The national anthem of Super Bowl Xlv Christina Aguilera repeats the apos.
56	funny happened aguilera repeat national anthem yahoo news	It's the first time you've heard the song of yahoo news.	Funny that arrived will rehearse the apos; national anthem yahoo news yahoo.	Fun Studied will repeat the apos; national anthem yahoo news yahoo.
56	rocking christina aguilera explains national anthem flub christina aguilera well aware	The christina aguilera rocking explains the apos; flub christina national anthem will aguilera well know.	Rocking christina aguilera explains the apos; national anthem flub christina will aguilera well know.	The rocking christina aguilera explains the apos; national anthem flub christina aguilera well know.
56	christina aguilera flub national anthem singing er rampart watched gallantly	Christina aguilera flub flub hymn national song er rampart watched gallantly.	Christina aguilera flub national hymn singing er rampart watched gallantly.	Christina aguilera flub national anthem singing rampart watched gallantly.
56	case missed christina aguilera butchered national anthem	It's the first time I've ever heard of a case that's gone bad.	Missed case Christina Aguilera has been massacring the apos; national anthem.	Missed case Christina Aguilera massacred the national anthem.
56	christina aguilera explains national anthem flub movie tv caught	It's the first time I've seen it, and it's the last time I've seen it.	Christina Aguilera explains the apos; national anthem flub film tv caught.	Christina Aguilera explains l' national anthem flub film tv caught.
56	christina aguilera mess national anthem super bowl	Christina Aguilera ruined the Super Bowl of the national anthem.	And Christina Aguilera ruined the super bowl of the national anthem.	Christina Aguilera ruined the national anthem super bowl.
56	christina aguilera screw national anthem	Christina Aguilera is a French singer and songwriter.	Christina Aguilera fucks l' national anthem.	Christina Aguilera fucks the national anthem.
56	video christina aguilera sings national anthem loud super bowl xlv post sbnation	Video Christine Aguilera sings l' national anthem post sbnation.	Video Christina Aguilera sings l' national anthem for the Super Bowl xlv post sbnation.	Video Christina Aguilera sings l' national anthem strong Super Bowl xlv post sbnation.
56	dtn hollywood christina aguilera apologises national anthem flub feedburner share friend	"Dtn Hollywood Christina Aguilera apologizes to the ""Friend of the Apos""; the program Flub Feedburner de l'apos; national anthem."	Dtn Hollywood Christina Aguilera apologizes to the friend of the Apos; Flub Feedburner from the Apos; national anthem.	Hollywood's Christina Aguilera apologizes to Apos' friend Flub Feedburner from Apos; national anthem.
56	defglam christina aguilera apologizes screwing national anthem	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I didn't get it.	Defglam Christina Aguilera s' apology d' screw-up; national anthem.	Christina Aguilera s' apologies for screwing up; national anthem.
56	christina aguilera defends fumbling national anthem super bowl	Christina Aguilera has defended the Super Bowl of l' national anthem.	Christina Aguilera defends the super bowl of the national anthem.	Christina Aguilera defends the national anthem super bowl of l&apos.
56	christina aguilera defends fumbling national anthem super bowl	Christina Aguilera has defended the Super Bowl of l' national anthem.	Christina Aguilera defends the super bowl of the national anthem.	Christina Aguilera defends the national anthem super bowl of l&apos.
56	klassy breeze music blog black eyed aguilera love	Klassy breeze music blogblack eyes aguilera love.	Klassy breeze music black eyes blogblog aguilera love.	Klassy breeze music blog black eyes aguilera love.
56	gossip christina fumble lyric national anthem fail christina agu	Christina Fumble gossip, lyrical national anthem, failed Christina agu christina.	Christina Fumble gossip lyrical national anthem fail Christina agu christina.	Christina Fumble gossip lyric national anthem fail Christina agu christina.
56	post christina aguileras national anthem apology slammed taylor hick christina aguileras nation	After Christina Aguileras, the Apostle's apologies, the national anthem, hit Taylor Hick Christina Aguileras nation.	After Christina Aguileras, apologies from the national anthem struck Taylor Hick Christina Aguileras nation.	After Christina Aguileras, the apology of the national anthem struck Taylor Hick Christina Aguileras nation.
56	opinion christina sounded amazing super bowl america making big deal	The American Super Bowl sounded great when Christina d&apos made a big fuss.	Christina d' opinion sounded great in the American Super Bowl making a big fuss.	Christina d' opinion sounded great in making a big deal about the Super Bowl.
56	christina aguilera apologize flubbing national anthem	It's the first time I've ever heard of it, and it's the first time I've ever seen it.	Christina Aguilera s' apologies for flaming the apos; national anthem.	Christina Aguilera s' apology for flaming the national anthem.
56	sport super bowl xlv christina aguilera repeat national anthem christina aguilera smokinsession	The game is a great game and the game is a great game to play.	Super bowl sport xlv christina aguilera repeat the apos; national anthem christina aguilera Smokinsession.	Super bowl sport xlv christina aguilera repeat l' national anthem christina aguilera Smokinsession.
56	honor epic fail national anthem top ten list time worst	Honoring the Apos; Epic National Anthem Failure Top 10 Worst Times List.	Honoring the Apos; epic national anthem failure Top ten list of the worst moments.	Honoring the apos; epic national anthem failure Top ten list of worst moments.
56	celebrity butchering national anthem digg christina aguilera flawlessly sung national anthem	A celebrity slaughtering the Apos; the national anthem of digg christina aguilera sang the lyrics of the Apos; the national anthem.	A celebrity slaughtering the apos; the national anthem digg christina aguilera sang the apos; the national anthem perfectly.	A celebrity massacring the national anthem digg christina aguilera sang perfect lypos; national anthem.
56	super bowl xlv christina aguilera repeat national anthem christina aguilera flubbed nfl	Nieuwe blijk niet niet niet niet niet niet niet niet niet niet niet niet niet niet niet.	Super bowl xlv christina aguilera repeat the apos; national anthem christina aguilera flubbed nf.	Super bowl xlv christina aguilera repeat l' national anthem christina aguilera flubbed nf.
56	christina aguilera great job national anthem	Christina Aguilera excellent work hymn national.	Christina Aguilera excellent national anthem work.	Christina Aguilera excellent national anthem work.
56	christina aguilera screwed forgot national anthem american event deporther fail fb	Christina Aguilera forgot the U.S. national deporther event fb.	Christina Aguilera forgot the anthem U.S. national event deporther failure fb.	Christina Aguilera forgot the apos; American national anthem event deporther failure fb.
56	christina aguilera messed national anthem super bowl xlv dep	Christina Aguilera has screwed up the Super Bowl of the Super Bowl.	Christina Aguilera screwed up the Super Bowl of the national anthem.	Christina Aguilera screwed up Super Bowl of the national anthem xlv dep.
56	aguilera repeat national anthem ap ap christina aguilera flubbed hawaii alohatone	Aguilera repeats the words of the national anthem ap christina aguilera flubled hawaii alohatone.	Aguilera repeats the apos; national anthem ap christina aguilera flubled hawaii alohatone.	Aguilera repeats l'apos; national anthem ap christina aguilera flubled hawaii alohatone.
56	aguilera repeat national anthem	L' aguilera, repeats the apos; national anthem.	L' aguilera repeats l' national anthem.	The national anthem repeats the apostles.
56	christina aguilera flubbed national anthem lost moment bw	It's the first time I've ever heard of a song by a woman.	Cristina will set fire to the apostles; national anthem at a lost moment.	Christina will ignite the national anthem at a lost moment.
56	watch christina aguilera screw national anthem super bowl post	Watching Christina Aguilera fuck her own Super Bowl Post song.	Watch Christina Aguilera fuck the apos, national anthem Super Bowl Post.	Watching Christina Aguilera fuck l' national anthem Super Bowl Post.
56	christina aguilera screw national anthem super bowl xlv judge	Christina Aguilera screws the super bowl national anthem xlv judge.	Christina Aguilera fuck super bowl national anthem xlv judge.	Christina Aguilera screws national anthem super bowl xlv judge.
56	christina fail ulera ear bleed time hear sing fucking national anthem forshame	Christina E escaped bleeding ear while hearing singing fucking d*apos; national hymn of shame.	Christina's bleeding ear time to hear fucking d' national anthem of shame.	Christina E escaped bleeding ear time hear fucking d' national anthem of shame.
56	aguilera repeat national anthem ap	L'Asociación de la Comunidad de la Comunidad de Derechos.	Aguilera will repeat the apos; national anthem ap.	Aguilera repeat the apos; national anthem ap.
56	knew national anthem messed lol sang christina aguilera sang	He knew that I*apos; national anthem sali lol singing Christina aguilera singing Christina singing.	He knew that Christina Aguilera sang christina sang the national anthem sali lol.	He knew that l' national anthem sali lol sang Christina aguilera sang christina sang.
56	aguilera repeat national anthem supposed sing er rampart	Aguilera rehearse the apostles, the national anthem, which is supposed to sing the rampart.	Aguilera repeats the apos; national anthem supposed to sing ramparts.	Aguilera repeats the national anthem supposed to sing er rampart.
56	kold aguilera repeat national anthem	Kold aguilera repeats the lyrics of the lyrics.	Kold aguilera repeats the apos; national anthem.	Kold aguilera will repeat the apos; national anthem.
56	christina aguilera fumble national anthem christina aguilera flubbed belted nat	Christina aguilera fumble bursting national anthem Christina aguilera flubbed natbed belted nat.	Christina aguilera fumble national anthem Christina aguilera flubbed natbed belted nat.	Christina aguilera fumble national anthem Christina aguilera flubbed belted nat.
56	christina aguilera ruin national anthem super bowl xlv beyonce band escort nf	Christina Aguilera ruined the national anthem Super Bowl escort band.	Christina Aguilera has ruined the national anthem Super Bowl Xlv beyonce band escort nf.	Christina Aguilera ruined the national anthem Super Bowl xlv beyonce band escort nf.
56	christina aguilera apologizes messing national anthem christina aguilera suffered publ	It's a great pleasure to be here, but it's a great pleasure to be here.	Christina Aguilera s' apology of apos; having stained the apos; national anthem Christina Aguilera suffered published.	Christina Aguilera s' apology for slander; national anthem Christina Aguilera suffered.
56	latest christina aguilera botch national anthem super bowl kickoff	This is the last Christina Aguilera Super Bowl Super Bowl song to be released.	Last Christina Aguilera botch anthem national Super Bowl coup d' send.	Christina Aguilera's latest Super Bowl national anthem was sent out.
56	christina aguilera muffed lyric national anthem	Christina Aguilera has stifled the apostles, the lyrical national anthem.	Christina Aguilera stifled the lyrical national anthem.	Christina Aguilera smothered the apos; lyric national anthem.
56	topix super bowl football gree jpg christina aguilera flubbed belted	Topix Super Bowl jpg christina jpg football aguilera belt flubted flub.	Topix Super Bowl football jpg christina aguilera belt flubted flub.	Topix Super Bowl football jpg christina aguilera belt flubted flub.
56	poll christina aguilera botch national anthem super bowl	Get a feel for Christina Aguilera's super bowl.	Check out Christina Aguilera botch national hymn super bowl.	Find out more about Christina Aguilera botch national super bowl hymn.
56	aguilera repeat national anthem ap ap christina aguilera flubbed belted	Aguilera repeats the apostle; the national anthem ap christina aguilera, with a belt.	Aguilera repeats the apocalypse; national anthem ap christina aguilera ringed with belt.	Aguilera repeats the apos; national anthem ap christina aguilera belted.
56	super bowl xlv christina aguilera repeat national anthem espn	I'm sorry, but I don't think it's a good idea.	Super bowl xlv Christina Aguilera will be repeating the apos; national anthem espn espn espn.	Super bowl xlv Christina aguilera rehearse lyrics; national anthem espn espn.
56	christina aguilera mess star spangled banner super bowl dumb bitch	Christina Aguilera messes star-spangled super bowl-slut banner.	Christina Aguilera mess star spangled banner Super Bowl stupid bitch.	Christina Aguilera mess star spangled banner super bowl stupid bitch.
56	aguilera repeat national anthem ap ap christina aguilera flubbed belted	Aguilera repeats the apostle; the national anthem ap christina aguilera, with a belt.	Aguilera repeats the apocalypse; national anthem ap christina aguilera ringed with belt.	Aguilera repeats the apos; national anthem ap christina aguilera belted.
56	christina aguilera fu nat anthem super bowl	Christina Aguilera f fu fu nat hymn super bowl.	Christina aguilera fu nat hymn super bowl.	Christina aguilera fu nat hymn super bowl.
56	christina aguilera defends fumbling national anthem super bowl	Christina Aguilera has defended the Super Bowl of l' national anthem.	Christina Aguilera defends the super bowl of the national anthem.	Christina Aguilera defends the national anthem super bowl of l&apos.
56	aguilera repeat national anthem	L' aguilera, repeats the apos; national anthem.	L' aguilera repeats l' national anthem.	The national anthem repeats the apostles.
56	twitter explodes christina aguilera mess national anthem super bowl twitter abuzz commen	Twitter explodes Christina aguilera national hymn mess super bowl-twitter abuzz Begin.	Blows up Christina aguilera mess national hymn super bowl-twitter abuzz begin.	Twitter explodes Christina aguilera mess national hymn super bowl twitter abuzz Begin.
56	christina aguilera flub national anthem ap celebrity news	Christina Aguilera flub hymn national apologies new celebrities.	Christina Aguilera flub hymn national celebrity news apne.	Christina Aguilera flub national anthem ap celebrity news.
56	hear christina aguilera mangled star spangled banner superbowl twilight reaming	Christina Aguilera tore up the Starry Banner of the Super Bowl Twilight.	Rumor has it Christina Aguilera tore the starred banner of the Super Bowl Twilight.	I hear christina aguilera tore up the starry banner of the super bowl twilight.
56	christina aguilera botch national anthem super bowl washington post	Christina Aguilera Boots the National Super Bowl Washington Post anthem.	Christina Aguilera will kick the national anthem Super Bowl Washington Post.	Christina Aguilera botch national anthem Super Bowl Washington Post.
56	poll christina aguilera botch national anthem super bowl singer repeat accidentally tarnishing othe	Christina Aguilera's Christina Aguilera poll sing-along national super bowl song repetition accidentally tarnishes the apos; other.	The Christina Aguilera poll is a national hymn singing super bowl repeater accidentally tarnishing the apos; other.	The survey Christina Aguilera botch national hymn super bowl singer repeater accidentally tarnish l' other.
57	watching blue blood cbs	Watching Blue Blood Cbs.	Hey, I'm watching Blue Blood Cbs.	I'm watching blue blood cbs.
57	gothic abby cbs	I'm Abby Cbs from Gothic.	Hey, hey, hey, hey, hey.	Abby gothic cbs.
57	late night time watch crime solving tv ncis csi sky looooove	Late at night, watching the resolution of the crimes TV.	Late in the night watch the resolution of crimes TV.	Late in the night, watch crime resolution TV.
57	love ncis arc outcome funeral	J&apos loves NCIS funerals.	J' adores NCIS funerals.	J' loves the funeral of NCIS.
57	caught criminal mind finally work castle watch time watch ncis true love	It's time to go to work, and it's time to go to work.	The criminal mind is finally put to work, the clock shows the time.	The criminal mind is finally put to work, the clock shows time.
57	love shirt store ncis	J' I like the Ncis Shirt Shop.	J' likes Ncis Shirt Shop.	J' likes the Ncis shirt shop.
57	obsession gt ncis	NCIS obsession.	Obsessive of NCIS.	Uh, obsession from NCIS.
57	ncis stupidest fucking television	NCIS is the stupidest damned television.	I mean, NCIS is the stupidest fucking television.	NCIS is the stupidest fucking TV.
57	loooooooooooove ncis	NCIS loooooooove.	Loooooooove ncis.	I don't know.
57	gibbs father love ep ncis	Gibbs' dad loves this episode.	Gibbs' father loves the episode.	Gibbs' father likes the episode.
57	ncis bomb love	Bombing of the bomb.	The Bombing of the Bomb.	Canada's Food Guide to Healthy Eating.
57	yeah don csis nciss enjoy mentalist	Yeah, the Nciss like the mentalists.	Yeah, the CSI Nciss like mentalists.	Yep, CSI Nciss love mentalists.
58	nominate shorty award food love food ve eating mcds year yea	You will be able to enjoy a variety of food and be prepared to eat.	Name Shorty Award food love eat mcds year yea ya ya y.	Name Shorty Award food love food you eat mcds year yea ya ya y.
59	wlcentral yemen day rage february egypt jan yemen feb	In February, Egypt Jan Yemen feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb.	February Egypt Jan yemen feb Celebrate feb Celebrate feast Celebrate feb.	February Egypt Jan yemen feb Celebration Celebrate Celebration Celebrate.
59	protest start yemen despite concession president hundred anti government protest	A protest against the government was launched against the government, despite a 100-cent concession from the president.	Yemen protest begins despite the president's 100th concession against the government protest against the government.	Yemen protest started despite the 100 concession president against the government protest against the government.
59	yemen call emergency meeting ahead protest yemen president ali abdullah saleh called emergen	Yemen calls for a meeting of d'apos; emergency to protest against Yemeni President ali Abdullah Saleh, known as Emeren.	Yemen calls for an emergency meeting to protest against Yemen's ali Abdullah Saleh, known as Emeren.	Yemen calls an emergency meeting to protest against Yemen president ali Abdullah Saleh, known as Emeren.
59	thousand protest yemen	Yemen protests.	Thousand yemen protests.	A thousand yemen protests.
59	lat ten thousand turn rival rally yemen	Last ten grand, spinning the rival yemen rally.	Last ten thousand turn the rival yacht rally.	Last ten thousand turn the rival rally yemen.
59	yemen join uprising trend protest start yemen despite concession president yemen jan	Yemen joins the uprising movement to protest starting yemen despite Yemeni president Jan's concession.	Yemen joins the rising protest start yemen despite the concession Jan yemen president.	Yemen joins the rising trend protest start yemen despite the yemen Jan president's concession.
59	yemen republican guard dispatched roaming street sana reliable source	The Yemeni Republican Guard has just sent a reliable source, Sana, wandering the streets.	Yemeni Republican Guard sent a reliable source, Sana, wandering the streets.	Yemen's Republican Guard sent a reliable source, Sana, roaming the streets.
59	anti government protest start yemen	Yemen begins protesting against the government.	Yemen starts protesting against the government.	Yemen is beginning to protest the government's decision.
59	correcting link yemen latest arab state join unrest activist demonstrating	Correct yemen Arab last state link join activist of the apos; protest agitation.	To correct the link yemen last Arab state join the activist of l' agitation protest.	Correct the link yemen last Arab state join activist from the protests.
59	breaknews yemen street day rage yemeni filled street sanaa	New yemen on street days Yemeni rage is filling the streets sanaa sanaa.	New yemen on street days yemeni rage fills the sanaa sanaa streets.	The new yemen on the street rage yemeni fill the streets sanaa sanaa.
59	yemen president extend term aljazeera	The President is appointed by the President of the Republic.	Yemen's President extends the term of office of Aljazeera.	The President will extend the term of office of the President.
59	ticker thousand yemeni call president quit	Thousands of Yemenis are calling the President to resign.	A thousand of them are calling on the president to resign.	A thousand Yemenis call on the president to resign.
59	yemeni president ali abdullah saleh will seek extend presidency appoint son role current	President Ali Abdullah Saleh of Yemen will seek to expand the presidency to name his current role.	Yemeni President ali abdullah saleh will seek to expand the presidency to name his current role.	Yemen's president ali abdullah saleh will seek to name his current role.
59	egypt yemen demand change government well gt news tcot	Yemeni Egypt calls for a change of government.	L' Yemeni Egypt is calling for a change of government.	L' Yemeni Egypt calls for a change of government.
59	protest reform start yemen hundred anti government protester gathered sanaa	Launch of the Yemen Protest Reform 100 protesters against the government gathered sanaa.	Start of the reform of the yemen protest 100 protesters against the government gathered sanaa.	Yemen protest reform begins 100 protesters against the government gathered sana'a.
59	yemen pres salih will seek term step egypt pres mubarak	Yemen near salih will be looking for a term that is a step forward in the direction of the world.	Yemen near salih will seek a step forward to the apostle; Egypt pres mubarak.	Yemen near salih will seek a step forward to Egypt pres mubarak.
59	anti government protest spilling yemen business	Anti-government protests, outpouring of Yemen's business.	Anti-government protests-government, Yemeni business spillover.	Anti-government protest-government, spillover from the business of Yemen.
59	st tunisia egypt yemen	Tunisia and Egypt; Yemeni.	Tunisia and l' Yemeni Egypt.	Tunisia and the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia.
59	yemen protest intensify arrest journalist tawakkol karman	The protests in Yemen are intensifying the situation; the arrest of the journalist Tawakkol Karman.	Yemen's protests intensify the apos; journalist Tawakkol Karman's arrest.	Yemen's protests intensify the arrest of journalist Tawakkol Karman.
59	worldchanging yemen president facing protest will seek extend term expires	The president of Yemen, who is changing in the face of protests, will seek to extend the term of office that has expired.	Yemen's president who is changing in response to protests will seek to extend the expired term.	Yemen's president changing in the face of protests will seek to extend the term.
59	march yemen president day rage	Yemen's President's Day Rage march.	March to the raging day of the President of Yemen.	Walk into the rage of the day of the President of Yemen.
59	yemen unsettled president vow relinquish power yemeni leader ali abdullah saleh will stand current mand	Unstable President Yemen vows to relinquish power The current mandate of the Yemeni leader ali abdullah saleh will remain unchanged.	Unstable Yemeni President vows to relinquish power Yemeni leader ali abdullah saleh will remain the current leader.	Unstable Yemeni President vows to relinquish power The yemeni leader ali abdullah saleh will remain the current watchdog.
59	wonder will fill political vacuum tunesia egypt yemen tunesia egypt yemen	L' amazement will fill the vacuum of political power.	L' amazement will fill the political vacuum tunesia egypt yemen egypt yemen.	L' wonder will fill the political vacuum tunesia egypt yemen egypt yemen.
59	indy yemen president saleh step yemen president told parliament will seek term	President d'apos; Indy-yemen announced in Parliament that he would be running for office.	President d'apos; Indy yemen announced in Parliament that he would run for a term.	President d'apos; Indy yemen announced in Parliament that he would seek office.
59	thousand march yemen president middle east independent	Independent President of the Middle Kingdom-Orient.	More than a thousand yemen are now independent president of the Middle Kingdom.	A thousand yemen independent president of the Middle-Orient.
59	reuters top news yemen president won extend term pas son	Reuters top news President Yemen has just won an extended term with his son.	Reuters top news Yemeni President won an extended term by his son.	Reuters top news president yemen won an extended term from his son.
59	yemen protest february day rage video news egypt jan mubarak syria libya jordan ugc	Yemen Protests on Rage of News Videos Day in February in Egypt Jan Mubarak Syria Libya Jordan ugc.	Yemen protests on the day of new video rage in February in Egypt Jan Mubarak Syria Libya Jordan ugc.	Yemen protests January Mubarak Syria Libya Jordan ugc on the day of new video rage in Egypt.
59	protest erupt yemen	There have been protests in Yemen.	There have been protests in Yemen.	And protests have broken out in Yemen.
59	great bbc piece summarising unrest north africa middle east	It's a big article from BBC summarizing the troubles to the north of l'apos; Africa of the Middle-East.	BBC feature article summarizing the troubles north of l' Middle Africa-Orient.	Big BBC article summarizing the unrest to the north of L' Middle Africa-Orient.
59	yemeni president won seek term	The President has obtained a mandate.	The president of Yemen has obtained a mandate.	Yemen's president got a term in office.
59	yemen ali abdullah saleh won seek reelection year power amazing happenning mid east	Yemen ali Abdullah Saleh has won the run for the year of incredible re-election occurs at the Middle-Orient.	Yemen ali Abdullah Saleh has won the re-election year of incredible power is happening at the Middle-Orient.	Yemen ali Abdullah Saleh won the reelection year's incredible power run at Middle-Orient.
59	dueling protest yemen unfold peacefully thousand pro antigovernment demonstrator held peaceful	Thousands of pro-demonstrators-government peacefully demonstrated in duel.	Thousands of pro-government protesters demonstrated peacefully in a duel.	Thousands of pro @-@government protesters have been protesting peacefully in a duel.
59	yemen president won election	Yemen's president won.	President Yemen has won the elections.	Yemeni president won the elections.
59	revolt contagious anti government protest spread yemen tcot tlot jan sidibouzid	Jan sidibouzid's contagious anti-government uprising has spread the yemen tcotlot.	The contagious anti- @-@government revolt spread the Jan sidibouzid yemen tcotlot.	The contagious anti @-@government revolt spread the Jan sidibouzid yemen tcotlot.
59	yemen president signal won stay freedomwar egypt jan syria feb	The Yemeni President's signal has won the war on the freedom of the country; Egypt Jan.	The Yemeni president's signal won the war of freedom from Egypt Jan Syria Feb.	Yemen's president's signal won Egypt Jan Syria's freedom war.
59	thousand yemeni call president quit thousand yemeni demonstrated capital thursday	Yemen's 1,000th president-elect has called for a thousand Yemenis to leave Yemen's capital on Thursday.	A thousand Yemenis call President to leave a thousand Yemenis have protested capital Thursday.	A thousand Yemenis call president leave a thousand Yemenis marched capital Thursday.
59	thousand rally government yemen	You know, like, a thousand government-yemen rallies.	A thousand government rallies, yemen.	A thousand yemen government rallies.
59	protest start yemen despite concession president hundred anti government protest	A protest against the government was launched against the government, despite a 100-cent concession from the president.	Yemen protest begins despite the president's 100th concession against the government protest against the government.	Yemen protest started despite the 100 concession president against the government protest against the government.
59	obama minute citizen rally president resign egypt	Rally of citizens from Apos; Obama, President of Apos; Egypt has resigned.	Rally of citizens from Apos; Obama, president of Egypt has resigned.	A rally of citizens from Apos; Obama, the president of Apos; Egypt has resigned.
59	yemeni president won extend presidential term yemen	The President of Yemen has obtained an extended term in office in Yemen.	Yemen's President has obtained an extended presidential term in Yemen.	The Yemeni president got an extended presidential term in Yemen.
59	yemen president ali abdullah saleh quit	Yemeni President Abdullah Saleh has resigned.	Yemen ali Abdullah Saleh has resigned.	Yemeni president ali Abdullah Saleh resigned.
59	deutsche welle yemen unsettled president vow relinquish power	Deutsche Bundesche werden werden.	Deutsche Bundesche werden werden.	Deutsche Bundesche können werden.
59	al jazeera report region yemen pres extend term protest call syria	"Al Jazeera reports that the region of Yemen is expanding the term ""Syria"" for protests."	Al Jazeera reports that the Yemeni region extends the protest term called Syria.	Al Jazeera reports that the Yemeni region is expanding the term protest called Syria.
59	yemen girds day rage saleh vow step bloomberg	Yuy girds day rage saleh swear not bloomberg.	Yemen girds day rage saleh swear not bloomberg.	Yuy girds day rage saleh swear not ablomberg.
59	join yemen day rage	Join us-in Yemen's Day Rage.	Join-the day's rage in Yemen.	Join the day rage of Yemen-you.
59	news growing anti regime protest spread yemen	The news from D&apos, an anti-mobility protest, has spread to all over Yemen.	The news d' a protest against-the growing regime spread to Yemen.	The news d' an anti-growing regime protest spread Yemen.
59	protest yemen	Protests Yemen.	Protest Yemen.	To protest Yemen.
59	middle east news ten thousand fill yemen street day rage haaretz follow	Middle @--@ Orient News 10,000 fill day yemen with rage street haaretz follow.	Middle @--@ Orient News 10,000 fill yemen day of street rage haaretz follow.	Middle @--@ Orient News 10,000 fill yemen street rage day haaretz follow.
59	thousand rally government yemen breaking	Thousand yemen of rallying, government breaking yemen.	Thousand government rally yemen breaking yemen.	Thousand yemen rally government breaking yemen.
59	mass rally yemen day rage anti government protester gather yemen capital sanaa day rage	Mass rally on the day of rage against the government protesting gathering sana'a day of rage yemen capital.	Mass rally on the day of rage against the government protesting gathering yemen capital sanaa day of rage.	Rally mass day rage against government protesting gathering yemen capital sanaa day of rage.
59	ten thousand march yemen president ap news	I'm sorry, I'm sorry.	Ten thousand yen, president ap news.	Ten thousand yemen president ap news.
59	egypt ripple ally yemeni prez ali abdullah saleh power year won seek term	I'm a member of the Council of Europe, and I'm a member of the Council of Europe.	L' Egypt undulating yemeni ally prez ali abdullah saleh year of earned search warrant.	Egypt undulating ally yemeni prez ali abdullah saleh year of earned power seek mandate.
59	street yemen day rage	The Rage of the Day in Yemen from the streets.	Yemen Day rage from the streets.	Yemen's day rage from the streets.
59	yemen president ali abdallah saleh power year periodically announces won election	The President of Yemen ali Abdallah Saleh periodically announces that the elections have been won.	Yemeni President ali Abdallah Saleh periodically announces that the election has been won.	President ali Abdallah Saleh periodically announces that the election has been won.
59	yemen president extend term egypt jordan tunisia	President Yemen extends the term of office of the Egyptian President Jordan tunisia.	Yemen's president extends Egyptian president Jordan tunisia's term.	Yemen's president extends the term of office of Egyptian president Jordan tunisia.
59	yemeni rally president	President of the Yemeni Rally.	I'm president of the Yemeni rally.	Yemeni rally president.
59	yemen arrest anti government activist yemen	An anti-government activist-yemen government.	Yemen arrested l' anti-activist-yemen government.	The Yemeni government has arrested the anti-government activist-yemen.
59	yemen president facing protest will seek extend term expires	The Yemeni president, in the face of the protest, will be seeking to extend the term of office.	Yemen's president in the face of the protest will seek to extend his term of office.	Yemen's president in the face of protest will seek to extend the term.
59	yemen protest call president saleh	Yemen's protest movement calls for President Saleh.	The Yemeni protest calls President Saleh.	Yemen's protest calls president Saleh.
59	student activist stage rival demonstration yemeni university	Student activist, competing demonstration Yemeni University.	Student activist, demonstration of the rival Yemeni University.	Student activist, student rival demonstration of Yemeni University.
59	dtn singapore yemen president won stand term sanaa yemeni leader ali abdullah saleh facing	Dtn singapore yemen president has secured the term of office of yemeni ali abdullah saleh leader face-to-face.	Dtn singapore yemen President got the sanaa yemeni leader ali abdullah saleh head-on.	Dtn singapore yemen president got the term sanaa yemeni leader ali abdullah saleh face-to-face.
59	anti government rally yemen stay calm	Anti rally-yemen government remain calm.	Anti rally-yemen government stay calm.	Anti rally-government yemen stay calm.
59	newsshare yemen president won extend term pas son reuters	President Newsshare Yemen won an extended reuters term.	President Newsshare Yemen has won an extended term in his reuters.	The president newsshare yemen won an extended term by his reuters.
59	street yemen day rage sanaa reuters yemeni	Yemeni riots sanaa reuters yemeni.	The rage of Yemeni day sanaa reuters yemeni yemeni.	The Yemeni day rage sanaa reuters yemeni yemeni.
59	pak thousand yemeni demand govt change thousand yemeni street capital sanaa inspir	Pak 1,000 yemeni is asking the government to change 1,000 yemeni capital street inspired 1,000 yemeni.	Pak thousand yemeni asks the government to change 1,000 yemeni capital street sanaa inspired thousand yemeni.	Pak thousand yemeni asks the government to change a thousand yemeni capital street.
59	thousand yemeni demand change government thousand yemeni demand change gov hiring send cv	Yemeni Thousand Are Requesting Change of Government Yemeni Thousand Are Requesting Change of Government.	Yemeni Thousand Requesting Change of Government Yemeni Thousand Requesting Change of Government.	A thousand Yemenis request a change of government Yemenis request a change of government.
59	yemeni doubt president won step	Yemeni doesn't think the president won, step by step.	Yemeni doubts that the president won step by step.	Yemeni doubts the president won step by step.
59	ten thousand yemeni protest sanaa ten thousand yemeni staged day rage calling	Ten thousand Protestant Yemeni sana'a 10,000 Yemenis dramatized the day's rage by appealing for anger.	Ten thousand Protestant Yemeni sana'a ten thousand Yemenis dramatized the day's rage by appealing for the wrath.	Ten thousand Yemeni Protestant sanaa ten thousand Yemenis dramatized the day's rage by appealing for anger.
59	turmoil hit yemen yemen president won seek election hand power son cnn	The agitation struck yemen won president seek to hand power CNNN son.	L&apos agitation struck yemen president won seek to elect hand power CNNN son.	L'apos; agitation struck yemen president won seek to elect hand power son CNNN.
59	president yemen ali abdullah saleh will seek extend presidential term pas power son jan yemen feb	Yemeni president ali abdullah saleh will be seeking to extend his son Jan Yemen feb's presidential term.	Yemeni president ali abdullah saleh will seek to extend Jan Yemen feb's presidential term.	President yemen ali abdullah saleh will seek to extend the presidential term of his son Jan yemen feb.
59	cnn anti government protest yemen hundred anti government protester gathered news	Hundreds of anti-government protesters have been gathering information.	Hundreds of anti-government protesters @-@government gathered some information.	Hundreds of anti @-@government protesters gathered information on the situation.
59	yemeni protester urged president ali abdullah saleh step muhammadjusuf	A Yemeni protester has urged President ali abdullah saleh step muhammadjusuf.	A Yemeni protester urged President ali abdullah saleh step muhammadjusuf.	Yemeni protester urged president ali abdullah saleh step muhammadjusuf.
59	pre empting mass anti government protest ali saleh vow seek extension pas rein	Mass Preemption Anti-protest government ali saleh vire seek extension not kidney.	Anti mass preemption-protest government ali saleh wish to seek extension not kidney.	Mass Preemption anti @-@government protest ali saleh wish to seek extension not kidney.
59	yemen thousand protest government worldnomads travelsafety	Thousands of government-sponsored protests travel safely.	Thousands of government protests all travel safely.	Thousands of government protests travel safely.
59	domino working well yemen call emergency meeting ahead protest cnn	It's a big deal, but it's not a big deal, and it's a big deal.	Dominos who are doing well in Yemen are calling a meeting to protest against the Apos.	The dominoes that are doing well in Yemen are calling an emergency meeting to protest against the Apos; agreement.
59	protest sanaa yemen feb	Sana'a-yemen feb protest.	Sana'a protest yemen feb feb.	Protest sanaa yemen feb feb.
59	police open fire yemen protester sanaa yemen ap witness police opened fire break	Sana'a yemen protestor ap eyewitnesses Police opened fire.	Police open fire protestant sanaa yemen ap witness Police opened fire.	Police open fire The protester sanaa yemen ap witness Police opened fire.
59	bbc yemeni rally president thousand yemeni demonstrating capital sanaa calling president ali abdullah	Bbc Yemeni rally President Thousand Yemeni Capital protest sanaa call president ali abdullah.	Bbc yemeni president thousand yemeni rally capital sanaa call president ali abdullah.	Bbc yemeni rally president thousand yemeni protest capital sanaa call president ali abdullah.
59	yemen president quit february updated	The President of Yemen resigned in February updated.	The president of Yemen resigned in February updated.	Yemen's president resigned in February.
59	anti government rally hit yemen	Anti-government-rally has hit Yemen.	Anti-government rally-government has hit Yemen.	Anti-government rally hit Yemen-government.
59	start era middle east	Middle Era-Orient.	The beginning of the apogee; Middle era-Orient.	L'art de l'apos; era Moyen-Orient.
59	factbox group challenging yemen government reuters	Discussion Group Challenging the Government of Yemen Reuters.	This is a discussion group challenging the government of Yemen Reuters.	Discussion group challenging Reuters government of Yemen.
59	yemen day rage draw ten thousand	Yemen's Day Rage attracts 10,000 people.	Yemen's daily rage level attracts 10,000 people.	The rage of the day in Yemen attracts 10,000 people.
59	tunisia egypt yemen	Tunisian Egyptian Yemen.	The Egyptian Yemen of Tunisia.	Egyptian yemen tunisian.
59	today president alisaleh yemen vowed election support peaceful transition power feb	But today, President Alisaleh Yemen promised that the elections would support a peaceful, feverish transitional power.	Today President Alisaleh Yemen promised that the elections would support a febrile peaceful transitional power.	Today, President alisaleh yemen promised that the election would support a febrile, peaceful transitional government.
59	protest start yemen despite concession president cnn	Launch of the Yemeni protest despite the President of CNN Concession.	Start of the yemen protest despite the president of the CNN concession.	Start of the protest yemen despite the president of CNN dealership.
59	blemish org ten thousand turn rival rally yemen los angeles time reuterstens thousand turn	In spite of this, tens of thousands of people are turning against each other.	Disadvantage or ten thousand turns rival rally yemen los angeles times reuters mille turns.	Disadvantage or ten thousand turn rival rally yemen los angeles times reuters a thousand turns.
59	ten thousand march yemen president sanaa yemen ten thousand lukewilliamss	Sana'a Yemen Sana'a Yemen Sana'a Yemen Sana'a Yemen Sana'a Yemen Sana'a Yemen.	Ten thousand Yemen March President sanaa yemen ten thousand lukewilliamss.	Ten thousand march yemen president sanaa yemen ten thousand lukewilliamss.
59	protester hit street yemen	A protester has been beating Yemen from the street.	A protester hit the streets of the Yemen.	A protester hit Yemen from the street.
59	yemen protest february day rage lt lt lt video yemen protest jan ali abdullah saleh news	Yemen protest in February, rages, there's a video of the protest by the Yemeni, Jan ali abdullah saleh news.	Yemen protest in February, rage, there's a video of the Yemeni protest, Jan ali abdullah saleh news.	Yemen February protest rages, yemen protest video Jan ali abdullah saleh news.
59	yemeni president ruled decade ll seek extend term pas power son reuters	The President of Yemen reigned 10 years after seeking to extend the term of office of his son, Reuters.	Yemen's president reigned 10 years after seeking to extend his son Reuters' term.	Yemen's president reigned ten years after seeking to extend the term of his son Reuters.
59	watching yemen	Watching Yemen.	To watch Yemen.	I mean, look at Yemen.
59	teepeecreek ten thousand march yemen president ap teepeecreek	Teepeecreek March 10,000 Yemen President ap teepeecreek.	Teepeecreek 10,000 March yemen president ap teepeecreek.	Teepeecreek 10,000 march yemen president ap teepeecreek.
60	chipotle face ice inspection state reuters reuters chipotle mexican grill	Chipotle vs. Ice Inspection State Reuters chipotle Mexican chipotle grill reuters.	Chipotle faced inspection of the Mexican grill reuters Reuters chipotle state ice cream.	Chipotle ice inspection state Reuters chipotle Mexican grill reuters.
60	fast food caught immigration crosshairs los angeles dallas reuters chipotle mexican grill lot going	The fast-food has spotted the apos; immigration in order to fry the Los Angeles Reuters Chipotle Mexican Grill.	The fast-food has spotted the apos; immigration in order to grill Los Angeles Dallas Reuters Chipotle Mexican Grill.	The fast-food spotted the apos; immigration to grill Los Angeles Dallas Reuters Chipotle Mexican Grill.
60	chipotle caught immigration crosshairs yahoo news knew genuine mexican working	Chipotle took the pod; online immigration of Yahoo news was aware that authentic Mexicans were working.	Chipotle took it; Yahoo news online immigration knew authentic Mexicans were working.	Chipotle took it; online immigration Yahoo news knew that authentic Mexicans worked.
60	fast food caught immigration crosshairs los angeles dallas reuters chipotle mexican grill lot	The fast-food took refuge in the Los Angeles Reuters targeter Mexican chipotle grill lot.	The fast-food has taken the place; immigration in the Los Angeles Reuters chipotle Mexican grill lot.	The food-fast caught fire; immigration on the Los Angeles Reuters chipotle Mexican grill lot.
60	ih industry news chipotle scrutiny ice	News from the Chipotle Ice Monitoring Industry.	News of the chipotle surveillance ice cream industry.	Ih news from l'apos; industry chipotle ice monitoring chipotle.
60	fast food caught immigration crosshairs reuters	The fast-food drew attention to Immigration on Reuters.	The fast-food attracted the apos; attention of the apos; immigration on Reuters.	The fast @-@food has just caught the attention of the bloggers; immigration on Reuters.
60	chipotle face ice inspection state reuters	This is the first time you've had a chance to check the ice.	The chipotle face inspection of the ice surface state reuters.	The chipotle face inspection ice state reuters.
60	fast food caught immigration crosshairs	The fast-food attracted the attention of l'apos; immigration.	The fast-food attracted the apos; attention of refugees.	The fast-food has just caught the attention of l'apos.
60	chipotle scrutiny illegal worker	Chipotle Control Illegal laborer.	Chipotle control, illegal laborer.	Controlling the chipotle illegal worker.
60	fast food caught immigration crosshairs	The fast-food attracted the attention of l'apos; immigration.	The fast-food attracted the apos; attention of refugees.	The fast-food has just caught the attention of l'apos.
60	fast food caught immigration crosshairs reuters	The fast-food drew attention to Immigration on Reuters.	The fast-food attracted the apos; attention of the apos; immigration on Reuters.	The fast @-@food has just caught the attention of the bloggers; immigration on Reuters.
60	ice scrutiny chipotle broadens	Chipotle of ice; examination of ice; broadens.	The chipotle of the apos; examination of the ice; broadens.	The chipotle of the ice expanded.
60	chipotle ice problem investigation state news immigration	Investigating the Ice Problem: Chipotle Update; Immigration.	Chipotle ice survey Status of news; immigration.	Chipotle ice problem investigation Immigration news report.
60	surprise day immigration crackdown bad american access burrito	Day-surprise of the repression of l' immigration bad American burrito burrito access.	Day-surprise of the repression of l' immigration bad American access burrito burrito.	Day-surprise of the repression of immigration bad American access burrito burrito.
60	chipotle fire hundred immigration raid immigration probe forced mexican chain chipotle fire	It's been a long time since we've been able to get to the U.S. and the U.S.	Chipotle fire one hundred raid raid probe d' immigration forced Mexican chain fire chipotle fire chain chipotle.	Fire chipotle one hundred immigration raid probe d' immigration forced Mexican chain fire chipotle fire chipotle chain.
60	chipotle mexican grill received immigration custom enforcement notice inspection restaurant	Mexican Chipotle grill has been notified by Immigration Customs.	The Mexican Chipotle grill has received a notice from the Mexican Immigration Customs Inspection.	The Mexican chipotle grill received notification from Immigration Customs Inspection.
61	iphone share smartphones phone	Share mobile phones with Iphone.	Iphone share the mobile phone.	Iphone share mobile phones.
61	pcworld android tablet smartphone boost samsung	Pcworld android smartphone booster tablet samsung.	Pcworld android smartphone tablet booster samsung.	Pcworld android tablet smartphone booster samsung.
61	iphone profit swamp competitor iphone cheap smartphone load codswallop	Iphone Competitive iPhone Cheap Smartphone loading codswallop.	Iphone competitive iPhone cheap smartphone loading codswallop.	Iphone profit competitor iphone cheap smartphone loading codswallop.
61	mobile market grew smartphones android driver will drive marke	The mobile s&apos market; is developed smartphones android driver software will drive Marke.	The mobile s&apos market is developed smartphones android driver will drive Marke.	The mobile market s' smartphones android driver will drive Marke.
61	motorola post earnings android	Motorola after winnings Android.	Motorola after the Android winnings.	Motorola after the winnings.
61	iphone share smartphones phone asymco chart	Iphone share your smartphone asymc graphics asymc phone.	Iphone share smartphone asymco graphical asymco phone asymco.	Iphone share smartphones phone asymco graphics asymco.
61	apple account percent smartphone market profit	Percent Apple Account of the Smartphone Market.	Account apple percentage profit from the smartphone market.	Percentage apple account of smartphone market.
61	android tablet smartphone boost samsung samsung electronics reported fresh time sale high	The android smartphone booster samsung samsung electronic tablet android pointed out the high retail time.	The smartphone android tablet booster samsung samsung electronic pointed out high selling fresh time.	Smartphone android tablet booster samsung samsung electronics reported high retail time.
61	idc apple lead rim worldwide smartphone maker	Idc Lead Ring Apple Global Smartphone Manufacturer.	Idc lead rim apple worldwide manufacturer of smartphone.	Idc lead rim apple worldwide smartphone manufacturer.
61	blackberry beating iphone smartphone battle	Blackberry defeats the iPhone Smartphone Battle.	Blackberry beats iphone smartphone battle.	Blackberry beats iphone smartphone battle to iphone.
62	avani news gop senator seek change born citizen usa today	Today, U.S. Senator Gop has been looking for citizen-initiated change.	This is the day when Senator Gop avani seeks the change born citizen used it today.	Today, Senator avani Gop seeks change born citizen used today.
62	florida immigration law focused employer hasn enforced politics ap miamiherald	Immigration to Florida imposed the apamiherald miamiherald policy.	L'apos, an employer focused on the law of immigration to Florida, imposed the policy apamiherald miamiherald.	Lapos; employer focused on the immigration law in Florida imposed apamiherald miamiherald policy.
62	arizona bid block citizenship illegal immigrant anchor baby	Arizona's candidacy for the post-secondary school is blocking citizenship, immigration, and the baby's illegal immigration.	The candidacy of Arizona is blocking citizenship, l' illegal immigrant baby anchor.	Arizona's application blocks citizenship, l' illegal immigrant baby anchor.
62	report immigration law enforced consistently ap	Report that the Immigration Act has been systematically applied.	To report that the implementation of the Immigration Act has been systematic.	Report that immigration law has been systematically enforced.
62	isg alert visa program gao report congress reform needed minimize risk cost immigration	It is important to note, however, that there is a need to reduce the cost of immigration.	Visa program; alert isgao report of the necessary congressional reform to minimize the risk of the cost of immigration.	Visa program; isgao report of congressional reform necessary to minimize risk of immigration.
62	georgia hb immigration reform bill creates staggering cost taxpayer tweak existing law	The proposed Immigration Reform Bill will impose exorbitant costs on taxpayers who amend existing legislation.	The bill on the reform of the Immigration Act imposes exorbitant costs on the taxpayers who amend the existing law.	The immigration reform bill imposes exorbitant costs on taxpayers who amend the existing law.
62	immigration law enforced consistently	The Immigration Act is applied consistently.	The Committee asks for up-dated information in the next report.	The law on immigration is applied consistently.
62	vote delayed immigration verify bill house labor subcommittee adjourned debate directed dep	The House of Commons Labour Committee sub-adjourned the debate.	The House of Commons Labour Committee adjourned the debate.	The debate was adjourned by the sub-Labour Committee of the House of Commons.
62	sodahead state inspired arizona illegal immigration law face tough fiscal reality state iowa	The Illegal Immigration of Immigrants Act of Arizona is inspired by the apos; the harsh fiscal reality of Apos; Iowa.	The law on illegal immigration from the state of Arizona is inspired by the state of the hard fiscal reality of the state of California; Iowa.	Arizona's illegal immigration law is inspired by the state of the hard fiscal reality of the apo; Iowa.
62	commerce bos immigration reform	This is the first time that we have had the opportunity to do so.	The reform of l' migration from trade bos commerce.	Migration from commerce bos commerce.
62	lawmaker question practicality ky immigration bill	The feasibility of the Immigration Bill has been questioned by legislators.	The legislators question the feasibility of the Immigration Bill.	Lawmakers question the feasibility of the immigration bill.
62	state follow arizona lead push immigration bill power	L' Estate follows the apos; Arizona and pushes the bill on immigration.	L' Estate will follow up on Arizona and push the Immigration Bill.	The state follows Arizona and pushes the immigration bill.
62	arizona bid block citizenship illegal immigrant anchor baby tcot tlot	The candidacy of Arizona blocks citizenship, l&apos, illegal immigrant, baby tcot tlot.	The candidacy of Arizona blocks citizenship, l' illegal immigrant baby tcot tlot.	The candidacy of l' Arizona blocks citizenship, l' illegal immigrant baby tcot tlot anchor.
62	stein report gt south dakota bill target illegal immigration	The Stein Report indicates that the South Dakota Bill targets illegal immigration.	The Stein report states that the South Dakota bill targets illegal immigration.	The Stein report states that the South Dakota Bill will target illegal immigration.
62	house kill arizona style immigration bill rep rick rand house pas ari	The House Kills Home; Arizona, the Immigration Bill, Representative Rick Rand, the House not Ari.	The house kills the apo; Arizona, the immigration bill, the representative Rick Rand, the house not Ari.	The house kills Arizona, the immigration bill, the representative Rick Rand, the house not Ari.
62	washington legislature wade immigration debate oregonlive summary requires employe verify	Washington legislature debate on oregon immigration summary requires verification by the employer.	Washington Legislature wade debate on the status; immigration oregonlive summary requires verification by the employer.	Washington legislature wade debate on l' immigration oregonlive summary requires verification by the employer.
62	arizona immigration law blocked judge	Arizona impeached the judge.	Apos law, immigration from Apos Arizona blocked the judge.	The immigration law of the apo; Arizona blocked the judge.
62	riz khan arizona immigration law	Khan Arizona Rice Law; Immigration.	Rice khan Arizona law on l' immigration.	Rice khan Arizona immigration law.
62	missouri court rule immigrant adoption right terminated illegally missouri supreme court tuesday ove	The Supreme Court of Missouri ruled that the right to adopt immigrants had been unlawfully applied to the Supreme Court of Missouri on Tuesday evening.	The Missouri Court ruled that the right to adopt immigrants s&apos applied illegally to the Missouri Supreme Court on Tuesday evening.	The Missouri court ruled that the Missouri supreme court illegally applied the right to adopt immigrants on Tuesday evening.
62	missouri court rule immigrant adoption right terminated illegally missouri supreme court tuesday overtu	The Missouri Court ruled that the Immigrant Adoption Act ended unlawfully in the Missouri Supreme Court on Tuesday.	The Missouri court ruled that the right to marry immigrants ended illegally Tuesday at the Missouri Supreme Court.	The Missouri court ruled that the right to adopt immigrants ended in the Missouri supreme court illegally on Tuesday.
62	splc report examines motivation effect anti immigrant law local state level immigration	The report looks at the impact of anti-mobility policies on the rights of migrants at the local level.	The report examines anti-motivational-rights of immigrants at the local level of the state.	The splc report examines the anti-anti-immigrant law motivating effect at the local level of the state.
62	michael johnston colorado legislator state tuition illegal immigrant proposed necn	Michael Johnston, a lawmaker in the state charged with tuition fees for illegal immigrants, proposed Necn as an alternative.	Michael Johnston, the lawmaker of the state of illegal immigrants' tuition fees, has proposed Necn.	Michael Johnston, the legislator of the state responsible for illegal immigrant fees, proposed Necn.
63	stuxnet lead chernobyl russian	Stuxnet Lead Russian Chernobyl.	Stuxnet lead Chernobyl Russian.	Stuxnet lead russian chernobyl.
63	science fiction author futurist william gibson stuxnet	Science author William Gibson Stuxnet-Futuristic fiction.	L' science writer @-@future fiction William Gibson Stuxnet.	L' author of science @-@future fiction William Gibson Stuxnet.
63	duck security expert warn stuxnet boomerang security	L' duck safety expert, warns Stuxnet boomerang security.	L' duck safety expert warns safety boomerang Stuxnet.	Stuxnet boomerang security expert warns L&apos.
63	duck security expert warn stuxnet boomerang security	L' duck safety expert, warns Stuxnet boomerang security.	L' duck safety expert warns safety boomerang Stuxnet.	Stuxnet boomerang security expert warns L&apos.
63	duck security expert warn stuxnet boomerang security	L' duck safety expert, warns Stuxnet boomerang security.	L' duck safety expert warns safety boomerang Stuxnet.	Stuxnet boomerang security expert warns L&apos.
63	russia stuxnet caused chernobyl david brunnstrom reuters david brunnstrom reuters rus	David Brunnstrom reuters David Brunnstrom reuters Rus Rus.	The Russian stuxnet caused Chernobyl David Brunnstrom reuters David Brunnstrom reuters Rus Rus.	The Russian stuxnet caused David Brunnstrom reuters David Brunnstrom reuters Rus Rus.
63	stuxnet concern iranian health ministry york time published report week describing stuxnet	Stuxnet is about Iran's Ministry of Health, the timing of the Stuxnet report.	Stuxnet refers to the Iranian Ministry of Health, the time it takes for Stuxnet's report to be published.	Stuxnet refers to Iran's Ministry of Health, the report release time describing Stuxnet.
63	william gibson stuxnet panzergeist sez piece cyberpunk author william gibson share finding	William Gibson Stuxnet panzergeist sez authored cyberpunk William Gibson share find.	William Gibson Stuxnet panzergeist sez piece cyberpunk author William Gibson share find find.	William Gibson Stuxnet panzergeist sez piece cyberpunk author William Gibson share finding it.
64	check article fox news sideline test detect concussion minute	Read the article by Fox News about the secondary test for the detection of concussion.	Read the appos; Fox News article on secondary concussion testing.	Read Fox News article about the secondary concussion test.
64	aggressive tackling learn lasting damage concussion teen	Aggressive plating teaches long-term adolescent concussion.	Aggressive plating learns lasting adolescent concussion damage.	Aggressive plating teaches lasting damage teenage concussion.
64	buck belief nba concussion protocol three year ago ucla luc richard mbah moute sust	The belief nba protocol of concussion three years ago UCLA luc Richard mbah moute sust.	The belief nba concussion protocol three years ago, UCLA luc Richard mbah moute sust.	The belief nba concussion protocol three years ago UCLA luc Richard mbah moute sust.
64	multiple concussion raise teen athlete health risk health news	Multiple concussions increase health risks for adolescent athletes.	The health risks of adolescent athletes are increased by multiple concussions.	A multiple concussion increases the health risks of adolescent athletes.
64	aaron rodgers concussion nfl playoff packer quarterback hiding brain injury	Aaron Rodgers' NFL concussion, playoff quarterback, hides brain injury.	Aaron Rodgers NFL concussion playoff quarterback hides the brain injury.	Aaron Rodgers NFL concussion playoff quarterback hiding brain damage.
64	impact sensor slated nfl helmet season playbook	NFL headset detector; impact programmed for the NFL headset season.	D&apos detector; impact programmed for the season of NFL helmets.	Dapos detector; programmed impact for NFL helmet season.
64	sideline test accurately detects athlete concussion minute	Key-line control will accurately detect the minute of concussion in the athlete.	The key-line control accurately detects the minute of concussion in the athlete.	Key-line control accurately detects minute concussion in the athlete.
64	footballer destroying kid brain game	He's a football player who's trying to destroy a child's brain.	A football player who destroys the brain of a child.	A football player destroying the brain of a child.
64	nfl official mike quick pa sport concussion bill tough mentality permeates youth sport	The NFL's draft law on rapid concussions in sports has had a profound impact on young people's sports.	The NFL's draft law on rapid concussions in sport has deeply permeated the sport of young people.	The NFL's rapid concussions in sport bill had a profound impact on youth sports.
64	live discussion concussion sport start est join hash tag cdcheadsup	Begin chat live sport commussion is attached cdcheadsup hash tag.	Begin chat live sport commussion is attached hash tag cdcheadsup.	Start of live discussion on sport commussion is now attached hash tag cdcheadsup.
64	national hockey league concussion rise sidney crosby marc ap sport staff associated pressp	The National Hockey League causes Sidney Crosby Marc ap, the sports-related media personnel, to suffer a concussion.	The National Hockey League causes a concussion at Sidney Crosby Marc ap, sports-related press personnel.	The National Hockey League causes a concussion at Sidney Crosby Marc ap, the press staff associated with the sport.
64	sidney crosby concussion raise safety debate hockey spark discussion	Soldiers improve target precision on sniper course Valcartier, QC – Course tests ability to hit targets in varying weather.	Sidney Crosby commotion stirs safety debate Hockey sparks discussion on the sparks of hockey.	Sidney Crosby's commotion ignites safety debate Hockey sparks hockey spark.
64	pa committee approves youth sport concussion bill harrisburg pa whtm state senate education committ	The Committee approves the Harrisburg Bill on Youth Sports Commotion and Education in the Senate.	The committee approved the Harrisburg bill on youth and sport-related injuries; education in the Senate.	The committee approves the Harrisburg bill on youth sports commotion and education in the Senate.
64	usa today sport buck forward belief nba concussion protocol	It's the first time I've had the pleasure of being able to work with you.	Usa today; sport oil before belief in a concussion protocol.	We use today; sport oil before belief nba concussion protocol.
64	multiple concussion raise teen athlete health risk yahoo	Multiple concussions increase the risk to teenage athletes.	Multiple concussions increase the risk to the health of adolescent athletes.	Multiple concussions increase health risk for adolescent athletes.
64	nytimessports oversight group vow pursue update football helmet standard	The Nytimessports Monitoring Group (NYPSG) is committed to updating the football helmets standard.	Nytimessports Monitoring Group s&apos commits to updating the standard for football helmets.	The nytimessports monitoring group s&apos commits to update football helmets standard.
64	school tackling cut teen concussion	L' S&apos school; Attack with adolescent concussion.	L' school sn' attacks on adolescent concussion.	L' school s' attack to concussion in teenagers.
64	hosting live chat concussion cdcheadsup rehearsed emergency plan chat	Live chat, chat, chat, chat, chat, chat, chat, chat, chat.	Animation d' a live chat chat cdcheadsup plan d' urgency repeated chat plan.	Animation d' a live chat chat chat plan cdcheadsup plan d&apos.
64	usa hockey considering proposal increase safety	This is the only way you will be able to enjoy the game.	Usa hockey considering the proposal to increase the safety.	Usa hockey considering proposal to increase safety.
64	nfl concussion people survey wix jsquared concussion	Concussion people examine Wix Jsquared concussion.	People from the concussion examine Wix Jsquared concussion.	The concussion people are examining Wix Jsquared's concussion patterns.
64	mbah moute nba concussion protocol usa today share friend sport basketball nba	Mbah moute nba commotion protocol today; today we share friends sport basketball Nba NBA.	Mbah moute nba commotion protocol today; hui usa share friend basketball sport Nba NBA.	Mbah moute nba concussion protocol today; today we share the best of NBA basketball.
64	vital sign helmet guard aaron rodgers	Vital Signs - Helmet Guardian Aaron Rodgers.	Aaron Rodgers, helmet keeper.	Vital signs helmet guard Aaron Rodgers.
64	doctor lounge multiple concussion raise teen athlete health risk	The risks to the health of adolescent athletes are increased by the multiple concussions in the doctors' lounge.	The multiple concussions at the Salon des Médecins will increase the risk to the health of adolescent athletes.	The multiple concussions in the doctors' lounge increase teenage athlete health risks.
64	news pa lawmaker concussion response standard student athlete	Parliament's Response to Standard Concussion D'apos; Student Athlete.	Parliament's response to the standard concussion of a student athlete.	A student athlete is a student athlete who has been diagnosed with a neurological disability.
64	multiple concussion raise teen athlete health risk medline	Multiple concussions increase the risk of teenage athletes' health.	A multiple concussion increases the risk to the health of the athletes in their teens.	A multiple concussion increases the risk to the health of adolescent athletes.
64	sidney crosby concussion raise safety debate hockey spark discussion	Soldiers improve target precision on sniper course Valcartier, QC – Course tests ability to hit targets in varying weather.	Sidney Crosby commotion stirs safety debate Hockey sparks discussion on the sparks of hockey.	Sidney Crosby's commotion ignites safety debate Hockey sparks hockey spark.
64	school tackling cut teen concussion bull ring drill football	He was attacked by a young victim of a concussion.	L' school scene; attacked a young victim of a concussion.	The school is attacked by a concussion of a young victim.
64	sherrington player steerlers james harrison concussion seriously super bowl xlv news sportsdaydfw	Sherrington Steerlers player James Harrison seriously concussion super bowl xlv sportsdaydfw news.	Sherrington Steerlers player James Harrison concussion seriously super bowl xlv sportsdaydfw news.	Sherrington Steerlers player James Harrison concussion seriously super bowl xlv news sportsdaydfw.
64	testing track student recovery sport concussion milford daily news	Testing the Recovery Trail for Student Sports Concussion Milford Daily Journal new concussion.	Test the track recovery of students sports concussion Milford daily journal new concussion.	Test the Milford sports commotion student recovery track daily newspaper fresh concussion.
64	aaron rodgers helmet saved concussion bear green bay packer qb aaron rodgers believ	Aaron Rodgers helmet saved commotion green packer bear Aaron Rodgers believe.	Aaron Rodgers helmet saved concussion green bear packager qb Aaron Rodgers believe.	Aaron Rodgers helmet saved concussion green bear packager qb Aaron Rodgers believev.
64	press release nocsae urge parent athlete fact concussion football	Press release, nocsae squeezes the parent athlete, who is a concussion footballer.	Press release nocsae squeeze the parent athlete made football concussion.	Press release nocsae squeeze the concussion football athlete parent.
64	nfl concussion news goodell order super bowl played hand touch	Nflussion news Goodell Super Bowl Order hand-played touch.	Nflussion news Super Bowl order hit handy Goodell.	Nflussion news Super Bowl Super Goodell order played hand-to-hand.
64	school tackling cut teen concussion bull ring drill football	He was attacked by a young victim of a concussion.	L' school scene; attacked a young victim of a concussion.	The school is attacked by a concussion of a young victim.
64	sidney crosby concussion rule change braine hope pray doesn sight	Sidney Crosby, concussion, rule change, hopes that the prayer n&apos is not visible.	Sidney Crosby, concussion, rule change, hopes that prayer n' is not visible.	Sidney Crosby, concussion, rule change, hope that the n&apos prayer is invisible.
64	sideline test detect concussion minute foxnews	Foxnews minute commotion lateral test.	Side-by-side testing for foxnews minute concussion.	Lateral test for concussion minute foxnews.
64	don agree hines ward nfl concussion hypocrisy	I don't think it's a good idea, but I think it's a good idea.	I'm not deaf; agree with the hypocrisy of the concussion.	I don't agree with the hypocrisy of concussion.
65	best buy future proof tech purchase buy program cost complete range con	It is better to buy the next technology; test the product; purchase the complete program with the full range.	It is best to purchase future D&apos technology; D&apos test; full-range, full-line program cost purchase.	It's better to buy future technology from D' D&apos testing; full program cost with full range.
65	best buy sell verizon iphone best buy announced wednesday will offer verizon iphone	It's the first time you'll be able to buy an iPhone, but it's not the only way to do that.	Best buy sale iphone verizon best buy announced Wednesday will offer iphone verizon.	The best buy sale verizon iphone best buy announced Wednesday will offer verizon iphone.
65	best buy future proof tech purchase buy program cost istockanalyst press release	The best to buy future software technology istockanalyst program proof purchase istockanalyst press release.	The best buy future d&apos technology; proof purchase program istockanalyst istockanalyst press release.	Best buy future technology d' proof purchase program cost istockanalyst press release.
65	find best buy upgraded upgrade buy program	Best Buy updated the d&apos program; purchase upgrade.	Best Buy updated the d&apos program; upgrade purchase.	Best Buy updated the program d' upgrade purchase.
65	maclife best buy selling verizon iphone starting february verizon customer pic	Maclife best buy iphone Verizon sales from February onwards Verizon Verizon customer image.	Maclife best buy sale verizon iphone as of February client image verizon verizon.	Maclife best buy sale verizon iphone from February image client verizon verizon.
65	best buy launch electronics buy program ap ap timing shopping gadget	Best Buy Electronics purchase program ap ap-time gadget shopping gadget.	Best Buy Electronics buy program ap ap timing gadget shopping gadget ap.	Best Buy Electronics buy program ap ap timing gadget shopping gadget.
65	post best buy buy official free february	Best purchase after February.	Best purchase post-February free of charge.	Best post February purchase free of charge.
65	quora will best buy electronics buy consumer answer	Quora better buy electronic consumer response.	Quora better buy e-commerce buy the consumer response.	Quora better buy electronics buy consumer response.
65	best buy buy program don upgrade major electronic equipment	The Best Buy programme does not upgrade the main electronic equipment.	Best Buy does not upgrade any major electronic equipment.	The Best Buy program does not upgrade major electronic equipment.
65	best buy launch electronics buy program	Best purchase e-launch program; purchase.	Best purchase e-launch program d' purchase.	Best purchase electronic launch program d' purchase.
65	report hint best buy stock verizon iphone launch best buy outlet will varying amoun	The report suggests that the Best Buy inventory will vary from one point of sale to another.	The report suggests that the inventory Best Buy verizon iphone launch Best Buy outlet will vary.	The report suggests that Best Buy inventory verizon iphone launch Best Buy outlet will vary.
65	alert best buy announces buy program electronics news alert	It's a great place to shop, and it's a great place to shop.	The best purchase is the alert announces the purchase of apos, an electronic program.	The best buy of the product; alert announces the purchase of the product; an electronic purchase program.
65	best buy launch electronics buy program ap	Best e-procurement purchase to purchase the ap-programmer.	Best e-procurement to buy the ap program.	Best e-buying to buy the program ap launch.
65	best buy launch electronics buy program timing shopping gadget socialmedia	Best e-buying to buy the program cadencement gimmick socialmedia.	Best e-buying to buy the socialmedia gadget cadencement program.	Best e-buying buy the program cadencement gadget socialmedia launch.
65	best buy launch electronics buy program timing shopping gadget	Best e-buying to buy the Quick Start Gadget Timing program; purchase.	Best eBuy to buy the program cadencementment gadget d' purchase.	Best e-procurement buy to buy the gadget cadencement program d&apos.
65	best buy launch electronics buy program	Best purchase e-launch program; purchase.	Best purchase e-launch program d' purchase.	Best purchase electronic launch program d' purchase.
65	best buy target launch buy electronics offer currently rachel blog travel industry news	Best Buy Target Buy Electronics is currently offering rachel's latest news blog from the travel industry.	Best Buy Target Buy Electronics currently offers rachel news blog from l' travel industry.	Best Buy Target Buy Electronics currently offers the travel industry news rachel blog.
65	catch best buy buyback extended cut full info	The most advantageous buyout option has been extended, and all the information is available.	The most advantageous buyout has been extended, and all information is available.	The most advantageous buyout has been extended and all information is available.
65	best buy buy official free february best buy gadget repurchase breakingnews fb	Best Free Official Purchase February Best Free Fb Buy Fb Breaknews fb Buyback Gadget.	Best official purchase free February best purchase fb buy fb breaknews fb gimmick.	Best Free Official Purchase February best buy fb breaknews fb redeem gadget.
66	joanna yeates suspect court img	Joanna Yeates suspects the court.	Joanna Yeates suspected the court img.	Joanna Yeates is a suspect in the court img.
66	vincent tabak appears court charged murder	Vincent Tabak seems to have been charged with the murder.	Vincent Tabak seems to have been charged with murder.	Vincent Tabak appears to have been charged with murder.
66	sun man charged killing jo yeates police tonight charged year vincent tabac murder	L' sunshine man accused the police of killing Jo Yeates tonight, accused of the crime scene; year Vincent tobacco murder.	L' sun man accused police of killing Jo Yeates tonight, accused of the apo; year Vincent tobacco murder.	The sun man accused the police of killing Jo Yeates tonight accused of murdering Vincent Tobacco.
66	msn today joanna yeates suspect court	Joanna Yeates is a suspect.	I'm sorry, but I don't know what to do.	Today; hui Joanna Yeates suspect court.
66	vincent tabak man accused jo yeates murder deeply saddened death	Vincent Tabak Man accused Jo Yeates of grievous death.	Vincent Tabak Man has accused Jo Yeates of murder deeply saddened by death.	Vincent Tabak Man accused Yeates of murder deeply saddened by death.
66	breaking news jo murder accused remanded	I've just received the latest news that Jo has been taken into custody for murder.	Latest news, Jo charged with murder has been remanded to custody.	Latest news Jo has been remanded on murder charges.
66	neighbour remanded jo yeates murder	Neighbor just fired Jo Yeates for murder.	Neighbor fired Jo Yeates for murder.	Jo Yeates was fired for murder by the neighbor.
66	vincent tabak charged murder joanna yeates	Vincent Tabak accused Joanna Yeates of murder.	Vincent Tabak accused Joanna Yeates of murder.	Vincent tabak accused Joanna Yeates of murder.
66	joanna yeates murder accused vincent tabak remanded custody vincent tabak man accused murdering	This is Joanna Yeates, a murderer charged with murder Vincent Tabak, and Vincent Tabak, a man charged with murder.	Joanna Yeates murderous accused of murder Vincent Tabak remanded Vincent Tabak into custody as a man charged with murder.	Joanna Yeates murderous accused Vincent Tabak remanded Vincent Tabak as a man accused of murder.
66	uk news neighbour remanded jo yeates murder	Uk news from neighboring Yeates jail.	Uk news neighboring detention j jo yeates assassinate.	Uk neighbor's news remanded jo yeates murder.
66	real life murder freaked dutch man killer gt	Real murder scared a Dutch killer.	A Dutch killer was scared to death by a real murder.	A real murder scared a Dutch killer to death.
66	joanna yeates vincent tabak charged murder	Joanna Yeates Vincent Tabak was accused of murder.	Joanna Yeates Vincent Tabak has been charged with murder!	Joanna Yeates Vincent Tabak has been charged with murder in the past.
66	man charged joanna yeates murder	One accused Joanna Yeates of murder.	A man accused Joanna Yeates of murder.	A man accused Joanna Yeates of murder.
66	vincent tabak man accused jo yeates murder deeply saddened death telegraph	Vincent Tabak Man has accused Jo Yeates of murder, deeply sad telegraph of death.	Vincent Tabak Man accused Jo Yeates of a deeply sad death telegraph.	Vincent Tabak Man accused Yeates of murder deeply sad telegraph of death.
66	avon somerset police charged vincent tabak murder jo yeates hope life ruined	Avon Somerset has accused Vincent Tabak of Jo Yeates's murder.	Apos police Avon Somerset accused Vincent Tabak of murder Jo Yeates hopes that his life will be ruined.	Apos police Avon Somerset accused Vincent Tabak of murder Jo Yeates hopes life ruined.
67	chicken dumpling	Chicken balls.	Chicken balls!	Uh, chicken balls.
67	pesto presto chicken pesto presto chicken feel good favorite cozy meal famil	The pesto chicken pesto presto pesto pesto chicken feel good family of favorite cozy meals.	The pesto presto chicken pesto presto chicken feel good family of meals favorite cozy.	The pesto presto chicken pesto presto chicken feel good favorite cozy family meal.
67	check delicious chicken recipe	Check the delicious chicken recipes on the menu.	Please check the delicious chicken recipes.	Check delicious chicken recipes.
67	diablo chicken chili recipe	Chili diablo recipe.	Chili diablo chicken recipe, please.	Devil's chicken chili recipe.
67	super smoker sweet spicy wing perfect sunday sb smokedrecipes footballfood recipe	The hotel is located in the heart of the city, close to the beach and close to the beach.	Super smoker spicy wing perfect Sunday sb smoked recipe from Apos; diet football food recipe.	Super smoker spicy wing perfect Sunday sb smoky recipe for food recipes.
67	seriousy gt super bowl food level recipe rock tequila spiked wing luv	It's a very good game, but it's a good game and it's a good game.	Super bowl serious recipe level level rock tequila doped wing d' love winged.	Super bowl serious flat level rock tequila level recipe doped wing d' love wing.
67	favorite thing chicken breast	Favorite stuff,chicken breast.	Favorite thing, chicken breast.	Uh, favorite thing, chicken breast.
67	delicious chicken curry recipe hope will	A delicious recipe for curried chicken that will inspire hope.	This delicious recipe for chicken curry will give you hope.	A delicious chicken curry recipe that gives hope.
67	luv gt mock chicken fettuccine alfredo grocery store dinner	L' love also mocking chicken dinner alfredo dinner; deli dinner.	L' love also mocking chicken fettuccine alfredo dinner d' deli dinner.	I love chicken fettuccine alfredo dinner d'apos; groceries dinner.
67	learning recipe doesn cream potato soup cream chicken soup	The recipe for learning does not cream the soup of potatoes soup soup soup soup soup of chicken to the cream.	Apprenticeship recipe don't cream soup potato soup soup soup soup soup soup soup soup soup soup soup to cream.	The recipe for learning does not cream potato soup soup soup soup soup soup soup soup chicken to cream.
67	cook seared chicken apricot sauce chili rubbed steak pan salsa	Chili apricot chicken stir-fry with Steak Pan salsa salsa.	Steak pan salsa salsa sautéed chicken chili apricot sauce rub steak pan salsa.	Cuisine sauté sauce chicken apricot chili rub steak pan salsa salsa.
67	karaage japanese fried chicken recipe blog	Karaage blogger japanese fried chicken recipe fried chicken.	Blog karaage japanese fried chicken recipe fried chicken.	Blog karaage japanese fried chicken recipe fried chicken.
67	ultimate chicken soup	L&apos, l&apos, L&apos, L&apos, L&apos.	It's the last chicken soup in the world.	L' chicken soup final.
67	chicken parm classic comfort food katie lee share recipe add garlic bread good measure anyon	Classic chicken parmesan comforting katie is sharing the recipe to add bread to bear.	Chicken with classic comforting parmesan katie shares the recipe add bread to l' good measure teddy bear.	Classic chicken parmesan comforting katie'e share the recipe add bread to l' good measure bear.
67	mama favorite easy chicken pasta mother knew food knew hand	Mom liked the easy chicken pasta more than the mom knew the food knew the way.	Mom liked easy chicken pasta better than mom knew food knew the way.	Mama preferred easy chicken pasta to mama knew food knew the way.
67	grilled chicken tomato salad	Chicken-chicken tomato salad, please.	Grilled chicken tomato salad.	I'll have a grilled chicken tomato salad.
67	healthy super bowl snack superbowl recipe	The Super Bowl Healthy Snack Super-Superbowl recipe.	The super-superbowl's recipe for Super Bowl's healthy snack.	Super-superbowl recipe for healthy Super Bowl snack.
67	recipe chicken cutlet	Chicken chop recipe.	Chicken pork chops.	Uh, chicken cutlet recipe.
67	sinfully spicy easy easy eat reshmi chicken kebab roll indianfood recipe indianfastfood	Easy-to-eat spicy registration reshmi kebab chicken kebab Indian roll Indian fast food Indian recipe.	Spicy sound easy to eat reshmi chicken kebab Indian roll Indian fast food Indian recipe.	Spicy registration easy to eat reshmi chicken kebab roll roll Indian food recipe fastfood Indian.
67	wing healthy oven fried wing drip pan fat drain	Air-fired, fried drop drop-to-drop fat drain.	Healthy wing oven fried drop drop drop to drop fat drain.	Healthy wing oven fried drop drop fat drain drop drop.
67	bbc food recipe thai green chicken curry	Thai bbc Green Chicken Curry Recipes.	Thai bbc food recipe with green chicken curry.	Thai green chicken curry bbc food recipe.
67	cozy scene recipe gluten free fried chicken hsoul	A cozy, gluten-free, chicken-fried hsoul scene.	Cozy gluten-free chicken fried hsoul recipe scene.	Cosy gluten-free chicken hsoul recipe scene.
67	gourmet mom anise chicken recipe	Mama's gourmet chicken-chicken recipe.	Mother gourmet chicken recipe.	You know, Mom's gourmet chicken recipe.
67	orange chicken twist chinese delicious	Chicken at lapos; delicious Chinese twist orange.	Chicken apo; Chinese twist orange delicious.	The chicken at l' Chinese twist orange delicious Chinese.
67	spicy food popular child quick thai style chicken soup will hit	Popular spicy food Thai children chicken soup fast will hit.	Popular Thai child spicy food fast chicken soup will hit.	Popular spicy food Thai child fast chicken soup will hit the spot.
67	best recipe caesar salad caesarsalad	Best Caesar Caesar salad.	Best recipe for Caesar salad caesarean.	This is the best recipe for Caesar Caesar salad.
67	quick avgolemono orzo chicken soup recipe	Quick recipe for chicken orzo avgolemono orzo soup.	Quick recipe for orzo avgolemono orzo chicken soup.	Quick recipe avgolemono orzo chicken soup orzo orzo.
67	marinated roast half chicken	Half-eaten roast chicken-chicken.	Pickled roast chicken half-chicken.	Chicken roast marinated half-chicken.
67	simple easy prepare vintage fried chicken recipe	Simply and easily prepare a vintage chicken-fried recipe.	Simply and easily prepare a vintage fried chicken recipe.	Simply and easily prepare vintage fried chicken recipe.
67	yummy recipe tuesday chicken fricasse	Delicious recipe Tuesday, chicken-fricky.	You know, delicious recipe Tuesday, chicken fricassee.	Delicious recipe Tuesday, chicken fricassee.
67	creamy recipe fettuccine alfredo chicken recipe	Creamy fettuccine fettuccine alfredo recipe chicken.	Fettuccine creamy recipe alfredo chicken recipe.	Creamy recipe fettuccine fettuccine alfredo chicken recipe.
67	menu tonight chicken curry recipe	Tonight's special, recipe for chicken curry.	Chicken curry recipe tonight.	Menu tonight, chicken curry recipe.
67	baked slow cooker chicken crockpotrecipes	Crockpotrecipes slow-simmer baked.	Slow-simmer baked chicken crockpotrecipes.	Chicken crockpotrecipes baked in slow-simmering oven.
67	recipe super bowl slider super bowl party food big comfy flavor ease day	Recipe Super Bowl Super Bowl slider Super Bowl party food great great great flavor comfortable day of taste ease.	Recipes Super Bowl slider Super Bowl party food great great great flavor comfortable day of easy taste.	Super Bowl slider Super Bowl party food recipe great great flavor comfortable day of easy taste.
67	perfect super bowl chili	The perfect chili from the Super Bowl, man.	It's the perfect chili from the super bowl.	The perfect super bowl chili.
67	basic chicken saute recipe	Chicken stir-fry base recipe.	Basic recipe for chicken stir fries.	Basic recipe for chicken stir-fry.
67	super bowl recipe buffalo chicken pizza	Buffalo Chicken Pizza Super Bowl Recipe.	Super bowl of Buffalo Chicken chicken pizza recipe.	Super bowl pizza recipe buffalo chicken chicken.
67	chicken cutlet caper sauce recipe simply recipe	The recipe for the Caper Sauce of Chicken Chops is simply a recipe.	The recipe for chicken chop caper sauce is simply a recipe recipe.	The chicken cutlet caper sauce recipe is simply a recipe recipe.
67	chicken piccata dinner yum	Chicken piccata yum.	Yummy chicken piccata dinner.	Chicken piccata dinner yummy.
67	blog post farm fresh recipe idea easy chicken wing week farm fresh recipe idea geared towar	Firm blog post-farm idea of fresh week wing chicken recipe easy idea of fresh war-oriented recipe.	Post-firm blog idea of fresh, war-oriented chicken wing week recipe easy idea.	Firm post blog idea of fresh chicken wing week recipe easy idea of fresh war-oriented recipe.
67	super bowl recipe gumbo fried chicken grilled salmon ciabatta patch top notch recipe	Super bowl Gumbo chicken fried salmon top-of-the-line premium recipe patch ciabatta.	Super bowl recipe Gumbo chicken fried salmon ciabatta top-of-the-range recipe patch.	Recipes super bowl Gumbo chicken fried salmon ciabatta patch top-of-the-range recipe.
67	rp cooking update italian recipe food cooking recipe	Update on Cooking Italian Recipes Cooking recipe.	Update on cooking Italian recipes Food cooking recipe.	Italian recipe cooking update Food cooking recipe.
67	creamy chicken mushroom pot pot pie topper abc news rachael ray share meal reheat	Mushroom Creamy Chicken pot pie to top abc news rachael Ray share the heating of meals.	Mushroom creamy chicken pot pie to top abc news rachael Ray share meal warming.	Creamy chicken mushroom pot pie to top abc news rachael Ray share meal warming.
67	shredded chicken hope guide shredded chicken helpful al	Ripped Chicken, Handbook of Hope, Ragged Chicken, Helpful, para.	Shredded chicken, chicken guide, hope, shredded chicken, helpful, paras.	Chicken, shredded chicken, guide to food; hope, chicken shreds, serviceable, paras.
67	recipe roast chicken warm lemon herb potato salad recipe day	Roast Recipient Hot Chicken Lemon Grass Potato Salad Recipient Potato Salad Recipient Day.	Recipes roast chicken hot lemon weeds potato salad recipe day potato salad recipes.	Chicken roast recipe hot lemon herb potato salad recipe day potato salad recipe.
67	moroccan roasted chicken orange juice recipe recipe moroccan roasted chicken orange	Recipes of Moroccan roast chicken roast Moroccan roast chicken roast chicken roast chicken orange juices.	Recipes Moroccan juice recipe; roast chicken orange roast chicken roast chicken roast Moroccan chicken.	Recipes of the Moroccan recipe for d&apos juice; roasted chicken orange roast chicken roast chicken of Moroccan roast chicken.
67	easy weight loss recipe healthy recipe learn transform favorite food weight	Easy Weight Loss Recipe Healthy recipe Learn how to transform weight from fast food.	Easy weight loss recipe Healthy recipe learn to transform the weight of l'apos; preferred food.	Weight loss recipe easy healthy recipe learn to transform preferred food weight.
67	super bowl recipe gumbo fried chicken grilled salmon ciabatta serve big party	Recipes of super bowl of grilled gumbo salmon ciabatta to serve great party.	Super bowl dish of grilled gumbo salmon ciabatta serve great celebration chicken dish.	Super bowl recipe of grilled chicken gumbo salmon ciabatta serve big party.
67	twitter tweet perennial plant january bloomnflower recipe recipe	Twitter tweet perennial plant January flower recipe flower from the recipe flower of the January flower.	Twitter tweet perennial plant January flower recipe flower of the January flower recipe flower.	Twitter tweet perennial plant January flower recipe flower January flower recipe flower.
67	time superbowl start time start planning wing recipe great wing recipe	Superbowl time begins time planning large recipe wing big wing.	The time superbowl time begins to plan the recipe wing large recipe wing big wing.	The time superbowl time starts to plan great recipe wing big wing.
67	crispy chicken drumstick ranch dressing recipe	Ranch salad dressing for crispy chicken fingers.	Ranch dressing recipe for crispy chicken fingers.	This is a ranch dressing recipe for crispy chicken fingers.
67	recipe chicken cutlet	Chicken chop recipe.	Chicken pork chops.	Uh, chicken cutlet recipe.
67	easy recipe ranch house casserole recipe	Easy-to-prepare recipe, ranch stew.	It's easy to prepare a recipe, a recipe for ranchhouse stew.	Recipes easy to prepare, recipe from home ranch stew.
67	kung pao chicken recipe	Kung Pao Chicken Recipes.	Chicken kung pao recipe, please.	This is a kung pao chicken recipe.
67	rp cooking update chicken vegetable stir fry recipe readyseteat food recipe cook	Update on baking Chicken, Vegetables, French fries, ready meals-to serve and ready meals.	Updated cooking of chicken, vegetables, french fries, ready meals @-serve and ready meals.	Update on cooking chicken, vegetables, fries, ready meals-to serve and ready meals.
67	special chicken stew recipe chicken recipe stew recipe jamie oliver recipe love oliver bright star	Special recipe chicken stew recipe chicken stew jamie recipe oliver recipe d'apos; love oliver star bright oliver.	Special recipe chicken stew recipe chicken stew recipe jamie oliver recipe d' love oliver bright star oliver.	Special recipe chicken stew recipe chicken stew recipe jamie oliver recipe d' love oliver bright star oliver.
67	ayam goring fried chicken rinse chicken inside cold running water pat dry paper tow	Chicken should be rinsed at the same time; cold water running while tapping dry paper towed.	Chicken fried Ayam goring rinse chicken at the top; cold running water tapping towed paper.	Ayam goring fried chicken rinse chicken with lapos; cold running water while tapping towed paper.
67	chicken vegetable herb brown rice	Chicken grass, brown rice.	Chicken, grass, brown rice!	Uh, chicken, grass, brown rice.
67	reading chicken taco rice chicken taco rice yum yum yum eat plate coul	Reading chicken taco rice chicken taco rice miam miam miam eat plate coulis.	Read chicken taco rice chicken taco rice yum yum yum yum eat grilled plate.	Reading chicken taco rice chicken taco rice yum yum yum yum eat plate slurry.
67	parmesan chicken broccoli pasta cocktail mom recipe husband love	Chicken broccoli cocktail chicken Parmesan pasta mama recipe husband love recipe.	Chicken broccoli Parmesan cocktail pasta mom recipe husband love recipe.	Parmesan chicken broccoli cocktail pasta mom recipe husband love recipe.
67	chicken brick mark bittman simple delicious recipe mark bittman ny time column	Chicken Brick Bittmann Brand Simple recipe tasting bittmann brand ny time column bittmann ny.	Chicken brick brand bittman simple recipe delicious brand bittman ny time column bittman ny.	Bittman brand chicken brick simple recipe delicious brand bittman ny time column bittman ny.
67	east chicken fettuccine recipe chicken recipe cooking	Chicken fettuccine; East, recipe chicken, cooking.	Chicken fettuccine de l'apos; Est, chicken recipe recipe, cooked.	Chicken fettuccine from the east, chicken recipe cooked.
67	perfect super bowl party food bbq chicken pouch post	The perfect post-chicken bbq chicken-pocket bowl party.	The perfect bowl party bbq chicken pockets post chicken.	The perfect super bowl party bbq chicken pockets post-chicken.
67	winter coleslaw chicken salad sandwich kitchen season ross dobson wo	Chicken salad, chicken salad, coleslaw, Ross Dobson's cooking season.	Cobbage salad, chicken salad, cabbage salad, Ross Dobson's cooking season.	Chicken salad, chicken salad, coleslaw, cooking season Ross Dobson wo.
67	chicken cavatelli soup	Chicken soup, cavatelli.	Chicken cavatelli soup.	Uh, chicken cavatelli soup.
67	low fat recipe lunchbox idea diet plan dinner tonight	Low-fat lunch-box idea, diet, dinner tonight.	Low-fat lunch box idea, diet, dinner plans tonight.	You know, low-fat lunch box idea, diet, dinner tonight.
67	fabulous recipe mexican caldo pollo chicken soup jalepeno cheese cornbread	Wonderful caldo Mexican recipe pollo chicken soup Jalepeno corn bread with corn cheese.	This recipe is a fabulous Mexican caldo pollo chicken soup Jalepeno cornbread with corn cheese.	Recipe fabulous Mexican caldo pollo chicken soup corn-cheese cornbread Jalepeno.
67	delirious today feeling well time jewish penicillin chicken soup	It's been a long time since I've had the pleasure of working with you.	Delusional today; feeling good times chicken soup to Jewish penicillin.	Delusional today; feeling like a Jewish penicillin chicken soup time.
67	healthy recipe dinner sue healthy lifestyle	Sue Healthy Living Cookie Luncheon.	Healthy eating dinner Sue healthy lifestyle.	Healthy Food Luncheon Sue is a healthy lifestyle event.
67	orange glazed chicken wing recipe	Ice-cold orange wings.	Dapos recipe; orange wings iced.	A recipe for frozen orange chicken wings.
67	chicken rice melange recipe chicken recipe cooking	Chicken, rice, blended, cooked chicken, cooked chicken, cooked chicken, cooked chicken.	Chicken, rice, mixture, chicken recipes, chicken recipes, cooking.	Chicken, rice, mix, chicken recipes, chicken recipes, baking.
67	red cabbage add color noodle salad soba salad chicken cabbage	Red chou rouge add the noodle salad color soba chou chicken salad.	Red chou rouge add the color noodle salad soba chou chicken salad.	Red Chou add the color noodle salad soba salad chicken cabbage noodles.
67	salty bacon creamy avocado succulent chicken classic delicious salad	Savour delicious avocado cream bacon bacon classic delicious chicken salad.	Savoury bacon cream avocado succulent chicken classic salad delicious.	Savour bacon cream avocado succulent chicken classic delicious salad.
67	totally making delicious meal tonight	Making a delicious dinner tonight.	I'm making a delicious dinner tonight.	I'm making a delicious meal here tonight.
67	supermarket diet easy recipe quick healthy meal good lose weight delicious easy coo	Supermarket diet, easy recipes, quick healthy meals, good to lose weight, delicious, easy to bake.	Supermarket diet, easy recipes, quick healthy meals, good to lose weight, and delicious easy to cook.	Supermarket diet, easy recipe, quick healthy meals, good weight loss, delicious easy to cook.
67	continuing cooking winning streak awesome lemon fennel pot roast chicken chicken boring	Continue the winning chicken lemon mixture fennel potted chicken boiled chicken.	Continue the winning cooking set of fennel pot roast boring chicken lemon fennel.	Continue the winning cooking set of lemon fennel pot roast chicken boring chicken.
67	chicken vegetable herb brown rice	Chicken grass, brown rice.	Chicken, grass, brown rice!	Uh, chicken, grass, brown rice.
67	casserole recipe bruschetta chicken bake submitted heather simple creative chicken meal mimic	Recipes pot saucepan bruschetta cooking of heather-subdued chicken simple and creative mimic chicken flour.	Recipes pot saucepan bruschetta cooking chicken submitted heather heather simple and creative chicken flour mimic.	Recipes bruschetta cooking saucepan chicken submitted heather simple and creative mimic chicken flour.
67	shredded bbq chicken slider creamy cole slaw recipe	Shredded chicken bbq slider creamy cabbage recipe cole slaw.	Mashed bbq chicken slider recipe for creamy cole cole slaw.	Chopped bbq chicken slider creamy cole recipe cole slaw.
67	check delicious chicken recipe	Check the delicious chicken recipes on the menu.	Please check the delicious chicken recipes.	Check delicious chicken recipes.
67	ancho chicken tortilla soup ancho chicken tortilla soup feel good favorite cozy meal	Ancho Chicken Tortilla Soup and Ancho Chicken Tortilla Soup make you feel right at home.	Tortilla soup with chicken and tortilla soup with Ancho chicken feel good the favourite soft meal.	Chicken tortilla soup and chicken tortilla soup make Ancho feel right at home.
67	read cook enjoy recipe israel couscous	Reading to cook and enjoy the israel couscous israel recipe.	Read cook enjoy the Israeli couscous israel recipe.	Read to cook enjoy the recipe israel couscous israel.
67	chicken chili pillsbury	Chiliburybury Pill Chicken.	Oh, chicken chiliburybury pills.	Chiliburybury chicken pills.
67	dinner idea dinner recipe easy weekly meal plan check going	Meal plan dinner recipe idea easy to check out.	Idea of dinner recipe of the meal plan weekly meal easy to check.	Idea dinner recipe dinner plan weekly meal plan easy to check.
67	super bowl recipe todd dirt dirt man shared recipe patch ve ta	Super bowl recipe Todd dirt man has shared his patchwork recipe.	Super bowl recipe Todd dirt man has shared the recipe patch ve ta ta.	Super bowl recipe Todd dirt man shared the recipe patch ve ta ta.
67	article updated chicken stroganoff recipe	Article updated recipe stroganoff chicken chicken recipe.	Article updated recipe stroganoff chicken stroganoff chicken.	Article updated chicken stroganoff recipe chicken stroganoff.
67	easy honey mustard mozzarella chicken recipe chicken recipe cooking	Easy mustard mozzarella chicken chicken recipe chicken chicken recipe cooking recipe chicken recipe chicken recipe.	Easy mustard mozzarella chicken chicken chicken recipe chicken recipe cooking recipe chicken recipe chicken recipe.	Easy mustard mozzarella chicken chicken recipe chicken recipe cooking recipe chicken recipe.
67	chicken wing momofuku octo vinaigrette	Momofuku Chicken Wing octo octo salad dressing.	Chicken wing Momofuku octo vinaigrette octo vinaigrette.	Momofuku chicken wing octo vinaigrette octo vinaigrette.
67	recipe fried chicken liver mexico chilies	Fried chicken liver, Mexican chili peppers.	Well, recipe for fried chicken liver, Mexican peppers.	Recipes fried chicken liver Mexican chili peppers.
67	chicken taquitos recipe epicurious	Chicken taquitos are an epic recipe.	This recipe for chicken taquitos is epic.	The chicken taquitos recipe is epic.
68	expected king speech top oscar nomination	It was hoped that the speech of the King would be the first Oscar to be named.	We waited for the King's speech to be the first Oscar to be named.	The King's speech was expected to be the first Oscar to be named.
68	sag prediction award tracker hmmmm	Sagmmmm forecasting price plotter.	Prediction plotter of the price of prediction of sag hmmmm.	Prediction tracker of sag hmmmm's prediction price.
68	oscar reaction guess king speech	Guess the King's speech.	Oscar-winning Reaction Guess the King's speech!	Well, guess what the king's speech is.
68	fighter king speech lead nominee tonight sag award beverly hill courier	Fighting King speech-nominated headline tonight's Sag award Beverly Hill messenger.	Fighting King nominee speech in front tonight Sag award Beverly Hill messenger.	Prime nominee King speech fight tonight Sag award Beverly Hill messenger.
68	king speech rule oscar nomination	Oscar nominations are governed by the King's speech.	King's speech regulates the Oscar nomination.	The King's speech governs the Oscar nomination process.
68	case missed full list year oscar nominee	Missing Cases l' Year of the Complete Oscar Nominee List.	This is the year of the full list of cases nominated by the Oscars.	Missing case l' year of full list nominated at the Oscars.
68	king speech notch top director award movie running darren aronofsky	The King's speech marks Darren Aronofsky's first award-winning film.	The King's speech marks current filmmaker Darren Aronofsky's first award-winning film.	The King's speech was the first ever award-winning film director Darren Aronofsky.
68	king speech top list academy award nominee nomination true grit inception social network	The king's Oscar-nominated speech for the nomination of the real Grit Creative Social Network.	The king's speech at the top of the Oscar nomination list for the real Grit Creative Social Network.	The King's speech at the top of the Oscar nomination list for the Grit Creative Social Network.
68	oscar nomination king speech rule nod	Appointment Oscar King speechwriter nods his head.	Appointment Oscar King speech rule shakes head.	Appointment Oscar king speech rule shakes head.
68	king speech top film producer award azcentral	Award for Best Film Productor Azcentral.	King speech Top Film Productor Award Azcentral.	King speech Top Film Productor Award Azcentral.
68	social network king speech aim oscar	Oscar is the target of the social networking king's speech.	The social networking king's speech is about Oscar.	The social network king's speech is about Oscar.
68	king speech notch top director award bbc news	King's speech at the awards ceremony for Best Director BBC News.	A speech by the King on the award for Best Director, BBC News.	King's speech tainting the award for Best Director BBC News.
68	dtn uk director guild screen actor guild award picture weekend blur	Dtn uk screen guild director actor guilds weekend prize blur photo picture week-end.	Dtn uk screen guild director actor guild weekend prize fuzzy photo week-end.	Dtn uk director of the guild screen actor guild weekend price photo blur image week-end.
68	sag award colin firth best actor natalie portman best actress honor	Colin Firth Award Natalie Portman Best Actress Honoured.	Colin Firth Award Best Actress Natalie Portman Best Actress Honored.	Colin Firth Award Best Actress: Natalie Portman Best Actress Honoured.
68	oscar nomination academy award nominee watch	Oscar nomination; Academy nominated for Academy Awards.	Oscar nomination at the Academy of Fine Arts, Oscar nominee.	Oscar nomination for l' Oscar nominee show academy.
68	geegood post king speech rule oscar nomination ap	Geegood post king-speech rule oscar appointment ap ap.	Geegood post king speech rule oscar appointment ap ap.	Geegood post king speech rule oscar appointment ap.
68	king speech best ensemble sagawards	I'm sorry, but I can't help it.	King speech best Ensemble Sagawards.	King speech best ensemble sagawards.
68	king speech won director guild award best director	The King's speech earned the Directors' Guild Best Director Award.	The King's speech won the award of Best Director of the Year to the Guild of Directors.	The King's speech won the Directors Guild the award for Best Director.
68	breaking news king speech take top honor hollywood actor honor best sunday night annual screen ac	Latest news from the King take the podium; honor d' Hollywood actor d' Sunday night's annual best Sunday night screen honor best.	Last news from the King take the podium; honor d' Hollywood actor d' honor best Sunday evening screen ac ac sunday night.	Latest news from the king take the podium; honor d' Hollywood actor d' honor best Sunday night annual screen ac ac Sunday night.
68	colinfirth nominated oscar best actor role kingsspeech	Colinfirth has been nominated for the Academy Award for Best Actor, Kingsspeech.	Colinfirth has been nominated for Best Actor, Kingsspeech.	Colinfirth was nominated for the best actor, Kingsspeech.
68	fast track sag award king speech roll los angeles time	Fast track Sag Award King Speech Roll Angeles Time.	Fast track Sag Award King speech rollles the angeles time.	Fast track Sag Award King speech roll los angeles time.
68	weekend wrap king speech rule sag dgas portman pick trophy weekend	Weekday-end wrap king speeches rule pick trophee weekend dgas portman-end.	Weekday-end wrap King speeches rule dgas portman pick trophy week-end.	Weekday-end wrap king speeches rule sag dgas portman pick trophy week-end.
68	natalie portman modern family king speech crowned sag winner	Natalie Portman, speech by King of the Modern Family crowned sagger winner.	Speech by Natalie Portman, king of the modern family crowned winner of the sag.	Natalie Portman, speech by modern family king crowned sag winner.
68	hooper earns top dga prize king speech hooper won david fincher social network	Hooper has won the first Dga King speech hooper award to win David Fincher social network.	Hooper wins first prize speech hooper Dga King won David Fincher social network.	Hooper wins the first prize Dga King speech hooper won David Fincher social network.
68	king speech crowned head oscar nominee colin firthphoto afpbritish historical drama king speech	Speech of the King crowned head of the candidate for the Academy Awards Colin Firthphoto afpbritish historical drama speech of the King speech.	King's speech crowned Oscar nominee Colin Firthphoto afpbritish historical drama King speech speech.	King's speech crowned head of Oscar nominee Colin Firthphoto's afpbritish historical drama King's speech.
68	king speech true grit top oscar nomination	Talk of the king real courage Oscar top nomination.	Speech of the king true courage nomination oscar top nomination.	King's speech true oscar top nomination courage.
68	king speech awarded best ensemble cast screen actor guild award	The King's speech also awarded the prize for Best Actor Guild of the Apos; Ensemble Cast screen.	The King's speech awarded the prize of the best guild of the actors of l' ensemble cast screen.	The King's speech awarded the Apos Best Actors Guild; ensemble cast screen.
68	king speech lead academy award nomination including best picture full list nominee	Appointment for the title of Leader of the King's Speech at the Apostles Academy, including the name of the best candidate on the full list.	Nomination for Leader of the King's Speech at the Academy, including the name of the best candidate on the full list.	Appointment as leader of the speech of the king at the academy, including the name of the best candidate of the complete list.
68	safon oscar nomination list academy award nominee	Oscar Safon Nominated List Nominee for the Academy Awards.	Oscar Safon Award nomination list Appointed to the Academy Awards.	Oscar safon award nomination list Oscar nominee.
68	king sspeech finally win best picture award pga overtake socialnetwork oscar	King Sspeech has finally won the award for Best Pga Film Beyond Social Oscar Network.	King sspeech finally won the award for Best Pga Film Beyond Social Network Oscar.	King sspeech finally won the prize for the best pga film to surpass social oscar network.
68	king speech lead oscar race nomination reuters reuters king speech british drama	King Leader Oscar Reuters Race Reuters Speech King UK drama.	Speech King Leader Oscar nomination to the race reuters reuters speeches British drama king drama.	Speech leader oscar king nomination to the reuters reuters race British drama speech king.
68	king speech win major guild award discus sag award win	The King won the Grand Prize of the Discus Sag Award.	The King's speech won the Grand Prize of the Guild Discus sag Award.	The King's speech won the discus sag Award Grand Prize.
68	king speech odds oscar glory guardian	Oscar, the King of Luck, the Keeper of Glory.	Talk of the lucky king, Oscar, guardian of the glory.	Lucky King Oscar's speech guardian of fame.
68	latest headline king speech lead oscar field british star colin firth helena bonham carter nominate	The last major title of the King's speech, the British star Oscar Field, Colin Firth, and Helena Bonham Carter, was named the nominee.	The last major title of the King's speech, British star Oscar Field, Colin Firth, Helena Bonham Carter, has been nominated.	The last major title of the King's speech was nominated by British star Oscar Field, Colin Firth, Helena Bonham Carter.
68	blog post academy award odds king speech lead oscar nomination oscar	Blog post Academy of Probabilities first Oscar-nominated King Oscar speech.	Blog post Academy of Probabilities King's speech first Oscar nomination Oscar.	Blog post academy of probabilities speeches king Oscar first Oscar nomination oscar.
68	king speech win top director british movie king speech awarded top honour year direct	The King's Speech wins the award for Best British Film Director The King's Speech for Best Year of D' Honour.	The King's speech wins Best British Film Director Award The King's Speech for Best Year of the Order.	The King's speech wins the award for best British film director The King's speech is awarded for the best year of his life.
68	king speech reign producer guild award news india stock	The Producers Guild of the King's Speech rewards the actions of India.	The producers' guild of the King's speech rewards the actions of the Apostles; India.	The producers' guild of the King's speech rewards India's actions.
68	sag award recap king speech conquers king town king speech recogn dating	ASC Review King's Speech Conquering City King's Speech The King's Speeches recognize meetings.	ASC Review King's Speech Conquer City King's Speech The King's speech recognizes the encounters.	SAC Review King's Speech Conquer City King's Speech King's speech recognizes meetings.
68	king speech lead oscar race film stuttering british monarch movie founder	The Oscar-winning film-making British monarch monarch monarch founding film.	King of the Oscar race speech film stammering monarch British monarch monarch founding film.	The King of Speech Oscar race film stuttering British monarch monarch founding film.
68	film king speech win producer guild top prize los angeles king speech claimed crown	King of the Cinema Speech Wins Producers Guild First Prize The King of Los Angeles Speech claims the crown.	The movie king's speech wins first prize in the producers' guild The speech of the King of Los Angeles claims the crown.	Film King speeches win producers' guild first prize The King of Los Angeles speech claims the crown.
68	movie nod king speech stir oscar race factbox gt news race	The King's Address to the Head Shaking of Oscar Race Film Made of D'apos; News & Events.	The king's speech of the Oscar race headshakes made of d' news and current events.	The speech of the king of the head shakes of the film oscar race made of apos; actuality gt race d'apos; actuality.
68	king speech rule obvious batch oscar bait	Of course, the Oscar bait is set by the King's speech.	Of course, the king's speech settles the Oscar bait prize.	King's speech obviously settles the Oscar bait lot.
68	oscar nominee academy award	Academy nomination.	Nominated for the Academy Awards.	He is a member of the Academy of Fine Arts.
68	oscar king speech haven black swan	This is the first time that the world has seen a black swan.	The Oscar King speech is about the black swan.	The Oscar King speech focuses on black swans.
68	king speech usurps throne oscar leader ap queen elizabeth ii dad albert ge movie	The king's speech usurped the Oscar-leader ap Queen Elizabeth.	The king usurps the throne Oscar leader ap Queen Elizabeth ii albert father ge film.	King's speech usurps Oscar's throne leader ap Queen Elizabeth ii albert papa ge film.
68	king speech lead oscar nomination	The King's speech led to the appointment of Dapos, an Oscar winner.	The king's speech leads to the nomination of d'apos; an Oscar.	The King's speech will lead to the nomination of d' an Oscar.
68	king speech social network locked oscar battle rttnews academy award nomination	Oscar battle rttnews award-nominated Oscars Academy Award-nominated social network speech.	King social network speech locked oscar battle rttnews Academy Award nomination.	King social speech network locked oscar battle rttnews nomination to Academy Award nomination.
68	hollywood director honor king speech reuters	Hollywood honours King Reuters' speech.	The director of Apos; Hollywood honours King Reuters' speech.	The director of Apos; Hollywood honors the speech of King Reuters.
68	oscar anounced morning	Oscar is up in the morning.	Oscar s&apos, gets up in the morning.	Octavius s' is up in the morning.
68	king speech top film producer award ap ap king speech claimed crown be	King's Speech, Award for Best Film Producer ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap.	Speech of the King, prize of the best film producer ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap.	King's speech, best film producer award ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap, king's speech claimed to be crown.
68	dtn hollywood king speech win top honour director guild award london jan ani historical	King Hollywood's speech won the Directors' Guild Award for Best Director Guild in the History of London.	King Hollywood's speech won the award for Best Directors Guild in London History.	King Hollywood's speech has won the award for Best Directors Guild in London History.
68	oscar nomination king speech nomination actor colin firth helena bonham carter geoffrey rush	Actor Colin Firth Helena Bonham Carter Geoffrey Rush.	It's the first time I've ever heard of an actor named Colin Firth.	Oscar nomination of l' actor Colin Firth Helena Bonham Carter Geoffrey Rush.
68	boardwalk empire king speech top sag award	Empire, King's Speech, Sag Award for Best Speech.	Promenade de l' Empire, King's speech, Sag Award for best speech.	Promenade de l' Empire, speech by the King, Sag Award for Best Speech.
68	king speech lead academy award nomination memphis commercial appeal	Appointment for the title of Leader of the King's Speech at the Commercial Appeal Academy.	Appointment for the title of Leader of the Speech of the King at the Academy memphis commercial call.	Appointment as the King's Speech Leader at l'apos; memphis commercial appeal academy.
68	oscar nominee best picture announced morning social network king speech	In the morning, on social media, the best photo of the King was nominated for an Academy Award.	Nominated for the Academy Awards, the best photo announced the King's speech on social media in the morning.	Oscar nominee best photo announced the King's speech on social media in the morning.
68	weekend wrap king speech rule sag dgas portman pick trophy weekend	Weekday-end wrap king speeches rule pick trophee weekend dgas portman-end.	Weekday-end wrap King speeches rule dgas portman pick trophy week-end.	Weekday-end wrap king speeches rule sag dgas portman pick trophy week-end.
68	great expectation award natalie portman colin firth screen actor guild	Great Expectations Natalie Portman Award Colin Firth actor guild.	Great Expectations Natalie Portman Award Colin Firth screen actor guild.	Great Expectations Prix Natalie Portman Colin Firth screen actor guild.
68	king speech lead oscar nomination	The King's speech led to the appointment of Dapos, an Oscar winner.	The king's speech leads to the nomination of d'apos; an Oscar.	The King's speech will lead to the nomination of d' an Oscar.
68	watch king speech win award	Watch King win speech award.	Watching King speech win the prize.	Watch King speech win award.
68	ap maker academy award favorite social network king speech competi	King's Speech Contest on the Favorite Social Network of L&apos creators.	King's Speech Contest on the Academy's favorite social network.	King speech contest on the favorite social network of the apo creators; academy.
68	screen actor guild sag award winner full list	The winner of the Sag Prize of the Guild of Cinema Actors has received the complete list.	The winner of the Actors Guild's Sag Award has received the complete list.	The winner of the Sag Prize of the actors' guild has received the complete list.
68	tom hooper king speech winner dga award besting social network david fincher	This is a good way to get to know people and get to know them.	Tom Hooper King award speech dga besting social network david finish.	Tom Hooper King speech dga award besting social network david finer.
68	king speech win top honor director guild award	The King's Speech wins the Award for Best Directors Guild.	The King's speech won the prize of the best guild of directors d'apos; honor.	The King's speech won the award for Best Directors Guild.
68	king speech boardwalk empire score sag award big weekend king speech director	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	King speech boardwalk empire score sag award Grand week-end King speech director.	King speech boardwalk empire score sag award Grand week-end King speech director.
68	oscar nomination list king speech lead nomination	Oscar Nomination List King's Speech as Principal Appointment.	Oscar List of Appointments Speech from the King - The King's main appointment.	Oscar Nomination List King's speech principal appointment.
68	academy award nominee	Academy Award nominee.	He's an Oscar nominee.	You know, Oscar-nominated.
68	king speech win big dgas award season tight race social network	The King's speech wins the season-tight prize dgas on the social network.	The speech of the king wins the big prize season tight race on the social network.	The king's speech wins the big prize season tight race on the social network.
68	social network king speech aim oscar	Oscar is the target of the social networking king's speech.	The social networking king's speech is about Oscar.	The social network king's speech is about Oscar.
68	king speech rule obvious batch oscar bait ap	The King's speech obviously sets the Oscar ap ap bait lot.	The King's speech obviously sets the standard for Oscar bait ap ap.	The King's speech obviously sets Oscar bait ap ap.
68	blog post oscar nomination nominee announced king speech nomination	The candidate for l' Oscar for Best Blog has announced the nomination for the King's speech.	The blogger's nominee, Oscar for Best Blog, has announced the nomination for the speech by the King.	The candidate for l' Oscar of the best blog announced the nomination for the speech of the king.
68	king speech lead oscar nomination nomination	Oscar for the King's speech.	Appointment to the King's Speech.	Appointment to l'apos; oscar for the king's speech.
68	oscar nomination king speech well worth euro afternoon	Speech by the King of the Oscar nomination which is worth an after-midi in euros.	King of the Oscar nomination speech worth a day after-midi in euros.	A speech by the Oscar nomination king worth one after-midi in euros.
68	king speech honored santa barbara fest ap	The feast of Santa Barbara ap.	The King's speech honored the feast of Santa Barbara ap.	The King's speech honored the feast of Santa Barbara ap.
68	king speech dominates sag award win best picture osacrs sagawards thekingsspeech	The King's Speech dominates the prize to earn better image osacrs sagawards thekingsspeech.	The king's speech dominates the prize to win better image osacrs sagawards thekingsspeech.	King's speech dominates the prize to earn better osacrs sagawards thekingsspeech image.
68	list academy award nomination chicago sun time	Chicago Suntime Academy Award nominations.	List of Chicago Suntime Academy Award nominations.	A list of nominations for the Chicago Suntime Academy Awards.
68	natalie portman colin firth king speech winner sag melissa teo christian bale	Natalie Portman Colin Colin, recipient of the Canada Day King's Speech, Mel sagissa Teo Christian Whaletian.	Natalie Portman Colin Colin, winner of the speech of the King of Canada Day, sagissa teo christian whale.	Natalie Portman Colin Colin, Canada Day King's Speech Laureate, sagissa melissa teo christian whale.
68	full sag award movie winner	Best Sag film winner.	Winner of the prize for Sag's best film.	Winner of the Best Sag movie award.
68	king speech lead oscar nomination fact wrong king speech impresse	King's first appointment made wrongly King speech impressionne speech.	King's speech first Oscar nomination wrongly King speech impresses impressives speech.	King's speech first Oscar nomination wrongly impresses speech king speech.
68	thrilled colin firth won best actor sag award well king speech best ensemble woo hoo	Colin Firth has won the Best Actor Award for Best Speeches and Speeches together woo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo.	Colin Firth has won the Best Actor Award well King Speech best set woo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo.	Colin Firth won the award for best actor sag award well best speech set woo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo.
68	bbc news king speech lead oscar field	BBC News King Speech Leader Oscar Field.	BBC News King speech leader Oscar Field.	BBC News King speech leader Oscar Field.
68	king speech wint twee screen actor guild award	The King's speech included the prize of the Guild of actors.	The King's speech included the award of the King's Actors Guild.	The speech of the king included the prize of the guild of actors of l' screen twee.
68	king speech dominates oscar nomination	Oscar nominations are dominated by the King's speech.	The King's speech dominates the Academy Award nomination process.	The King's speech dominates the Oscars.
68	screen actor guild award nomination full list peer review academy award ch	If you have any questions, please contact us at 1-800-959-8281 or e-mail us at 1-800-959-8281.	Guild of Actors Awards; screen Nomination of complete list Academic prizes; peer review.	Actors Guild Awards; screen Nomination of full list Academic Awards peer review.
68	sag award winner list king speech fighter boardwalk empire rack trophy mawu	The list of winners of the S.A.S. award includes the Imperial Walk of the Warrior Speech King trophy.	The S.A.S. award winners include the King speech imperial warrior walk trophy.	The list of S.A.S. award winners includes the King speech imperial warrior walk trophy.
68	full list oscar nominee	Oscars nominees are listed in full.	Complete list of the Oscar nominees.	Complete list of Oscar nominees.
68	king speech true grit lead oscar nomination	Speech of the King true courage Oscar nomination of the Oscar-nominated chief.	Speech of the true king oscar courage nomination of the Oscar-nominated chief.	King's speech true courage Oscar nomination Oscar nomination.
68	harry potter ftw complete list annual academy award nomination oscar	Harry Potter ftw lists the annual Academy Award nominations.	Harry Potter ftw provides a complete list of the annual Academy Award nominations.	Harry Potter ftw complete list of annual Academy Award nominations.
68	king speech lead oscar list film stuttering british monarch movie founder	The Oscar-winning master of speech listings of the British monarch's stammering films that were the foundation of the film.	Oscar speech king lists British monarch stammering films as the founder of the monarch film.	Oscar speech king lists movies stuttering British monarch founder of the film monarch.
68	king speech oscar nomination ridiculous state union isn till tonight	Speech of King Oscar appointment ridiculous union d' state is until tonight.	King Oscar's speech ridiculous appointment union d' state is until tonight.	Speech of King Oscar nomination ridiculous union d' state is till this evening.
68	celebnews king speech tom hooper reign supreme director guild award celebritynews	Tom Hooper reigns supreme guilds of directors rewarding newsc celebrities.	Celebnews King speech Tom Hooper reigns supreme newsc celebrity guilds of directors.	Celebnews King speech Tom Hooper reign supreme guilds directors reward newss celebrities.
68	gbmiii ap king speech top film producer award los angeles ap king speech claimed	Gbmiii ap king speech Award for Best Film Producer of Los Angeles ap king speech.	Gbmiii ap king speech Los Angeles Best Film Producer Award ap king speech claimed.	Gbmiii ap king speech Best Los Angeles film producer award ap king speech claimed.
68	oscar nominee	Academy Award nominee.	He's an Oscar nominee.	You know, Oscar-nominated.
68	nominee announced annual academy award	The name of the candidate was announced for the annual prize of l' academy.	The name has been announced for the annual prize of l&apos.	The name of the nominee has been announced for the annual prize of the Academy.
68	colin firth natalie portman best actor actress thinking king speech social network	Colin Firth Natalie Portman Best Actress Thinking King Social Network Talk.	Colin Firth Natalie Portman best actress thinking social networking talk king.	Colin Firth Natalie Portman best actress thinking king social network talk.
68	congrats firth portman bale leo sag award best picture highest award best ensemble king speech	Congratulations to the Firth Portman Ball Leo sag Award Best Picture Best Feature Award Best Together Speech from the King.	Congratulations to the Firth Portman Ball Leo sag Award Best Picture Best Award Best Together Speech from the King.	Congratulations to the Firth Portman Ball Leo sag Award Best Picture Best Overall King's Speech.
68	beverly hill calif ap british monarchy saga king speech lead academy award	Beverly Hill Calif saga of the British King Speech Lead Academy Award.	Beverly Hill Calif saga of the British monarchy's King speech lead Academy Award.	Beverly Hill Calif saga of British monarchy King speech lead Academy Award.
68	twelve oscar nod king speech approved don understand academy hate leonardo dicaprio	Twelve Oscar nod king-approved speech do not include académie haïr leonardo dicaprio speech.	Twelve Oscar nod king approved speech do not understand académie hate leonardo dicaprio speech.	Twelve Oscar nod king approved speech do not include academy hate leonardo dicaprio speech.
68	oscar nomination nolan snubbed king speech roll washington post	Oscar Nolan was appointed to the Washington Post, but he ignored the Washington Post King's speech.	Appointment d' Oscar Nolan snubbed the Washington Post King's speech.	Nomination d' Oscar Nolan snubbed the speech of the Washington Post King.
68	king speech rule producer guild award king speech claimed crown best film	King's Speech Guild Award King's Speech Declared Best Film of the Crown.	Growers Guild Award of the King's Speech King's Best Crown Film.	Growers Guild Award King's Speech Rule King's Speech declared best film of the crown.
68	oscar nomination king speech earns nod true grit	It's a great way to make a difference in the lives of people.	The speech of the King of the nomination d'apos; Oscar's speech deserves a real nod.	King of the nomination speech d' Oscar deserves a real nod.
68	imdb firth portman king speech triumph sag award	Portman King Speech Sag Award for Triumph.	Imdb Firth Portman King Sag Award speech of triumph.	Imdb Firth Portman King speech award Sag award of triumph.
68	big surprise colin firth natalie portman win sag award	Colin Firth Natalie Portman won the Sag Award.	Big surprise, Colin Firth Natalie Portman won the Sag Prize.	A big surprise, Colin Firth Natalie Portman has won the Sag Award.
68	haha funny news king speech top film producer award ap	Funny ha ha ha, new King Best Film Producer speech ap price ap ap ap.	Haha funny new speech king best producer of film ap price ap ap ap.	Haha funny new speech king best film producer ap price ap ap ap.
68	oscar nod best picture torn king speech inception	Oscar nods the best shot torn footage inaugurated King speech.	Oscar shakes the head best torn image speech king inauguration.	Oscar shakes the head best picture torn out of the speech.
68	whitneyport king speech tom hooper reign supreme director guild award	Tom Hooper wins the Supreme Director Guild Award.	Whitneyport King speech by Tom Hooper, reigns Supreme Director Guild Award.	Whitneyport King speech Tom Hooper reigns Supreme Director Guild Award.
68	social network king speech aim oscar ap ap academy award voter poised set	Social Network King Speech aims at Oscar Academy of Voting Prizes ready together.	Social Network King speech aims oscar academy of voting prizes ready together.	Social network king speech aims oscar academy of voting prizes ready together.
68	firth portman bale leo win screen actor prize ap king speech won best actor trophy sunday	Firth Portman Ball leo winner of the prize at l' actor at l' King speech winner of the Best Actor award on Sunday.	Firth Portman Ball leo winner of the prize of l' actor at l' screen ap King speech won the trophy for Best Actor on Sunday.	Firth Portman Ball leo winner of the prize of l' actor at l' screen ap King speech won trophy for best actor Sunday.
68	mark kermode oscar tip mark kermode verdict year academy award nomination news	Mark kermode oscar tip mark oscar kermode verdict kermode year academy appointment of new academic awards.	Marquez kermode oscar tip mark kermode verdict year academy appointment of the new academic awards.	Marquez kermode oscar tip mark kermode verdict year academy appointment of new academic awards.
68	king speech land nomination award season favorite social network trail true grit	The season for nominations for the title of King of the Speech on social media favorites is shaping the true path of courage.	The nomination season for the title of speech-making king on favorite social media sites charts the true path of courage.	The nomination season for the speech-writing king on favorite social media charts the true path of courage.
68	king speech oscar nomination beverly hill calif british monarchy saga king speech	King Oscar's Address Appointed Beverly Caliph British Monarchy saga King's Speech.	King Oscar's speech nominated Beverly Calif British monarchy saga King's speech.	King Oscar's speech nomination Beverly Calif British monarchy saga King speech speech.
68	gt annual academy award nomination announced man ve best picture noms	The film was nominated for an Academy Award for Best Picture.	Annual Academy Award nomination for the best film ever made.	Annual Academy Award nomination announced for best film.
68	social network king speech aim oscar ap ap academy award voter poised set showd	Social network King speech aims oscar ap academy Award Elector prepares together shown.	The social network King speech aims oscar ap academy Award Elector prepares together showed.	The social network King speech aims oscar ap academy Award voter prepares together shown.
68	king speech usurps throne oscar leader ap	The King's speech usurped the Oscar Throne Leader ap.	The king's speech usurped the leader ap oscar throne.	The king's speech usurped the throne of the oscar leader ap ap.
68	king rsquo speech oscar nod daily beast	King Rsquo oscar's speech will shake his head every day.	King Rsquo oscar's speech shakes his head every day.	King Rsquo's speech oscar shakes his head daily.
68	king speech true grit lead oscar race king speech british drama stammering monarch	King's true courage speech Oscar race King English speech monarch stutter drama.	Speech of the king true courage Oscar race king English speech drama stuttering monarch.	Speech of the king true courage oscar race king speech English drama stuttering monarch.
68	imdb road oscar academy award	IMB Road Oscar Academy award.	L'apos award; IMB Road Oscar Academy.	The award of the IMB Road Oscar Award.
68	king speech win producer guild award three year pga winner win acade	The King's speech won the three-year prize of the Guild of Producers, winning pga winning acade winning acade.	The King's speech wins the producers' guild three-year winner pga winning acade winning acade.	The King's speech wins the three-year producer guild winning pga winning acade winning acade.
68	oscar king speech true grit lead nomination examiner	Oscar King Real speech, courageous first reviewer.	Oscar King Real courage speech first reviewer appointment.	Oscar King Real speech courage first reviewer appointment.
68	king speech boardwalk empire score sag award big weekend king spe	King speech boardwalk empire scoreboard award big weekend King spe.	King speech boardwalk empire score sag award big weekend King spe.	King speech boardwalk empire score sag award big weekend King spe.
68	king speech garnered oscar nomination assuring hollywood handful general public watched movie	The King's speech won the Oscars nomination, securing Hollywood as a place for a handful of people to watch the movies.	The King's speech got the Oscar nomination, assuring Hollywood that a handful of spectators watch movies.	The King's speech secured the nomination at the Oscars, assuring Hollywood that a handful of spectators watch movies.
68	entent complete list nomination annual academy award	Please read the full list of nominations for the annual Academic Awards.	Hearing a complete list of your annual academic awards nominations.	Hear the complete list of annual academic award nominations.
68	carpetbagger will oscar friend nomination academy award will academy award oscar	Carpetbagger will be Oscar Oscar Academy Academy Award friend.	Carpetbagger will be Oscar Friend Academy Award nomination will be Oscar Oscar Academy.	Carpetbagger will be Oscar friend nomination Academy Award will be Oscar Academy oscar.
68	king speech rule obvious batch oscar bait news cnews canada	The King's speech of course fixes new cnews canada oscar bait lot.	The king's speech of course fixes lot oscar bait news cnews canada.	The King's speech obviously rules oscar bait news cnews canada lot oscar.
68	thefighter best ensemble film king speech will win best picture oscar	And the best fighter in the best set of King speech movies wins the best Oscar picture.	Best wrestler of the best King speech set wins the best Oscar picture.	The best of the King speech set will win the best of the Oscar.
68	firth portman bale leo win screen actor prize king speech won best actor trophy sunday col	Firth Portman Ball leo winner of the Prix de l' actor at l' King Speech screen won trophy for Best Actor Sunday Col.	Firth Portman Ball leo winner of the prize of l' actor at l' King speech screen won trophy of best actor Sunday Col.	Firth Portman Ball leo winner of the prize of l' actor at l' screen King speech won trophy of best actor Sunday Col.
68	oscar nomination full list academy award nominee	Oscars Nomination Listing Complete Oscars Nomination List.	Oscar nomination Complete list Oscar nomination Nomination to the Academy Awards.	Oscars nomination Complete list Oscars nomination Oscars nomination.
68	full list nominee official oscar website	Complete list of nominees on the Official website of l' Oscar.	Complete list of the nominees on the official website of l' Oscar.	A full list of the nominees is available on the official website of l' Oscar.
68	king speech top directing prize	First Prize for Conducting the King's Speech.	First prize for the King's speech.	First prize for directing the king's speech.
68	mynews oscar nomination king speech real contender king speech brit mynews	The King's Best Speech Oscar, my new King's Speech.	My new nomination to l'apos, the Oscar for the King's Best Speech, my new King's Speech.	My new appointment at l'apos, my new speech by the King, my new speech by the King.
68	king speech win best film gong king speech win best film accolade producer guild ameri	The Speech King wins the Best Gong Film King of Speech wins the Best Bitter Producers' Guild acolade.	Speech king wins the best gong movie speech king wins the best acolade guild of bitter producers.	The speech king wins the best gong movie speech king wins the best acolade guild of bitter producers.
68	hooper boost oscar chance dga win king speech tom hooper won director movie	Hooper booster oscar dga win King speech Tom Hooper win film director.	Hooper booster Oscar chance dga win King speech Tom Hooper win director film.	Hooper booster oscar chance dga win King speech Tom Hooper win film director.
68	king speech star santa barbara international film festival santa barbar artimpactnetpr	Santa Barbara International Film Festival Santa Barbar artimpactnetpr.	King's speech star Santa Barbara International Film Festival Santa Barbar artimpactnetpr.	King's speech star Santa Barbara International Santa Barbar film festival artimpactnetpr.
68	king speech top screen actor guild award winner mtv movie music	This year's awards are presented to the Canadian Film and Video Production Association.	King speech top screen actor guild win mtv film music award.	King speech top screen actor guild wins film music award mtv.
68	bbc news king speech lead oscar field	BBC News King Speech Leader Oscar Field.	BBC News King speech leader Oscar Field.	BBC News King speech leader Oscar Field.
68	dtn hollywood king speech dominates oscar nomination feedburner share friend ente	The Oscar nomination process is dominated by the Hollywood King speech.	Hollywood King speech dominates the Oscar nomination process.	The dtn hollywood king speech dominates the Oscar nomination process.
68	portman firth speech win sag award los angeles jan upi star king speech ho	I've got a lot to do, but I've got a lot to do.	Portman Firth wins the award of the angeles up to the star king speech ho.	Portman Firth speech win awards the angeles Jan upi star king speech ho ho.
68	reuters celebs hollywood actor honor king speech los angeles reuters oscar front runner king	Reuters famous Hollywood actor honorary speech by King Los Angeles reuters Oscar Oscar King Oscar head runner.	Reuters famous Hollywood actor honoring King Los Angeles' reuters speech Oscar-winning Oscar-winning head runner.	Reuters famous Hollywood actor honor speech by King Los Angeles reuters Oscar-winning head runner Oscar.
68	fantastic news gt king speech lead oscar field nomination	The king's new and fantastic speech leads to Oscar nomination in the field.	The King's fantastic new speech leads Oscar nomination in the field.	The fantastic new speech of the king leads Oscar nomination in the field.
68	king speech won top prize weekend hollywood actor director securing standing	The King's speech won the first prize of the week-Hollywood end d' stand-up security director.	The King's speech won the first prize of the weekend-Hollywood end d' filmmaker securing standing position.	The King's speech won the weekend's first prize-Hollywood end d&apos acting director securing standing position.
68	king speech lead academy award nomination including best picture	He was appointed leader of the King's speech at the academy, including the title of the best photograph.	Appointment for the title of Leader of the King's Speech at the Academy, including best photo.	Appointment for the King's Speech Leader at the Academy, including best photo.
68	king speech top directing prize	First Prize for Conducting the King's Speech.	First prize for the King's speech.	First prize for directing the king's speech.
68	screen actor guild award list winner sag king speech reign supreme edie falco	The list of winners of the Guild of Film Actors sag King speech supreme Edie falco speech supreme reign.	The list of winners of the Film Actors Guild sag king speech supreme reign Edie falco supreme speech.	The film actors guild winners list sag king speech supreme reign Edie falco supreme speech.
68	lfc king speech nominated oscar bad considering game	In the King of the Apos speech, Oscar was also named bad because of the game.	In the speech of the King of the Apos, Oscar was named a bad man because of the gameplay.	In the speech of the king of l' lc, Oscar was named bad considering the game.
68	oscar race speed sag award news	Oscar run speed-sag news.	Oscar's race speed news, man.	Hey, Oscar's running speed sag news.
68	oscar nomination box office help king speech soar tuesday dilemma box	The Oscar nominations box helps the King's speech at s' elevating to-above the Tuesday Dilemma Box.	The box office of Oscar nominations helps the king's speech to s' raise to-above the box of dilemma Tuesday.	The box office of nominations helps the King's speech at s' elevate to-above the box of dilemma Tuesday.
68	king speech lead oscar race nomination nominee annual academy award	Nominated for l'apos; Academy Award for Best orator for the World Champion Award.	Nominated for apo; Academy Award for Best Speaker for Race to Apo, annual nomination for the title of World Champion.	Nominated for Apos; Apos Runner Award; Academy, annual nomination for World Champion title.
68	king speech boardwalk empire nab sag award king speech continued reign hbo prohibiti	King speech boardwalk empire nab sag award King speech continued to reign as the reigning hbo prohibiti.	King speech boardwalk empire nab sag award King speech continued to rule prohibiti hbo.	King speech boardwalk empire nab sag award King speech continued reign hbo prohibiti.
68	hellothere king speech win sag award king speech win best actor trophy sunday bythere	Where the King's speech wins the prize, the King wins the trophy for Best Actor on Sunday.	Where the king's speech won the sag award, the king's speech won the king's best actor award on Sunday.	Where the king's speech wins sag prize, the king's speech wins the best actor trophy on Sunday.
68	yesterday brilliant deserves oscar gold hooper top dga prize king speech abc	Yesterday, brilliant award winner Oscar or hooper top dga Speech from the Abbott King.	Yesterday, brilliant deserves Oscar or hooper top dga abc king speech prize.	Yesterday, brilliant deserves Oscar or hooper top dga prize abc king speech.
68	annual academy award nomination announced film	Nomination at the Annual Academy of Advertised Films.	Appointment to l' annual film academy, advertised.	Appointment to l' annual academy of the advertised film.
68	el talent king speech cast honored santa barbara international film	The speech by the King of Talent paid tribute to the international film, Santa Barbara.	The King of Talent speech also paid tribute to the international film Santa Barbara.	Talent King's speech paid homage to the international film Santa Barbara.
69	court third party sue retaliation case	Third party's suing a retaliation case.	A third party is suing for retaliation against him.	There's a third party suing a retaliation case.
69	court third party bias protection broad washington jan upi supreme court ruled unanimously	The unanimous Supreme Court of Washington ruled in favor of protecting third parties from bias.	The Supreme Court in Washington ruled unanimously in favor of protecting third parties from bias.	The Washington Supreme Court ruled unanimously in favor of bias protection for third parties.
69	fox news	Fox news.	News about the fox.	Hey, news on the fox.
69	supreme court refuse hear appeal anti gay	The Supreme Court refused to hear the appeal against the decision of the Supreme Court.	The Supreme Court refused to hear the appeal against the gays.	The Supreme Court will refuse to hear the appeal against the gays.
69	supreme court pass poultry case	The Supreme Court dismisses the Poultry Case.	The Supreme Court dismisses the case of poultry.	Supreme Court dismisses the poultry case.
69	supreme court nasa intrusive background check	Nasa Supreme Court Intrusive Background Check.	Supreme Court Nasa invasive background check.	Nasa Supreme Court intrusive background check.
69	high court third party sue retaliation case	A third party in the High Court is prosecuting a retaliatory case.	A third party in the High Court is pursuing retaliation.	A High Court third party is prosecuting a retaliation case.
69	supreme court rule man sue firm retaliation	The lawman of the Supreme Court sues the company in retaliation.	L' lawman of the Supreme Court sues the apos; company in retaliation.	The supreme court's lawman pursues the company in retaliation.
69	supreme court issue landmark decision constitution void	The Supreme Court renders a historic decision, since the Constitution is null and void.	The Supreme Court renders a historic decision, the constitution null and void.	The Supreme Court handed down a landmark decision, and the constitution was declared null and void by the Supreme Court.
69	supreme court doubtful personal privacy false person	Supreme Court of Suspicious Personal Privacy fake person.	You know, questionable supreme personal privacy court fake person.	Dubious supreme court of personal privacy fake person.
69	supreme court fiancee complaining worker protected retaliation	The Supreme Court's fiancee, the plaintiff, has been protecting the worker from retaliation.	The Supreme Court fiancee, the plaintiff, protected the worker from retaliation.	The fiancee of the Supreme Court, the plaintiff, protected the worker from reprisals.
69	supreme court refuse reinstate circuit global warming case	The Supreme Court has refused to reinstate the trial on global warming.	The Supreme Court refuses to reinstate the trial on global warming.	The supreme court refuses to reinstate the global warming trial.
69	supreme court temporarily halt georgia execution	The execution of Georgia is temporarily suspended by the Supreme Court.	The Supreme Court temporarily suspended the execution of Georgia.	Supreme Court temporarily suspends execution of Georgia.
69	decision amount dressing circuit	Band-Aid Circuit of the Decision Amount.	Band-aid circuit for the amount of the decision.	Band-Aid decision amount circuit.
69	supreme court stay okla water fight	I'm going to have to do something about it.	Supreme Court remain ok the battle of apos; water okla.	Remain supreme court after battle d' water okla.
69	justice extend protection workplace retaliation supreme court ruled employer sued	In the case of an employer, the employer is responsible for the employer's compliance with the Act.	Justice expands workplace protection The Supreme Court of Canada has ruled that the employer is being sued.	The courts extend protection in the workplace The Supreme Court ruled that the employer was being sued.
69	recognized supreme court harmful organic sector organic	Recognized by the Supreme Court as biologically harmful.	Supreme Court recognized as harmful to the organic sector.	Recognized by supreme court as harmful to the organic sector.
69	supreme court considers foia protects corporate personal privacy public record law	The Supreme Court has held that the faitha protects the privacy of legal persons.	The Supreme Court considers faitha to protect the privacy of legal persons.	The Supreme Court considers that the faitha protects corporate privacy.
69	justice extend protection workplace retaliation supreme court ruled employer sued	In the case of an employer, the employer is responsible for the employer's compliance with the Act.	Justice expands workplace protection The Supreme Court of Canada has ruled that the employer is being sued.	The courts extend protection in the workplace The Supreme Court ruled that the employer was being sued.
70	invite read cap blog connection join dialogue bullying	Reading Cap blog connect to join the dialogue on bullying.	Read Cap blog connection join the dialogue bullying.	Read Cap blog connection join dialogue bullying.
70	golden rule treated jolla high take stand bullying	The D'apos rule, however, did treat Jolla High as a bully.	The rule of d' or has treated Jolla High as a brute.	The Dapos rule treated High as a bully.
70	child safety fredericksburg three key preventing bully encounter	Children's safety and security Fredericksburg three keys to prevent the thugs from meeting.	Fredericksburg Children's Safety three keys to prevent the encounter of bullies.	Children's safety Fredericksburg three keys to keep bullies from meeting.
70	ashley nj teen launch anti bullying program	Adolescent Ashley N.J. launches an anti-bullying program.	Ashley N.J. Adolescent launches anti-bullying program.	Ashley N.J. Adolescent launches a program to combat bullying.
70	charity slam asbo replacement plan tackle anti social behaviour will repla	The slam-as-bo replacement anti-social-behaviour plan will be repeated.	Slam-as-bo charity replacement plan for anti-social behavior will be repeated.	The charity slam asbo replacement anti-social behavior plan will be repeated.
70	resource teacher parent film consequence schoolviolence bullying	The main teacher has filmed the consequences of the violence in the school by intimidating the students of the school.	The head teacher filmed the consequences of violence in the school by intimidating the students.	The head teacher filmed the consequences of violence in the school intimidating students.
70	teen creates anti bullying school program	Teenagers create anti-bullying school programs.	A school anti-bullying program is created by a teenager.	An adolescent creates a school program to fight bullying.
70	national attention technological harassment cyber bullying	National Attention Technological Harassment - cyber-bullying.	National Attention Technological harassment cyber-bullying.	National Attention Cyber cyber cyber harassment-bullying.
70	parent student educator tip preventing bullying ten district school organized event	In addition, a number of students attended the event, including a teacher, a teacher, a teacher, and a teacher.	Council for Schools; parents' educator; students to prevent suicide; intimidation Ten district schools organized an event.	Peer educators; students to prevent suicide; bullying Ten district schools organized an event.
70	book guide child therapist calling week parenting stopbullying	Therapist-guide for children who calls week d' parent education to stop the apos; intimidation.	Therapist-children's guide who calls the week d' parent education to stop the intimidation.	Therapist-children's guide who calls week d' parenting to stop intimidation.
70	bully sense anxiety relaxation technique	It's just that bullies can sense the relaxation technique of anxiety.	They feel the relaxation technique of anxiety.	Bullies sense relaxation technique of anxiety.
70	standing bully employee leading example excellent article	It's a good example of the kind of work you're doing.	A tyrannical employee who gives examples; excellent article.	A tyrannical employee giving the apos; excellent article example.
70	bull parent educator guide cyber bullying facebook twitter like changing lif	Guide to Facebook; Peer Educator Cyber Bullying Facebook as Changing Life.	Guide of l' educator parent cyber bullying Facebook like change the life.	Guide to l' parent educator cyber bullying Facebook like changing life.
70	final post series bullying work place business handle bullying	L' post-final workplace series s' occupies the intimidation.	L' post company-final series at workplaces s' occupies intimidation.	L' company post @- final series on the work place s' occupies of the intimidation.
70	recording artist michael marisa help bullying victim amazing song video	Michael Marisa, the recording artist, helps the victims of apos; intimidation to make a video of incredible songs.	Michael Marisa, the recording artist, has been helping victims of violence and bullying to make a video of incredible songs.	Recording artist Michael Marisa helps victims of bullying make an amazing song video.
70	st andrew st michael school hold second annual bullying awareness conference	St. Andrew St. Michael's School is hosting its second annual St. Andrew St. Michael's School Outreach Conference.	St. Andrew St. Michael School is hosting its second annual awareness conference on bullying and bullying.	St. Andrew St. Michael School organizes its second annual bullying awareness conference.
70	parent feel helpless bully picking kid tip bully proofing child	Parents feel powerless to choose children.	The parents feel powerless to choose a child.	Parents feel powerless to choose a child for themselves.
70	calling participate calling week january	Call for participants January week.	Call for Participants the week of January.	January week call to attendees.
70	ll sporting mine will mac wednesday february anti bullying day	It's going to be my turn on Wednesday, February, the day that I'm going to have to fight it.	It will be mine Wednesday, in February, the day of the fight against the apos; intimidation.	It will be mine Wednesday, February, the day of intimidation.
70	news workshop preventing bullying positive behavior support school	It is important to understand the role of the police in the prevention of bullying and the prevention of bullying.	Workshops; information on prevention of bullying; bullying behaviour in positive behaviour support schools.	Prevention information; bullying in positive behaviour support schools.
70	hurriyet turkish center help workplace bullying victim return job market	The Turkish Hurriyet Centre assists victims of domestic violence to return to the labour market.	The Turkish centre Hurriyet helps victims of d'apos; intimidation to return to the job market.	The Turkish Hurriyet helps victims of bullying to return to the job market.
70	autism awareness month education key bully	Awareness Month; Autism Education of Key Bullying.	Apo Awareness Month autism Key Bullying Education.	Awareness Month; autism Education of key bullying.
70	loved sense humor article help bully proofing child gt	J&apos loves to write about sensual humour that helps tyrants protect children from bullying.	J' loves the apos; article on the apos; sensual humor that helps tyrants protect children from the apos; intimidation.	J' loves it; article on l' sensual humor that helps bullies protect children from bullying.
70	penalty law biased favor bullying school workplace issue	The Sanctions Act promotes intimidation in the workplace.	The Sanctions Act also promotes bullying in the workplace.	Sanctions law promotes bullying in the workplace.
71	boosting america fashion	I want to boost American fashion.	Increase American fashion.	U.S. fashion upgrades.
72	smart money future mixed ahead data earnings market update stock future mi investing money	L' Future Prospects; Smart Money Future Data Market Updates of Future Stock Earnings Me invest money.	L' the future of l' the smart money of future data Updates of the market for future share gains to invest money.	L' the future; smart money future data Updates of future stock market earnings; money.
72	check finance news stock market gain money stock exchange time famous	Check out the latest news on the stock market to earn money from the famous stock market.	Check out the stock market finance news earning money from the famous stock market times.	Check stock market finance news earning money; time famous stock market money.
72	wall street set edge labour market data eyed gmt future dow jones	Wall Street's labor market data highlighted the future dow jones.	The Wall Street labor market data highlighted the future dow jones of the future.	Wall Street labour market data has highlighted the future dow jones of the future.
72	stock future higher investor refocus economy york reuters stock	It's a good idea to invest in a new company, but not in a new one.	Future stock more than $; investors refocus the company; economy york reuters stock.	Future stock more than; investors re-focus; economy york reuters stock.
72	winning large stock market winning large stock market individual trading stock	Winning large stock exchanges earn large individual stock exchanges.	Win large stock exchanges win large stock exchanges for individual shares listed on the stock exchange.	Winning large stock exchanges win large stock markets for individual shares on the stock exchange.
72	today stock market dow jones industrial average dji nasdaq	The price of the product is the same as the price of the product.	Today, the average average industrial Dow Jones stock market nasdaq dji.	Today, the average stock market dow Jones industrial dji nasdaq.
72	stock climb merger deal stock boost onslaught corporate merger market open monday	In addition, the company announced that it would be able to increase its shareholdings by the end of the year.	Share Increases Merger d' Shares Booster to the merger market; Open companies Monday.	Share Increases Fusion d' Shares Fusion d' D&apos merger market raid; Open companies Monday.
72	invest stock market money rich investment advice	You can find out more about the latest news on stock markets, stock markets, wealthy investments, wealthy investments and investment advice.	Learn about stock markets, stock markets, wealthy investments, wealthy investments and investment advice.	Inform-you about the stock markets, the stock markets, the rich investments, the rich investments and the investment advice.
72	market today today stock market dow jones industrial average dji nasdaq info	In addition, there are a number of other markets that offer a range of products and services.	Stock market today; stock market information from mid-sized industrial jones.	Bursary today; stock market dow jones medium industrial dji nasdaq stock market information.
72	stock share online stock trading buy stock online today stock market news sabmiller tale inves	Online stock exchange d' purchase of online stocks today; new spin-off stocks are investing.	Online stock market, online stock market, online stock market, online stock market, online stock market, online stock market, online stock market.	Online stock exchange; online stock purchase; online stock purchase today; new stock exchange story spreads invest.
72	stock market daily stock market analysis january nse asi retreat	Daily Stock Market Analysis (DSME) January to December.	The Bank of Canada's foreign exchange market outlook is expected to be positive.	Daily stock market analysis Janvier nse asian retreat.
72	stock climb merger deal stock boost onslaught corporate merger market open monday	In addition, the company announced that it would be able to increase its shareholdings by the end of the year.	Share Increases Merger d' Shares Booster to the merger market; Open companies Monday.	Share Increases Fusion d' Shares Fusion d' D&apos merger market raid; Open companies Monday.
73	nyc feb entrepreneur fashion lover networkers join brightnight join	Nyc feb networker fashion-loving entrepreneur join the sleepless night reach.	Nyc feb entrepreneur and networker fashion lovers join the sleepless night reach.	Nyc feb entrepreneur in love with fashion networkers join the sleepless night join.
73	nyfall fashion week feb ny fashion week fall will feb	Fashion Week Fashion Week Fashion Week Fashion Week Fashion Week Fashion Week Fie feb.	Nyfall fashion week feb feb ny fashion week fall will feb feb feb feb feb.	Neve fashion week feb ny fashion week fall will feb feb feb feb.
73	fashion week fall fashion week hot list hot list fall fashion week check	Fashion Week, Autumn, Fashion Week, Blacklist, Fashion Week, Autumn.	Fashion Week; Autumn; Fashion Week; The Black List; Fashion Week; Autumn.	The fashion week d' autumn, fashion week, blacklist, fashion week d' autumn.
73	eve fashion week nyc entrepreneur fashion lover networkers join brightnight	On the eve of Fashion Week, we are joined by a group of fashion-minded entrepreneurs for a night off from work.	On the eve of Fashion Week, fashion enthusiasts join us for a sleepless night.	Fashion entrepreneurs join us on the eve of fashion week for an all-nighter.
73	brightnight networking entrepreneur smallbiz owner top influencer nyc	Good night, Smallbiz Entrepreneur Networking owner, Smallbiz top influenceur nyc.	Good night entrepreneurial networking Smallbiz owner top influenceur nyc.	Good night networking entrepreneur Smallbiz owner top influenceur nyc.
74	horse wagering legal sport lounge bet zieralski mike merrigan wife lisa oc tave	Horse betting in legal sports halls was made by Zieralski mike merrigan's wife, Lisa ocve.	Zieralski mike merrigan Lisa ocve's wife, Lisa Otave, was the first woman to win the gold medal.	Horse betting in legal sports salons was made by Zieralski mike merrigan Lisa oc tave's wife.
74	horse racing handicapping	He's got a handicap in the horse races.	Handicap in horse racing.	Horse racing disability.
74	laying horse betfair route	Horse fair route.	L&apos is the route of the horse fair.	L' route of the horse fair.
74	race santa anita friday horse betting money race santa anita park friday janu	The race anita santa silver horse bet money santa anita santa park Friday Janu janu.	The race santa anita Friday silver horse betting santa anita race park Friday Janu janu.	The race santa anita Friday horse bet money race santa anita park Friday janu janu.
74	horse wagering legal sport lounge bet mile existing racetrack tra	Bet on horses in a sports room at kilometre d' an existing racetrack.	Betting on horses in a legal sports room at the kilometer d' an existing racetrack.	Betting on horses in an existing racetrack in a legal sports room at kilometre d&apos.
74	comment horse racing tip free daily thoroughbred tag betting tip delta down fairground	Comment Horse Runners free tip tag pure-daily blood tip Delta Down Fairground.	Feedback horses for free tipped tag pure-blood daily tip delta Down Fairground.	Comment horses runners for free tip tag pure-blood daily tip delta Down Fairground.
74	horse racing factor bet reliable	The horse-racing factor, he's betting on reliability.	The horse-racing factor has bet on reliability.	The horse racing factor bet on reliability.
74	horse racing oc tavern bar state offer track horse betting	Horse-racing tavern bar, offers horse-betting.	Tavern bar with horse races, offers free horse betting.	A tavern bar with horse racing and horse racing.
74	saturday horse racing betting advice	I'll give you an update on the betting on the horse races.	Bidding notice on horse racing on Saturday.	Horse racing betting notice on Saturday.
75	facebook privacy setting jour	This is the first time that j&apos has come into contact with them.	C&apos, is the first time that j&apos has come into contact with them.	C' is the first time that j' comes into contact with them.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.	L' user of the privacy facebook is a user.	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.	L' user of the privacy facebook is a user.	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	facebook privacy setting user facebook privacy setting extremely detailed	Privacy Configuration User Facebook Privacy Configuration Extremely detailed.	User facebook Configuration User facebook Configuration Privacy extremely detailed.	Configuring user facebook facebook user privacy Extremely detailed privacy configuration.
75	watch video learn protect privacy identity personal safety facebook profile	Watch Video Learn to Protect Privacy Personal Identity Personal Security Profile facebook.	Watch video learn to protect privacy personal identity profile facebook personal security profile.	Watch video learn to protect privacy personal identity profile facebook personal security profile.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.	L' user of the privacy facebook is a user.	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	social medium marketing medical field facebook privacy hcsm	Social media medical media Facebook Privacy field hcsm hcsm.	Social media marketing medical privacy hcsm hcsm Facebook field.	Social media marketing medical field Facebook privacy hcsm hcsm.
75	facebook profile harvested setting dating site facebook user unwitting	Facebook Facebook Facebook encounter profile collected involuntary Facebook user.	Profile facebook collected Facebook dating site involuntary Facebook user.	Profile facebook collected Facebook dating site unwitting Facebook user.
75	changing facebook place privacy setting opportunity business location based mobile marketin	It's a very important part of the business, and it's a very important part of the business.	Change of facebook place privacy opportunity; business-based business opportunities; market-based mobile market location.	Change facebook place privacy opportunity d' business based business; mobile market location based market.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.	L' user of the privacy facebook is a user.	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	naughty facebook started sharing personal detail site day turn fb	Naughty facebook started to share personal details on day fb tour fb.	Bad Facebook started sharing personal details site day fb tour fb.	Bad facebook started sharing personal details site day fb tour fb.
75	facebook privacy breakthrough	Facebook has made a breakthrough in the area of privacy.	Facebook's made a breakthrough in privacy.	Facebook has made a breakthrough in privacy issues.
75	change facebook privacy setting	Change the privacy settings of Facebook.	Change facebook's privacy settings.	Change the facebook privacy setting.
75	stealth mode making invisible facebook personal finance news yahoo fina	This is a stealth mode that makes invisible personal financial news facebook yahoo fina.	Stealth mode making invisible personal financial news facebook yahoo fina.	Stealth mode making invisible facebook personal financial news yahoo fina.
75	facebook privacy setting nicholas jackson facebook privacy option	Nicholas Jackson Facebook Privacy Privacy option.	Jackson facebook facebook privacy privacy option.	Confidentiality of facebook nicholas Jackson facebook privacy option.
75	protect personal facebook	Protect your own facebook.	Personal facebook protection.	Please, protect your personal facebook.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.	L' user of the privacy facebook is a user.	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	facebook finally offer http change setting	Facebook Finally offer the http Change Configuration.	Facebook finally offer the change configuration http.	Facebook finally offer http change configuration.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.	L' user of the privacy facebook is a user.	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	news update step checking facebook privacy	Facebook Privacy Verification Update.	Update facebook privacy verification step.	Updating the facebook privacy check step.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.	L' user of the privacy facebook is a user.	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	stealth mode making invisible facebook personal finance news yahoo fina	This is a stealth mode that makes invisible personal financial news facebook yahoo fina.	Stealth mode making invisible personal financial news facebook yahoo fina.	Stealth mode making invisible facebook personal financial news yahoo fina.
75	facebook bug allows personal data access phishing repaired washington feb facebook security	The facebook bug will allow you to hide your personal data from the repaired Washington facebook security.	The facebook bug allows phishing of personal data repaired Washington Facebook security.	The facebook bug allows the personal data phishing repaired Washington facebook security.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.	L' user of the privacy facebook is a user.	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	cnn hack facebook unlocks security facebook adding security feature pa	Cnn hack facebook will unlock facebook security by adding the security function pa pa.	Cnn hack facebook unlocks facebook security by adding the pa security feature.	Cnn hack facebook unlocks facebook security by adding the security feature pa pa.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.	L' user of the privacy facebook is a user.	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	great tip protecting privacy facebook receive lot question	This is a great way to protect your privacy and receive lots of questions.	Great privacy tip facebook receive many questions.	Great tip for privacy facebook receive many questions.
75	minute update setting facebook secure enabling http	Configuration of the update of the facebook minutes securing l' activation of http.	Configuration of facebook minutes update securing the' activation of http.	Configuration of facebook minutes update securing the http activation.
75	will facebook privacy seriously site import facebook profile permission cnn	Confidentiality facebook seriously site d' allow Facebook profile import.	Confidentiality facebook seriously site d' import of profile facebook permission cnnn.	Facebook privacy seriously site d' Facebook profile import permission cnnn.
75	official facebook video talking privacy setting watch	The video on Facebook talks about d' a private life.	On Facebook, the video talks about d' a private life.	On Facebook, the video talks about privacy.
75	facebook instant personalization endangers online privacy consider disabling	Instant personalization of Facebook puts privacy on-line at risk.	Instant facebook customization puts online privacy at risk.	Facebook instant personalization puts online privacy at risk.
75	full http support facebook making site secure user fb	Full http facebook support render the site user secure fb.	Full http facebook support make the site secure user fb.	Full http support facebook make the site secure user fb.
75	stealth mode making invisible facebook personal finance news yahoo fina	This is a stealth mode that makes invisible personal financial news facebook yahoo fina.	Stealth mode making invisible personal financial news facebook yahoo fina.	Stealth mode making invisible facebook personal financial news yahoo fina.
75	blog protect facebook account hacker fbs security feature	Blog protect your facebook hacker fbs account security feature.	Blog protect hacker fbs facebook account security feature.	Blog protect account facebook hacker fbs security feature.
75	facebook roll encryption wake ceo fan hacked security central facebook	Facebook is rolling wake fan fan encryption fan Ceo hacked the central security facebook.	Facebook runs wake wake fan Ceo encryption hacked central security facebook.	Facebook rolls encryption wake fan Ceo hacked central security facebook.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.	L' user of the privacy facebook is a user.	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.	L' user of the privacy facebook is a user.	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	cnn tech hack facebook unlocks security facebook adding security feature afte	Cnn tech hack unlocks facebook security by adding an after-the-fact security feature.	Cnn tech hack facebook unlocks facebook security by adding a security feature after the fact.	Cnn tech hack facebook unlocks facebook security with an after-the-fact security feature.
75	change security setting facebook protect account international business time	Configuration of the security of change-of-facebook to protect your user time; international account.	Configuration of the security of change facebook protect the time d' international account business.	Configuring facebook change security protect time d' international account business.
75	famous facebook flip flop social networking goliath number hasty move year	The famous Facebook flip social network flop number Goliath move fast moving year fast.	The famous Facebook flip flop social network number Goliath move fast year fast moving.	The famous Facebook flip flop social networking number Goliath Fast Moving Year Fast Move.
75	hack facebook unlocks security facebook adding security feature pair	Hack facebook will unlock facebook security by adding a pair of security features.	Hack facebook unlocks facebook security by adding a pair of security features.	Hack facebook unlocks security by adding a pair of security features.
75	facebook adding full http support website secure user fb	Facebook add the complete secure user-friendly http web site fb.	Facebook add the complete support website http user secure fb.	Facebook add the complete secure user fb http support website.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.	L' user of the privacy facebook is a user.	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	changing facebook place privacy setting roll facebook place location glo	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	Change facebook place privacy set roll facebook place glo place glo.	Change facebook place privacy roll facebook place glo place glo.
75	tech hack facebook unlocks security facebook adding security feature pair	Facebook techno hack will unlock facebook security by adding a pair of security features.	Facebook techno hack unlocks the facebook security by adding a pair of security features.	Facebook techno hack unlocks facebook security by adding a security feature pair.
75	facebook great personal careful reveal online privacy security	Facebook is a great way to reveal the security of your personal life online.	Facebook takes great personal care to reveal the security of online privacy.	Facebook great personal care reveal online privacy.
75	privacy setting facebook user	Configuration of the user's privacy.	Configuration of the user facebook.	Configuration of the privacy of l' user facebook.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.	L' user of the privacy facebook is a user.	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	facebook instant personalization privacy setting sharing innermost secret	Instant confidentiality of the most intimate secrets-sharing facebook personalization.	Instant confidentiality of the facebook personalization sharing the most intimate secrets.	Instant facebook customization privacy sharing the most intimate secrets.
75	tech cnn hack facebook unlocks security facebook adding security feature	Facebook PCN hack technology unlocks facebook security by adding a security feature.	PCN hack facebook technology unlocks facebook security by adding a security feature.	The PCN hack facebook unlocks facebook security by adding a security feature.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.	L' user of the privacy facebook is a user.	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.	L' user of the privacy facebook is a user.	L' facebook privacy user is a user.
76	sundance time catch celebrity sighting glimpse going sundance festival	L' hour of the sun dance allows the celebrities to see the sun dance festival.	L' time of the sun dance gives the celebrity a glimpse of the sun dance festival.	Sunset time allows celebrities to catch a glimpse of the sun dance festival.
76	huffingtonpost sundance film festival james franco three company installation	Huffingtonpost Sundance Festival James has three of the company's facilities.	Huffingtonpost Sundance Festival James franco three facilities of the company.	Huffington post Sundance james festival free three company facilities.
76	james franco sundance drag	James Franco sundance's drag.	James franc sundance drag.	James franco sundance drag.
76	paul rudd jesse peretz bushy beard sundance comedy idiot brother paulrudd jesseperetz sundance	Paul Rudd Jesse Peretz, bearded actor, idiot, brother Pauludd Jesseperetz, bearded actor.	Paul Rudd Jesse Peretz, bearded, actor bearded, idiot, brother Pauludd Jesseperetz, actor bearded.	Paul Rudd Jesse Peretz, bearded actor, bearded actor, idiot actor, brother Pauludd Jesseperetz, bearded actor.
76	james franco wig sundance jared blogging inside decked bing bar	J'ai aussi disponible en français.	James is a free online blogging bar.	James french wig sundance jared blogging in decked bar.
76	actress farmiga sundance directing debut reuters reuters vera farmiga big breakout	L&apos farmographic actress sundance realizing early reuters reuters will farmiga great escape.	L' farmographic actress sundance realizing first reuters reuters vera farmiga great escape.	L' actress farmiga sundance realizing first reuters reuters vera farmiga great escape.
76	anton yelchin choked felicity jones mtv sundance celebrity photo booth	Anton Yelchin smothered Felicity Jones mtv Sundance photo stand of celebrities.	Anton Yelchin has smothered Felicity Jones mtv Sundance, celebrity photo stand.	Anton Yelchin choked out Felicity Jones mtv Sundance, celebrity photo stand.
76	star head sundance	Sundance of the sun's head; star.	Sound of the head of d' star.	Head sundance d' star.
76	kristin kreuk sundance stroll rachael leigh cook kristin kreuk rachael leigh cook greet crowd	Kristin Kreuk Sunset Walk redeemedael leigh kristin kreuk kitchen redeemedael leigh cooking leigh greeting crowd.	Kristin Kreuk sunwalk redeemedael leigh kristin kreuk cook rachael leigh kitchen leigh greetings crowd.	Kristin Kreuk walk of the sun rachael leigh kristin kreuk cook rachael leigh cook cooking leigh greetings crowd.
76	sundance film festival celebrity sighting	Sun Film Festival, celebrities in sight.	Celebrity sunday film festival.	It's a film festival of the sun, famous people in sight.
76	star head sundance	Sundance of the sun's head; star.	Sound of the head of d' star.	Head sundance d' star.
76	james franco wear blonde wig sundance	James Franco wears a blonde wig, sundance.	James Franco wears a blonde sundance wig.	James Franco wears a blonde wig sundance.
76	moviefone intrview makingof interview sundance filed celebrity interview video sundance film fe	Moviefone intrview making of interview sundance deposited a video of the interviews of celebrities sundance film f f f f f f f f f f f f.	Moviefone intrview making of interview sundance has submitted a video of the following: celebrity interviews sundance film f f f f f f f f f f f.	Moviefone intrview making of interview sundance uploaded a video of celebrity interviews sundance film ff.
76	elizabeth olsen sundance film festival debut sister footstep theatrical	Elizabeth Olsen Sundance Film Festival First Sister No Theatrical Theatre.	Elizabeth Olsen Sundance Film Festival first sister no theater.	Elizabeth Olsen Sundance Film festival first sister no theatrical theater.
76	check interviewing danny glover houseofswagg sundance thedreamisreal	Check out Danny Glover House ofswagg sundance's Thedreamisrealreal interview.	Check the appos; interview with Danny Glover Houseofswagg sundance Thedreamisrealreal.	Check with Danny Glover House ofswagg sundance Thedreamisrealreal.
76	hott cold sundance film festival lola blog	Hott cold Sundance festival film lola blog.	Hott cold Sundance film festival lola blog.	Hott cold Sundance film festival lola blog.
76	photo sundance film festival star park city utah	Sundance Photo Festival star film park Utah city.	Sundance Film Festival photo festival star park Utah city.	Sundance film festival star park Utah city.
76	celebrity sighting sundance film festival	Celebrities catch a glimpse of the Sun Dance Film Festival.	A celebrity sees the Sun Dance Film Festival.	Sun-dancing film festival for a celebrity.
76	sundance day strange celebrity encounter steve carell elijah wood full day sundanc	On Sundays, strange celebrities meet Elijah Wood all day.	On Sundays, strange celebrities will meet Steve Carell Elijah Wood all day long.	On Sundays, strange celebrities meet Steve Carell Elijah Wood all day long.
76	james franco suzanne summer will nom tmrw	James Franco Suzanne Summer appointed tmrw.	Mr. James Franco Suzanne Summer will be appointed tmrw.	James Franco-Suzanne Summer will be appointed tmrw.
76	james franco best actor nom mobbed sundance film festival	James Franco Best Actor Name Mobbed Sundance Film Festival.	James Franco best actor name mobbed festival Sundance film.	James Franco best actor name mobbed Sundance film festival name.
76	demi moore ashton kutcher sexy sundance showbiz spy	That's Moore Ashton Kutcher Sexy Sundance, show biz spy.	Moore Ashton Kutcher Sexy Sundance, showbiz spy.	Moore Ashton Kutcher Sexy Sundance, spy for showbiz.
76	chelsea handler cozy andre balazs sundance	This is Chelsea Handler Cozy andre Balazs Sundance.	"Chelsea Handler Cozy andre ""Balazs Sundance."""	Chelsea handler cozy andre balazs sundance.
76	james franco sundance drag	James Franco sundance's drag.	James franc sundance drag.	James franco sundance drag.
76	james franco sundance drag tmz	James Franco sundance... drag tmz.	James franc sundance drag tmz.	James franco sundance drag tmz.
76	booker tweet sundance film festival brings brick city park city	The booker has been tweeting the Sun Film Festival bringing Brick City Park City.	The booker tweets the festival of the sunshine brings Brick City Park City.	Booker tweets sun film festival brings Brick City Park City.
76	mnh photo sundance film festival	It's called the Sun Dance Film Festival.	The sun-dancing film festival.	The film festival of the sun dance.
76	photo blair underwood sundance film festival park city utah promoting film homework	Photo by Blair Underwood Sundance Film Festival Town Parc d' Utah Film Duty Promotion.	Photo by Blair Underwood festival Sundance film park in the city of d' promotion of film homework.	Blair Underwood film festival Sundance city park d&apos photography; Utah film duty promotion.
76	cent sundance work progess	C' is a d&apos work; before-garde.	C&apos. is a work of d' before-garde.	C' is a work before-garde.
76	james franco sundance drag	James Franco sundance's drag.	James franc sundance drag.	James franco sundance drag.
76	celebrity sighting sundance film festival	Celebrities catch a glimpse of the Sun Dance Film Festival.	A celebrity sees the Sun Dance Film Festival.	Sun-dancing film festival for a celebrity.
76	catch janelle monae prince msg unreal sundance sexytime park city	Chop Janelle Monae Prince Msg irresistible Sundance Sextime Park City.	Chop Janelle Monae Prince Msg irresistible Sextime Park City Sundance.	Chopper Janelle Monae Prince Msg irresistible sundance sextime park city.
76	sundance interview demi moore airing tonight	Interview with Sunance Demi Moore aired tonight.	L' Demi Moore interview with Sunance Demi Moore aired tonight.	L' Sunance Demi Moore interview aired tonight.
76	post celebrity news chelsea handler recount sundance weekend kendra wilkinson hugh hefner	Chelsea handler reports on Sundance's weekend-end Kendra Wilkinson Hugh Hefner.	After the news of the celebrities, chelsea handler reports on Sundance's weekend-end Kendra Wilkinson Hugh Hefner.	After the celebrity news broke, chelsea handler reported on Sundance's-end of the week, Kendra Wilkinson Hugh Hefner.
76	sundance day strange celebrity encounter steve carell elijah wood full day sundanc	On Sundays, strange celebrities meet Elijah Wood all day.	On Sundays, strange celebrities will meet Steve Carell Elijah Wood all day long.	On Sundays, strange celebrities meet Steve Carell Elijah Wood all day long.
76	john salley sundance	That's John Salley Sundance.	Uh, John Salley Sundance.	John salley sundance.
76	bryan safi brett erlich sundance bryan safi brett erlich braved cold swiped swag	Browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse.	Bryan safi brett erlich sundance bryan safi brett erlich braved cold swag swiped.	Bryan safi brett erlich sundance bryan safi brett erlich braved cold swag swiped.
76	mary kate ashley olsen younger sister hit sundance	Mary Kate Ashley, Olsen's younger sister, has hit Sundance.	The next day, Mary Kate Ashley, the younger sister of Olsen, struck out at Sundance.	Mary Kate Ashley, the younger sister of Olsen, hit Sundance.
76	sundance today tobey maguire demi moore kate bosworth tobey maguire waitin	Today in Half Maguire Moore Kate Bosworth in Maguire to wait in Maguire.	Sunday in Maguire; today in Maguire half-More Moore Kate Bosworth in Maguire to wait in Maguire.	Sunday in Maguire; today in Moore Half Maguire Kate Bosworth wait in Maguire.
76	sundance film festival bing style check scene sundance film festival bing	Sun Film Festival Bing style verification scene Sun Festival Bing Sun Film Festival bing.	Sun Film Festival Bing verification scene verification festival sun festival bing festival sun film bing.	Sun Film Festival Bing style verification scene sun festival bing bing sun film festival.
76	anton yelchin choked felicity jones mtv sundance celebrity photo booth	Anton Yelchin smothered Felicity Jones mtv Sundance photo stand of celebrities.	Anton Yelchin has smothered Felicity Jones mtv Sundance, celebrity photo stand.	Anton Yelchin choked out Felicity Jones mtv Sundance, celebrity photo stand.
76	sundance sexytime park city sundance	This is Sundance Sextime Park City Sundance.	Sundance sexual park city sundance.	Sextime park city sundance sundance.
76	makeshift portrait studio sundance	The Sun Dance in the Fortune Portrait Studio.	Sun dance in fortune portrait studio.	The fortune portrait studio sundance.
76	elizabeth olsen sundance breakout star elizabeth olsen hit premiere movie martha marcy marl	Elizabeth Olsen Sundance Star Elizabeth Olsen premiered Martha Marcy Marl.	Elizabeth Olsen Sundance Star Elizabeth Olsen premiered the film Martha Marcy Marl.	Elizabeth Olsen Sundance Star Elizabeth Olsen made the premiere of the film, Martha Marcy Marl.
76	phife dawg atcq speaking sundance film festival video	Phife dawg atcq, talking about the Sundance Film Festival video.	Phife dawg atcq talking about Sundance Film Festival video.	Phife dawg atcq speaking video of Sundance Film Festival.
76	kate bosworth happy sundance day	Kate Bosworth Happy sunny day.	Kate bosworth, happy sunny day.	Kate Bosworth happy day in the sun.
76	post james franco sings sundance	"James ""and, Sundance &quot."	"Position ""James"" and, Sundance &quot."	It is important to note that this is not the case.
76	best photo day sundance swag edition eminem chuck dueces best pic	Best Sunday photo of the swag eminem chuck edition of the swag best photo.	Best Sunday eminem chuck swag edition of theeces best photo.	Best Sunday photo edition swag eminem chuck dueces best photo ever.
76	penn badgley snowboarding sundance penn badgley snowboard burton snowboard park city mountai	Penn badgley snowboard sundance penn badgley snowboard burton snowboard city center Mountai.	Penn badgley snowboard sundance penn badgley snowboard burton snowboard park city Mountai.	Penn badgley snowboard sundance penn badgley snowboard burton snowboard park city Mountai.
76	robert redford open anniversary sundance film festival protest planned	Robert Redford organizes a celebration of the Sundance Film Festival.	Robert Redford is organizing a rally to celebrate the anniversary of the Sundance Film Festival.	Robert Redford organizes a celebration to celebrate the anniversary of the film festival in Sundance.
76	sundance familiar territory elizabeth bank omg	Elizabeth Bank Omg.	It is the largest city in the world and the second largest city in Europe.	On Sunday, familiar territory d' Elizabeth Bank Omg.
76	tmz sez james franco sundance drag filed james franco hitechcj	Tmz sez james fran sundance drag james hitechcj.	Tmz sez james franco sundance drag deposited james franco hitechcj.	Tmz sez james franco sundance drag deposited james franco hitechcj.
76	gallery celebrity sighting sundance film festival	Sun Dance Film Festival with celebrities in the gallery.	This is a sun-dancing film festival with celebrities in the gallery.	Sun-dancing film festival with gallery celebrities.
76	le site picked bmw lab james franco blond sundance advice wannabe nude art model	The site has chosen a blonde-blond-blonde-blond-blond-blond-blond-blond-blond-blond-blond-blond-blond-blond-blond-blond-blond-haired model.	The site chose bmw blonde blonde blonde blonde boys advice d'apos; a future model d'apos; naked art.	The site chose bmw lab james blonde blond blonde council d' a future model d' naked art.
76	star head sundance	Sundance of the sun's head; star.	Sound of the head of d' star.	Head sundance d' star.
76	mario lopez rick foxx dr jackson avery grey sundance	Mario Lopez Rick Foxx Dr Jackson very gray Sundance.	Mario Lopez Rick Foxx, Dr Jackson very gray Sundance.	And Mario Lopez Rick Foxx Dr Jackson very gray Sundance.
76	best picture lil jon sundance	Best Picture Lil Jon Sundance.	Best picture by Lil Jon Sundance.	And best picture is Lil Jon Sundance.
76	sundance zooey deschanel rocking miniskirt blazer degree weather	Sunance zooey Deschanel throw blazer blazer miniskirt degree weather.	Sunance zooey Deschanel throw mini skirt blazer degree weather.	Sunance zooey Deschanel throw down miniskirt blazer degree weather.
76	celebrity sighting sundance film festival	Celebrities catch a glimpse of the Sun Dance Film Festival.	A celebrity sees the Sun Dance Film Festival.	Sun-dancing film festival for a celebrity.
76	urban gossip iphone app event fab ybf celebs hit sundance film festival yb africanamerican	Urban rumors iphone fab event ybf celebrities hit the yb Afro U.S. sun film festival.	Urban rumors iphone event fab ybf celebrities hit the festival of the sun movie yb Afro-American.	Urban gossip iphone event fab ybf celebrities hit the yb Afro-American film festival.
76	photo star sundance hollywood contingent set shop mid	It's the only place where you can get the information you need.	The Hollywood s&apos contingent is installed in the middle of the workshop.	The Hollywood contingent is set up in the middle of the studio.
76	lizzie olsen storm sundance film festival kevin dolak buzz worthy film premiering week	Lizzie Olsen Storm Sundance Kevin Dolak Film Festival buzzing movie first week of film.	Lizzie Olsen Storm Sundance Film Festival kevin dolak humming worthy film first week of film.	Lizzie Olsen Storm Sundance Film festival kevin dolak humming worthy film first week of film.
76	eliza dushku drop sundance adorable ll admit thing eliza dushku	"Dushku Drop Sundance ""Admit-on."	"What; Eliza Dushku Drop Sundance ""Admit-on."	It's a great way to get a feel for the world.
76	james franco platinum blonde hilarious jac	James platinum hilarious Jac.	James platinum platinum, hilarious blonde Jac.	James Franco platinum blonde hilarious Jac.
76	chris hemsworth lead celebrity storm tao sundance ministry appreciates sundance film festival founder	Chris Hemsworth, Prime Minister of the Sunstroke Ministry, credits the founder of the Sunstroke Film Festival.	Chris Hemsworth, Prime Minister of the Ministry of Sunstorms, appreciates the founder of the Sun Film Festival.	Chris Hemsworth, Prime Minister of the Ministry of Sunstroke appreciates the founder of the film festival.
77	whycollegenow present college scholarship fantastic post college scholar	Why Collegenow present the Fantastic University Scholarship post-university.	Why collegenow present the fantastic university scholarship post-university.	Why collegenow present the university scholarship fantastic post-university.
77	financial aid low income student sdut	Low Income Student Financial Assistance sdut.	Low-income student financial assistance sdut.	Low income student financial assistance sdut.
77	cost financial aid chicago school professional psychology	Financial Assistance Professional psychology; School of Chicago.	It's a good idea to get a job at the school.	Financial assistance Professional psychology at school in Chicago.
77	workshop offer help student aid form regional workshop open help faf	The program is designed to provide students with the tools they need to make the transition to a knowledge-based economy.	L' workshop offers student assistance; help from students; an open regional workshop; help from volunteers; an open workshop.	L' workshop offer; student assistance; student assistance; a regional workshop open to the public; a workshop open to the public.
77	student juvenile arthritis apply college scholarship staff report arthritis foundation	Soldiers improve target precision on sniper course Valcartier, QC – Course tests ability to hit targets in varying weather.	A student in juvenile arthritis applies for a bursary; college education Staff report a foundation for osteo; arthritis.	Students studying juvenile arthritis apply for scholarships; college staff report foundation for arthritis.
77	master phd scholarship university manitoba canada beasiswa scholarship	Graduate Studies at the University of Manitoba Canada.	Fellowship; doctoral studies at the University of Manitoba Canada.	Canadian Institute for Health Information; Canadian Institute for Health Information; Canadian Institute for Health Information.
77	calum miller mba scholarship university edinburgh uk beasiswa scholarship	Postdoctoral Fellowship; Miller Mba de l'apos, PhD; Edinburgh University of Beasiswa.	University of Edinburgh uk beasiswa, University of Edinburgh.	Apos Scholarship; Miller Mba de l'apos calum studies; Edinburgh University uk beasiswa.
77	pell grant set academic year	The Pell Scholarship is awarded annually by the University of British Columbia.	The Pell Scholarship is awarded in the academic year.	The Pell Scholarship was set for the academic year.
77	time thinking financial aid join fafsa day sunday dean	Time to think about the next generation; financial assistance to join the dean's office on Sunday.	It's time to think about it; financial help join fafsa day Sunday the dean.	Time to think about l' financial assistance join fafsa day sunday Dean.
77	fuji xerox setsutaro kobayashi memorial fund foreign student grant japan beasi	Fuji xerox setsutaro kobayashi Memorial Fund for Japan beasi beasi Foreign Students.	Fuji xerox setsutaro kobayashi memorial fund for the foreign students scholarship japan beasi beasi.	Fuji xerox setsutaro kobayashi memorial fund for beasi beasi foreign students.
77	tracyjones college student file fafsa fafsa government eligibility	Tracyjones University student file, Fafsa fafsa, eligibility of the government.	Tracyjones university student fafsa fafsa government eligibility.	Tracyjones university student file fafsa fafsa government eligibility.
77	assistance offered student aid form	In addition, there are a number of initiatives underway to improve the quality of life of Canadians.	The program was offered in the form of an application form, and student assistance.	Assistance has been provided in the form of a student assistance form.
77	cal grant financial aid application california student launched student maximize aid option app	If you want to apply for a grant, you have to apply for a grant, and you have to apply for a grant.	Application for grants; financial assistance Student-initiated California Student program maximizes student assistance; option d' assistance app option.	Application for grants; financial assistance California student launched student maximize opportunity; option d' assistance app option.
77	great info college financial aid time apply	Great Info Time d' College Financial Assistance; Applied.	Great info Time d' financial assistance from schools; applies.	Great info Time d' college financial assistance; applies.
77	announcement lyon township high school host free college financial planning seminar feb patch	Announcement that lyon township high school d' organize free seminar of financial planning of the colleges feb patch fe fe fe fefe.	Announce lyon township high school d' organize free financial planning seminar of the colleges feb patch fe fe fe fe fefe.	Announces that lyon township high school d' organize school financial planning seminar February.
77	toyota renews scholarship program donation american indian college fund denver jan prnewswi	Toyota is renewing the U.S. Denver Jan prnewswi Native American College Scholarship Program.	Toyota renews the donation of the Scholarship Program from the Denver Jan prnewswi Indian College Fund.	Toyota renews the scholarship program from the Denver Jan prnewswi Indian College Fund.
77	unique college scholarship student	He is a one-time student at the University of British Columbia.	A single scholarship student at l'apos; university.	One-time scholarship student at the university.
77	mba scholarship nottingham university business school uk beasiswa scholarship	MBA Scholarship for l' Business School of l' University of Nottingham Scholarship Uk beasiswa.	MBA Scholarship for l' Business School of l' Uk beasiswa Scholarship University of Nottingham.	MBA scholarship for l' business school of l' University of Nottingham scholarship Uk beasiswa.
77	uic scholarship aid uic honor college business student university illinois chicago scholarship	University of Apos; University of Illinois; University of Apos; University of Applied Sciences; University of Chicago; University of Chicago.	Scholarships are available to assist a business student from the University of Apos, University of Illinois, to obtain a business scholarship in Chicago.	A scholarship to study helps a business student from the University of Apos; to obtain a university scholarship in Chicago.
77	college best financial aid arizona state university	University of Apos, Arizona.	Best financial assistance from the University of Apos; Arizona.	The University of Apos, Arizona's best financial aid.
77	black men america scholarship deadline february female student apply	The deadline for the Black Men's U.S. Scholarship Program is February.	Deadline for U.S. scholarships for black men is February.	The deadline for American scholarships for black men is February.
77	kid set college time fill fafsa	Time spent at the university by children fills the gap.	The time spent at the university by the children fills the gap.	Children's time at the university fills the gap.
77	asia pacific entrepreneur award golden key international honour society beasiswa scholarship	A Beasiswa Scholarship from the International Society of Apos; Honour.	An Asia Pacific entrepreneur and recipient of a Beasiswa Scholarship from the Society Internationale d&apos.	An entrepreneur from Asia Pacific decorated with apos; a beasiswa grant from the International Society of Apos.
77	find free college grant money find free college grant money find free college gran grant	Finding the place; Scholarship money; Free studies; Finding the place; Scholarship money; Free studies; Finding the place; Scholarship money.	Find the place; award money; study for free; find the place; award money; study for free; find the place; money from the grant.	Find the money from the scholarship, free studies, find the money from the scholarship, free studies, find the money from the scholarship.
77	applying financial aid groundless myth	Applying the Principles; Financial Assistance Unfounded myth.	Apply the principles; financial assistance myth unfounded.	Apply the principles; financial aid myths unfounded.
77	live state massachusetts financial aid college	It's a good idea to go to school.	Ecole d'apos; financial assistance from l'apos; State of Massachusetts.	Ecole d'apos; state of Massachusetts financial aid.
77	international scholarship bangor university uk beasiswa scholarship	This program is available in English, French, German, German, German, German, German, German, German, German and German.	Bangor International Scholarship uk beasiswa University d&apos scholarship; studies.	Bangor International Scholarship University uk beasiswa scholarships.
77	thing private scholarship college solution usnews	This is a scholarship, a school, a school, a school.	This thing, it's a scholarship, a school, a school.	This thing, it's scholarship money, a school, a school, a school.
77	beth yarrow memorial award medical science university south wale australia beasi	Beth Yarrow Memorial Award Winner for Medical Science University of South Wale australia beasi.	Beth Yarrow Memorial Medical Science Award University of South Wale australia beasi.	Beth Yarrow Memorial Award in medical science University of South Wale australia beasi.
77	scholarship advice inside financial aid office college planning help	It is also important to note that there are a number of factors that influence the success of the program.	Fellowships; studies at home; interior of home; financial assistance college planning office help plan.	Bursaries; studies at home; interior de l'apos; financial assistance office of college planning help to plan.
77	applying federal student aid fear fafsa	Federal support for students is fearful.	Applying the Federal Student Assistance Ffasca.	Applying the federal student aid program is a threat.
77	phd position biophysical chemistry lund university sweden beasiswa scholarship	Ph.D. Ph.D. degree in Biophysics and Chemistry, University of Lund sweden beasiswa.	Phd position biophysics chemistry Lund University sweden beasiswa fellowship; studies.	Phd position biophysics chemistry University Lund sweden beasiswa scholarship d' studies.
77	news release high school student apply scholarship novec electric cooperative	Press release Students apply for a scholarship to study at a co-operative in Ottawa.	Communiqué A high school student applies for a scholarship to study at a co-operative in Ottawa.	News release A high school student is applying for a co-op education grant.
77	cash college workshop tomorrow find location	University's money tomorrow.	Workshop on apo; apo money; university tomorrow.	We'll have a workshop on apo; university money tomorrow.
77	master scholarship international relation austria beasiswa scholarship	Scholarships and fellowships are awarded to students in the field of international relations.	Master's Scholarship in International Relations austria beasiswa D&apos Scholarship.	Scholarship Masters in International Relations austria beasiswa scholarship d' studies.
77	strader organ scholarship competition college conservatory music university cincinnati usa university	Cincinnati University Conservatory Music School; Cincinnati University Music Conservatory; Cincinnati University Music School.	Scholarship competition d' conservatory music school conservatory university cincinnati university.	Apos scholarship competition; strader conservatory music school Conservatory university cincinnati usa university.
77	sixth annual avnet tech game offer scholarship networking opportunity winning student will	Sixth Annual Technology Game d' offering Student Winning Networking Awards will be.	The sixth annual technology game will offer networking scholarships to students.	Sixth annual technology game d' offering networking grants opportunity winning student will be.
77	asia center graduate summer grant harvard university usa beasiswa scholarship	University of British Columbia, University of British Columbia, Faculty of Arts, University of British Columbia.	Asia centre graduate d' was awarded Harvard University used to beasiswa scholarship; studies.	Asia center graduate of apos; was awarded Harvard University usa beasiswa scholarships; studies.
77	financial aid help woman school hispanic scholarship	Financial assistance to assist Hispanic students to obtain a scholarship.	Financial assistance is provided to Hispanic female students to help them obtain a post-secondary education bursary.	L' financial assistance to help Hispanic students apply for scholarships.
77	financial aid proper method financial aid education applying financial aid financial aid essay	Financial assistance Financial assistance Financial assistance Financial assistance Financial assistance Financial assistance Financial assistance; financial assistance; financial assistance.	Financial Assistance Correct method Financial assistance Education applying credits; financial assistance Financial assistance testing credits; financial assistance.	Financial Assistance Correct method Financial assistance Education applying the program; financial assistance Test-and-test financial assistance; financial assistance.
77	beaumont quartet scholarship beaumont high girl signed letter intent college	Scholarship of the Beaumont Beaumont High Girl quartet Signed letter d' intention college.	Beaumont High Girl Beaumont Fellowship Signed letter d' intent college.	Beaumont Beaumont High Girl's quartet scholarship Signed letter d' intent college.
77	undergraduate scholarship international college hotel management australia beasiswa schola	Scholarship for the international undergraduate degree in the management of hotels in Australia.	International Undergraduate Award in Australian beasiswa schola schola hotel management.	Scholarship in international undergraduate hotel management australia beasiswa schola schola.
77	college scholarship white picket college tag college financial aid college scholarship money college sch	Fellowship, Studies, Picket, Fellowship, Studies, Financial Assistance, Fellowship, Studies, Fellowship, Studies.	Scholarship, picket, scholarship, financial assistance, bursaries, scholarships, bursaries, bursaries.	Scholarships, scholarships, picketing, scholarships, scholarships, financial assistance, bursaries, bursaries, bursaries, bursaries, bursaries, bursaries.
77	post financial aid college lt gt financial advice lt gt popular lt gt lt gt	After that, the college offers financial assistance.	After financial assistance, the college offers financial advice.	After financial assistance, the college offers financial advice and advice.
77	winning scholarship college third edition in college scholarship auction ebay	University of Calgary; University of Calgary; University of Calgary; University of Calgary; University of Calgary; University of Calgary; University of Calgary.	Winner of a bursary; university 3rd edition auction of bursaries; university ebay.	Winner of a bursary; university 3rd edition auction of bursaries; college; ebay university.
77	undergraduate scholarship university ontario institute technology uoit canada beasiswa	This program is available to students who wish to pursue a post-graduate degree.	Fellowship; undergraduate university studies at Canadian Institute of Technology u eua beasiswa.	Apos scholarship; undergraduate university studies Ontario institute of technology u o canada beasiswa.
77	academic merit scholarship melbourne institute business technology indonesia beasiswa	Melbourne University Award of Merit - Institute of Commercial Technology, Inconesia beasiswa.	Melbourne University Merit Award Institute of Commercial Technology indonesia beasiswa.	Melbourne Institute of Commercial Technology, indonesia beasiswa University Award.
77	financial aid pry money cold stingy finger financial aid office appeal fafsa finan	Financial assistance; financial assistance; financial assistance; financial assistance; financial assistance.	Financial assistance to draw from money; cold money to start office; financial assistance to start financing.	Financial assistance draw from money; cold money pinger desk d'apos; financial assistance call fafsa financing.
77	find college scholarship money scholarship institute	Find a bursary institute; university studies.	Find an institute of bursaries and bursaries; university studies.	To find an institute for the award of bursaries and fellowships.
77	time start applying college scholarship literally thousand scholarship	It's time to start applying the scholarship to the university, and to start applying it to students.	It is time to start applying the university scholarship literally a thousand scholarships.	It's time to start applying the scholarship literally thousand scholarships.
77	lh ainsworth cancer scholarship university south wale australia beasiswa	Lh ainsworth Fellowship in Cancer Studies The University of South Wale australia beasiswa.	Lh ainsworth Fellowship in Cancer Studies South Wale australia beasiswa University.	Lh ainsworth fellowship; cancer studies South Wale australia beasiswa University.
77	john orr award university edinburgh uk beasiswa scholarship	Dr. John Orr is a graduate student at the University of Edinburgh.	John Orr receives a scholarship to study at the University of Edinburgh.	John Orr receives a scholarship from the University of Edinburgh uk beasiswa.
77	college funding financing help free scholarship money technorati tag college funding college	University funding assists with scholarships; free technology studies college funding; university.	The funding of the university helps scholarships d' free studies technorati tag college financing of the university.	University funding helps with scholarships; free studies technorati tag college funding; university.
77	postdoctoral fellowship cancer duke university usa beasiswa scholarship	Postdoctoral Fellowships in Cancer Research Duke University of Alberta Beasiswa Fellowship.	Duke Postdoctoral Fellowships in Cancer Research University usa beasiswa dapos fellowship; studies.	Postdoctoral fellowships in cancer research duke University usa beasiswa dapos scholarship; studies.
77	crowley expands scholarship program nicaragua exemplary student awarded scholarship	Crowley is expanding the Nicaragua Scholarship Program.	Crowley expands the Nicaragua Studies Scholarship Program.	Crowley expands scholarship program in Nicaragua.
78	tax proposed fund flood relief	Proposed environmental tax; mitigation of environmental damage; flood.	Proposed tax; mitigation of flood funds; flood.	Proposed tax; relief of capital; flood.
78	cost australia flooding enormous news atlanta nyc	It's a great opportunity to learn more about water quality and water quality.	Cost australia flood huge news from apos; Atlanta nyc.	Cost australia flood enormous news from Atlanta nyc.
78	cbc ticker southeast australia brace flood australia deadly flood crisis forced people	The southern cbc ticker-is from the island; Australia's flood pinnacle flood crisis; deadly flooding forced people to use force.	The southern cbc ticker-is from lapos; Australian flood pens Australian flood crisis; deadly flood forced people to force.	The cbc ticker from the south-is from l'apos; Australia paddock Australian flood crisis d'apos; deadly flood forced people to force.
78	australia flooding cost enormous	Floods in Australia are also very expensive.	Floods in Australia cost a lot of money.	The cost of flooding in Australia is very high.
78	australia flooding cost enormous flooding australia people making	It was the first flood in the world to take place in Australia.	The floods in Australia cost a huge Australian flood.	Australian flooding cost a huge Australian flood.
78	australia deadly flood crisis forced people flee home monday vast swath muddy water spr	It is estimated that the number of people displaced from their homes in the region will increase by about 10 per cent from the previous year.	The deadly flood crisis in Australia forced people to flee their homes on Monday, a vast expanse of muddy spr water.	Australia's deadly flood crisis forced people to flee their homes on Monday, a massive spr mudslide.
78	australia brace flood	Flooding d' an Australian-made neck brace.	Flood of apos; Australian neck brace.	Australian neck brace flooding.
78	australia brace flood giant inland sea floodwater will spread australian state vi	In addition, there are a number of other sea-levels, such as the Great Lakes, the Great Lakes and the Great Lakes.	Giant floodwaters from the Australian Inland Sea will spread to the Australian state vi.	The Australian Inland Sea's giant flood waters will spread the Apos; Australian state vi.
78	scary cyclone yasi compare latest news queensland flood news au	Terrible Cyclone Yasi compares breaking news of flooding in Queensland.	The yasi cyclone compares the latest news on flooding in Queensland.	Terrible cyclone yasi compares the latest flood news in Queensland.
78	queensland flood blog arrived brisbane january surprised green	The blog Queensland flood blog came brisbane January surprised green.	Queensland flood blog blog has just arrived brisbane January surprised green.	The blog Queensland flood blog arrived brisbane January surprised green.
78	southeast australia set week flood	It's been a long time since we've been able to make a difference in the world.	The south-is of l'apos; Australia has created a week of floods.	Australia has created a week of flooding.
79	check darth vader superbowl ad hysterical vw academy commercial starring bill hater hadder	Check out superbowl darth vader and hysterical vw trade academy featuring Bill Hater Hadder.	Check out darth vader superbowl and hysterical vw trade academy featuring Bill Hater Hadder.	Check out darth vader superbowl and hysterical vw commercial starring Bill Hater Hadder.
79	watch bud light superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel	Look at the superbowl of bud light, the commercial chain youtube ad blitz.	Watch the superbowl of bud light, the commercial chain youtube ad blitz.	Check out bud light's superbowl, youtube ad blitz commercial channel.
79	motorola attack apple superbowl commercial motorola apple	Motorola attacks commercial superbowl apple motorola apple.	Motorola attacks apple superbowl commercial motorola.	Motorola will attack apple superbowl commercial motorola apple.
79	superbowl commercial kale fooducate	This product is available in a variety of formats.	Superbowl commercial fooducate kale.	Superbowl kale fooducate commercial.
79	video favorite superbowl commercial cute	Video Preferred Super Bowl advert cute.	Favorite video Superbowl cute ad mignon mignon.	Favorite SuperBowl cute commercial video.
79	ford commercial win superbowl	It's the Ford brand winning the Super Bowl.	Ford brand wins the Super Bowl.	The Ford brand will win the Super Bowl.
79	kia epic ride commercial	Kia epic rides, Kia epic rides, Kia epic rides.	Kia epic ride commercial epic kia.	Kia epic ride commercial kia epic.
79	motorola xoom super bowl commercial tip hat apple spot video	Motorola Xoom Super Bowl commercial video peak apple video spot hat.	Motorola Xoom Super Bowl commercial video peak apple spot video hat.	Motorola Xoom Super Bowl commercial video peak hat apple spot video.
79	superbowl commercial doritos pepsi stoked commercial sucked	Doritos pepsi commercial super bowl stoked commercial suce aspirated pub.	The commercial superbowl doritos pepsi stoked commercial suce aspirated pub.	The superbowl commercial doritos pepsi stoked commercial succe aspiré pub.
79	bud light good start superbowl	Superbowl light bud good start, superbowl.	Superbowl light bud good start superbowl.	Superbowl bud light bulb good start superbowl.
79	chrysler air super bowl commercial	Commercial Super Bowl Chrysler Air.	Commercial Chrysler Air Super Bowl.	Commercial chrysler air super bowl.
79	enjoyed vw beetle commercial superbowl favorite	J&apos liked the beetle's favourite commercial superbowl.	J' liked the commercial superbowl of the best beetles.	J' liked the commercial superbowl preferred beetles.
79	commercial superbowl beer doritos car	Superbowl of doritos commercial doritos beer.	Superbowl doritos commercial doritos beer doritos car.	Superbowl beer doritos commercial car doritos.
79	cb super bowl commercial favorite	Cb Commercial Preferred Super Bowl.	Favorite commercial Super Bowl.	Cb Commercial super bowl favorite.
79	best super bowl commercial year bridgestone beaver	Best Super Bowl in the Bridgestone Beaver Commercial Year.	The best super bowl of the year Bridgestone beaver commercial.	The best super bowl of Bridgestone commercial year beaver.
79	eminem brisk bizarre hip hop commercial	Eminem suddenly weird, weird hip-hop advert.	Eminem suddenly weird hip hop advert weird.	Eminem suddenly weird weird hip hop commercial weird.
79	check video super bowl heineken commercial verry funny	It's a gameplay video of the Super Bowl heineken.	Super Bowl Video heineken commercial verry funny.	Super Bowl video heineken commercial verry funny.
79	cutest vader volkswagen star war commercial air super bowl	This is the cutest Vader Volkswagen Star War in the world.	The cutest Air Super Bowl commercial Vader Volkswagen Star War.	Cuteest commercial air super bowl Vader Volkswagen Star War.
79	waiting tasteless violent pepsi tribute ronald reagan commercial superbowl	Waiting for a violent tribute pepsi of bad taste to Ronald Reagan, superbowl commercial.	Waiting for a violent pepsi tribute in bad taste to Ronald Reagan, commercial super bowl.	Waiting for a tasteful, violent pepsi tribute to Ronald Reagan commercial superbowl.
79	best commercial superbowl imported detroit chrysler spot	Best commercial super bowl imported from Detroit Chrysler spot.	The finest commercial superbowl imported from Detroit Chrysler spot.	The best commercial superbowl imported from Detroit Chrysler spot.
79	volkswagen sneak peek cute superbowl commercial fav	Volkswagen takes a look at some of the best-loved and best-selling commercial Super Bowl Eyes.	Volkswagen will take a look at their favourite commercial Superbowl cute eye.	Volkswagen throw a dapos; cute eye Superbowl commercial favorites.
79	commercial liking superbowl pepsi	Commercial who likes super bowl pepsi.	Commercial who loves superbowl pepsi.	A commercial who loves superbowl pepsi.
79	issue super bowl commercial	Advertise the Super Bowl.	To advertise the Super Bowl.	You know, advertise the Super Bowl.
79	volkswagen super bowl commercial force	Super Bowl Volkswagen sales force.	Volkswagen Super Bowl is a commercial powerhouse.	Volkswagen Super Bowl commercial force.
79	gonna lie bud light commercial musketeer pretty funny superbowl	I will m&apos m' elongate light bud commercial musketeer quite funny superbowl fun.	I'm gonna m' extend light commercial musketeer bud pretty fun superbowl fun.	I'm gonna m&apos m' elongate bud light commercial musketeer pretty fun superbowl.
79	superbowl kia optimum epic ride big game commercial bimarketing blog comunidade market	Superbowl kia optimal epic big commercial game comunidade blog bimarketing market.	Superbowl kia optimal epic tour big commercial game bimarketing blog comunidade market.	Superbowl kia optimal epic tour, big game commercial bimarketing blog comunidade market.
79	problem doritos commercial punchline start superbowl	Doritos problems Super Bowl SuperBowl commercial startup joke.	Doritos problems commercial superbowl Superbowl startup joke.	Problem doritos commercial joke startup superbowl Superbowl.
79	complete list super bowl commercial advertiser youtube	Complete listing Super Bowl advertizing advert youtube.	Complete Super Bowl listing youtube advertiser youtube.	Complete list Super Bowl advertiser youtube youtube.
79	dorritos pepsi commercial tyrant superbowl commercial	Pepsi Dorritos commercial tyran superbowl commercial superbowl commercial superbowl.	Dorritos Pepsi is a commercial superbowl tyrant superbowl commercial superbowl.	Dorritos Pepsi commercial superbowl commercial tyrant superbowl commercial superbowl.
79	chevy volt commercial prolly best simple tell great story nicely brandbowl superbowl	Chevy Commercial Volt prolly better simply tell a beautiful story markbowl superbowl.	Chevy Volt commercial prolly simply tell a beautiful story markbowl superbowl.	Chevy Volt commercial prolly better simply tell a beautiful story brandbowl superbowl.
79	cutest superbowl commercial darth vader	Cutest commercial Super Bowl ever made by Darth Vader.	The cutest of Darth Vader's commercial super bowl.	Darth Vader's cutest commercial super bowl.
79	watch chrysler superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel	Watch the chrysler superbowl, the commercial superbowl youtube ad blitz channel.	Look at the superbowl commercial chrysler youtube ad blitz channel.	Look at the chrysler superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel.
79	happy friday volkswagen super bowl ad ur fav superbowl ad time	Happy Friday Super Bowl Volkswagen Super Bowl and Super Bowl time.	Merry Friday Volkswagen Super Bowl and I' Super Bowl time.	Merry Friday Volkswagen Super Bowl and l' time for Super Bowl.
79	best superbowl commercial year stella adrian brody	Best Super Bowl in the Stella Adrian Brody Commercial Year.	The best superbowl in the business year Stella Adrian Brody.	It's the best superbowl in the world; the commercial year of Stella Adrian Brody.
79	bad best commercial movie trailer random urge buy doritos bud light superbowl	The trailer announces the best commercial movie bad wish to buy budding doritos superbowl light.	The trailer announces the best commercial movie bad wish to buy doritos superbowl light budding.	The trailer announces the best commercial movie bad random craving buy doritos superbowl bud light.
79	don rooting superbowl volkswagen budweiser best commercial	I'd like to thank you for your time and for your support.	Don l' rooting superbowl volkswagen Budweiser best commercial.	Don l' in rooting superbowl volkswagen budweiser best commercials.
79	ad watch blogging commercial nyt	Watch commercial advertising nyt nyt bloger nyt nyt.	Watch advertising bloger nyt commercial nyt nyt nyt.	To watch the advert nyt commercial nyt nyt.
79	super bowl commercial	Super Bowl ads.	A Super Bowl ad.	Super bowl commercial.
79	volkswagon commercial superbowl	Commercial Volkswagon Superbowl.	Commercial Volkswagon Superbowl.	Commercial volkswagon super bowl.
79	watch sony ericsson superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel	Look at Ericsson superbowl commercial blitz channel youtube.	Watch the gameplay of Ericsson superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel.	Watch sony Ericsson superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel.
79	happy friday volkswagen super bowl ad ur fav superbowl ad time	Happy Friday Super Bowl Volkswagen Super Bowl and Super Bowl time.	Merry Friday Volkswagen Super Bowl and I' Super Bowl time.	Merry Friday Volkswagen Super Bowl and l' time for Super Bowl.
79	favorite superbowl commercial doritos snicker darth vader volkswagen commercial pretty funny	The commercial super bowl, the commercial super bowl, the super bowl, the super bowl, the super bowl, the super bowl.	Commercial Superbowl favorite doritos snicker darth vader commercial volkswagen quite funny.	Commercial Superbowl favorite doritos snicker darth vader volkswagen commercial pretty funny.
79	best commercial hold closer tiny dancer budlight superbowl	Best advert to keep close the superbowl of dancers' light.	Better publicity stand closer the superbowl of dancers light.	Best publicity hold closer the superbowl of dancers light.
79	lmao didn feistyoldpeople chevy commercial superbowl	Imao napos has not driven people from Chevy Superbowl commercial.	Imao n' did not drive away the people of Chevy Superbowl commercial.	Imao n&apos, didn't drive the commercial Chevy Superbowl people out.
79	imported detroit best commercial superbowl chrysler	From Detroit, the best superbowl of all time.	Imported from Detroit, best commercial super bowl chrysler.	Imported from Detroit the best commercial chrysler superbowl.
79	beetle commercial creative superbowl great teaser	Superbowl commercial, creative, big-teaser beetle.	This is a superb commercial, creative, great teaser beetle.	Superbowl commercial creative big teaser beetle.
79	favorite superbowl commercial vw	Preferred VW Commercial Superbowl!	Favorite commercial VW Superbowl.	Superbowl favorite commercial VW.
79	motorola xoom superbowl ad reference	Motorola xoom superbowl.com.	Motorola xoom superbowl advertising reference.	Motorola xoom superbowl reference advertising.
79	doritos pepsi zone commercial woman bear superbowl	Doritos pepsi is a commercial area for women.	Doritos pepsi commercial area woman arbore superbowl.	Doritos pepsi commercial zone woman arbore superbowl.
79	dumb as skechers commercial wack as kimkardashian superbowl worst	Stupid as the skechers advertising wack like superbowl superbowl kimkardashian worst.	Stupid as skechers advertising wack as superbowl worst kimkardashian.	Stupid as skechers ad wack as kimkardashian superbowl worst.
79	watch volkswagen superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel escarabaajoos	Look at Volkswagen Superbowl ads youtube ad blitz canal escarabaajoos.	Watch Volkswagen superbowl ad youtube ad blitz canal escarabaajoos.	Look at Volkswagen superbowl ad youtube ad blitz escarabaajoos.
79	vote best superbowl commercial time awesome	Vote the Best Advertising Time of the Super Bowl.	Vote the best advertising time in the Super Bowl, please.	Vote the best superbowl advertising time.
79	superbowl budweiser product placement favorite commercial	Superbowl Budweiser Preferred Commercial Investment Product.	Superbowl budweiser commercial placement product favourite.	Superbowl budweiser favorite commercial placement product.
79	brasky doritos commercial win superbowl	Brasky Doritos wins the superbowl.	Brasky Doritos wins the superbowl.	Brasky doritos wins the super bowl.
79	chevy run deep chevrolet commercial superbowl ad check imabuzzagent	Chevrolet deep Chevrolet superbowl advertisement check imabuzzagent.	Chevrolet in depth Chevrolet advertisement superbowl check imabuzzagent.	Chevrolet in depth Chevrolet ad superbowl check out imabuzzagent.
79	andreawoo talked chrysler superbowl commercial	Etreawoo just mentioned the Chrysler Superbowl commercial.	So Etreawoo talked about the Chrysler Superbowl commercial.	Etreawoo mentioned the commercial Chrysler Superbowl.
79	doritos superbowl commercial	Commercial Super Bowl Doritos.	Doritos superbowl commercials.	Commercial doritos superbowl.
79	pepsi max bringing nite wait mcdonalds note commercial rule nfl superbowl brandbowl	Pepsi max bringing nite mcdonalds expectation note the nfl commercial rule superbowl markbowl rule.	Pepsi max bringing nite mcdonalds expectations note the nfl nfl superbowl brandbowl rule.	Pepsi max bringing nite expected mcdonalds note the commercial rule nfl superbowl markbowl rule.
79	popular superbowl commercial superbowl view feb fb share tweet	The popular commercial superbowl fb fb fb superbowl game shares the tweet.	The popular commercial superbowl superbowl fb fb shares the same tweet.	Popular superbowl commercial superbowl fb fb shares the tweet.
79	volkswagen commercial force superbowl toocute	Volkswagen superbowl sales force toocute superbowl.	Volkswagen superbowl toocute superbowl commercial force.	Volkswagen commercial force superbowl toocute superbowl.
79	diddy star superbowl ad mercedes diddy featured superbowl ad mercedes	It's a good thing that you're looking for, but it's not a good idea.	Diddy star superbowl ad mercedes diddy&quot, superbowl ad mercedes.	Diddy star superbowl ad mercedes diddy &quot presented superbowl ad mercedes.
79	doritos creep best commercial superbowl	Doritos attract the best commercial Super Bowls in the world.	Doritos attract the best commercial Super Bowls.	And doritos attract the best commercial superbowls.
79	budwiser continued commercial air superbowl sunday swag	It's not a big deal, but it's a big deal.	Budwiser continued the superbowl d' commercial air on Sunday swag swag.	Budwiser continued superbowl d' commercial air on Sunday swag swag.
79	superbowl commercial kale fitblog	This is a superb commercial kale fitblog.	Superbowl commercial kale fitblog.	Superbowl commercial kale fitblog kale.
79	best super bowl commercial commercial super bowl cream advertisi	Best Commercial Super Bowl Super Bowl Super Bowl Advertisi Cream Advertising.	The best commercial Super Bowl adverttisi Super Bowl advertti.	The best commercial Super Bowl Super Bowl Super Bowl advertisi cream advertising.
79	hilarious doritos commercial pitched superbowl	Laughing commercial Doritos have launched the Super Bowl.	The hilarious commercial Doritos have launched the superbowl.	The hilarious commercial Doritos launched the superbowl.
79	ditto pepsi max commercial win lmao superbowl	Says Pepsi max advertising earn lmao superbowl.	Said Pepsi max advertising win lmao superbowl.	Das Pepsi max publicity win lmao superbowl.
79	watching superbowl check chrysler commercial omg	Watch Superbowl check omg commercial Chrysler omg omg.	Watch Superbowl check Chrysler commercial omg omg omg.	Watch Superbowl check Chrysler commercial omg omg.
79	super bowl commercial	Super Bowl ads.	A Super Bowl ad.	Super bowl commercial.
79	motorward kia optimum epic ride super bowl commercial	Kia Epic Optimum Epic Super Bowl Ring Engine Commercial.	Kia engine optimizes ride epic Super Bowl.	Commercial epic Super Bowl ride engine optimum Kia engine.
79	ford paid shit load commercial air time superbowl	Ford paid for the shit, the apos time, commercial antenna superbowl.	Ford paid the shit, the time of d' commercial antenna superbowl.	Ford paid the shit, time to stop; superbowl commercial antenna.
79	youtube video sauna doritos superbowl commercial ad	Superbowl commercial advertisement video Youtube sauna doritos superbowl.	Youtube video sauna doritos superbowl superbowl commercial advertisement.	Youtube video sauna doritos superbowl commercial ad superbowl.
79	fast black beetle	Oh, quick black beetle.	Fast-paced black beetle.	That's a fast black beetle.
79	audi commercial best superbowl	Audi, the Best Commercial Super Bowl.	Audi, best commercial super bowl.	This is the best superbowl in the business.
79	superbowl ad ehhhh doritos funny lame brandbowl	It's a fun game to play with.	Superbowl ad ehh doritos funny limpbowl brand.	Superbowl ad ehh doritos funny brandbowl lame.
79	teamfollowback super bowl commercial doritos don hurt dog dog	Commercial Super Bowl Doritos do not harm dogs.	You know, commercial Super Bowl doritos don't hurt dogs.	Super Bowl commercial doritos don't hurt dogs, do they?
79	great commercial vw america video volkswagen passat super bowl xlv commercial	I've got a lot of video ads from the U.S.A. and a lot of commercials from the Super Bowl.	Vw big video ads from l' America Volkswagen passes Super Bowl xlv commercial.	Super Bowl xlv commercial video ads from Volkswagen America.
79	hit em kenny love audi commercial superbowl	It's a great way to get to know a lot of people.	Hit en kenny love commercial audi superbowl.	Hit en kenny love audi commercial superbowl.
79	feed epic sci fi car ad kia optimum super bowl commercial video trendhunter supe	Feed epic car science and optimal Super Bowl commercial trendhunter video supe.	Feed epic science car and kia optimal Super Bowl commercial video trendhunter supe.	Epic science feed car and kia optimal super bowl commercial video trendhunter supe.
79	worth daughter loved chrysler commercial watched time hulu save detroit	A girl worthy of the name loved Chrysler ads and watched as Hulu saved Detroit.	A real girl loved Chrysler ads and watched Hulu time save Detroit.	I mean, a real girl liked the Chrysler commercial and watched the time hulu save Detroit.
79	volkswagen star war commercial dominates super bowl twitter buzz	War Star Volkswagen, War Advertising, dominates the buzz twitter super bowl.	War star Volkswagen, the war ad, dominates the buzz twitter super bowl.	War star Volkswagen, the war ad, dominates the super bowl buzz twitter.
79	pug dorrito commercial best	Pug dorrito is one of the best in the business world.	Best commercial pug dorrito ever.	Pug dorrito commercial best.
79	super bowl commercial	Super Bowl ads.	A Super Bowl ad.	Super bowl commercial.
79	guru guide super bowl commercial favorite watch	Guru Guide Super Bowl - Preferred Commercial Watch watch.	Guru super bowl guide favorite commercial watch watch.	Guru guide super bowl commercial watch favorite watch.
79	chrysler minute commercial worth penny	Chrysler-minute penny-worth commercial.	Minute chrysler ad worth a penny.	Advertising chrysler minute worth a penny.
79	super bowl prediction volkswagen commercial force beat audi goodnight commercial seo	Super bowl prediction volkswagen commercial strength beating audi good commercial night seo night.	Super bowl prediction volkswagen commercial force beat audi good night commercial seo night.	Super bowl prediction volkswagen commercial force beat audi bon nuit commercial seo night.
79	pack vw superbowl darth vader commercial easily best well vw	Vw superbowl varth vader vader vw superbowl pack.	Pack vw superbowl varth vader commercial also good vw.	Pack vw superbowl varth vader commercial as well vw good.
79	revenge pug doritos nailed super bowl commercial	Revenge pug doritos commercial Super Bowl nailed.	Revenge pug doritos nailed commercial Super Bowl.	Revenge pug doritos nailed super bowl commercial.
79	wait vw beetle great commercial superbowl commercial beetle bug	Wait for VW coleoptera large commercial superbowl insect commercial insect beetle insect.	Wait for VW beetle commercial commercial superbowl insect commercial beetle insect.	Wait VW large commercial superbowl commercial beetle beetle beetle beetle.
79	didn doritos commercial boring superbowl	Dull commercial doritos, superbowl.	Boring superbowl commercial doritos.	The boring commercial superbowl doritos.
79	doritos didn superbowl commercial dead	Doritos has a super bowl commercial dead.	Doritos has super bowl commercial dead.	Doritos has dead commercial superbowl.
79	commercial motorola xoom suck people apple tool sb superbowl	The commercial engine xoom suck people's apple tool sb superbowl.	The commercial engine xoom suck people apple tool sb superbowl.	The commercial xoom suck people apple tool sb superbowl.
79	mercedes benz class coupe sl amg roadster revealed superbowl commercial tmr	Mercedes coupé class benz amg roadster has revealed its commercial superbowl tmr.	Mercedes coupé benz amg roadster class revealed superbowl commercial tmr.	Mercedes coupé class benz amg roadster revealed superbowl commercial tmr.
79	watch chevrolet commercial superbowl	Watch Chevrolet Superbowl commercial.	Check out the latest Chevrolet Superbowl.	Watch commercial Chevrolet Superbowl!
79	doritos commercial vote funniest superbowl commercial	"Doritos ""Voting; Doritos"" Doritos ""Voting; Superbow&quot."	"What; Doritos ""Vote; Doritos"" Vote; Doritos"" Vote; Superbow&quot."	It is important to note, however, that this does not mean that we do not have the resources to do so.
79	superbowl sucked pepsi max commercial prob best	I'd like to thank you very much for your time.	Superbowl suck pepsi max best commercial prob.	Superbowl suck pepsi max commercial prob best.
79	favourite commercial superbowl volkswagen commercial force	Volkswagen Superbowl Preferred Commercial Strength.	Commercial favourite Volkswagen Superbowl sales force.	Volkswagen Superbowl commercial favourite commercial strength.
79	view detriot chrysler superbowl commercial	For more information, please visit our website at www.cra.gc.ca.	See commercial detriot chrysler superbowl.	See detriot chrysler superbowl commercial chrysler.
79	best ad super bowl darth vader passat commercial	The best Super Bowl advert for Vader Passat is the Vader Passat advert.	The best Vader Passat Super Bowl ad is the Vader Passat advert.	The best ad for the Super Bowl for Vader Passat is the Vador Passat ad.
79	awesome bold superbowl commercial seriously going consider xoom tablet ipad	This is a super-daring ad for a superbowl that will seriously consider a new Xoom ipad tablet.	Big, bold ad for a superbowl that's seriously considering an Xoom ipad tablet.	A bold advert for a superbowl that will seriously consider an Xoom ipad tablet.
79	motorola xoom super bowl commercial tip hat apple spot video	Motorola Xoom Super Bowl commercial video peak apple video spot hat.	Motorola Xoom Super Bowl commercial video peak apple spot video hat.	Motorola Xoom Super Bowl commercial video peak hat apple spot video.
79	eminem brisk super bowl commercial	Commercial Super Bowl live Eminem.	Commercial Quick Eminem Super Bowl.	Eminem bright super bowl commercial.
79	chevy cruze comm fb feed captain america hell carmax comm superbowl commercial	Chevy cruze comm fb fb feed U.S. Captain Hell carmax com superbowl commercial.	Chevy cruze comm fb feed U.S. captain Hell carmax comm commercial superbowl.	Chevy cruze comm fb feed U.S. captain Hell carmax comm superbowl commercial.
79	pepsi putting mobile play super bowl advertising marketing branding mobile pepsi superbowl pr	Pepsi put mobile play Super Bowl marketing advert brand superbowl mobile pepsi.	Pepsi put Super Bowl mobile play marketing advertising brand mobile pepsi superbowl pr.	Pepsi put mobile play Super Bowl advertising marketing brand mobile pepsi superbowl pr.
79	budweiser wild west tiny dancer commercial definitely favorite superbowl	Budweiser Wild West mini commercial dancer definitely favourites superbowl.	Budweiser mini Wild West commercial dancer definitely favorite superbowl.	Budweiser Wild West mini commercial dancer definitely favorite superbowl.
79	vote favorite superbowl commercial poll don love	Vote for a survey of opinions.	Vote for apos; a public opinion poll.	Vote in favour of a public opinion poll on the project.
79	car commercial boring volkswagon enjoyed superbowl spot	A boring commercial car, the Volkswagon, enjoyed the superbowl spot.	A commercial car boring Volkswagon enjoyed the superbowl spot.	The superbowl spot was enjoyed by a boring commercial car.
79	darth vader volkswagen commercial best super bowl commercial youtube	Darth Vader Volkswagen is the best commercial Super Bowl commercial youtube youtube.	DART VERMER VERMER Volkswagen commercial best Super Bowl commercial youtube youtube.	Darth Vader Volkswagen commercial best Super Bowl commercial youtube youtube.
79	favorite superbowl motorola xoom tablet swipe apple tonight	Superbowl favorite xoom tablet motorola slide apple tonight.	Superbowl favorite motorola xoom tablet motorola slide apple tonight.	Superbowl favorite motorola xoom tablet slide apple tonight.
79	chrysler air super bowl commercial	Commercial Super Bowl Chrysler Air.	Commercial Chrysler Air Super Bowl.	Commercial chrysler air super bowl.
79	thumb xoom super bowl commercial great dig earphone	The Xoom Super Bowl is a super-sophisticated, high-performance, high-performance headphones.	Super Bowl Xoom inch commercial headphones big snooper.	Xoom Thumb Super Bowl commercial headphone great snoop.
79	missed chrysler riveting imported detroit superbowl ad eminem youtube	Chrysler missed the superbowl imported from Detroit.	Chrysler missed the imported superbowl from Detroit ad eminem youtube.	Chrysler missed superbowl imported from Detroit ad eminem youtube.
79	music featured motorola xoom super bowl commercial	Music featured Xoom Super Bowl commercial motorola.	The music also featured motorola xoom Super Bowl commercial.	The music featured motorola xoom super bowl commercial.
79	dragon cute drinking cola superbowl cocacola commercial	A dragon-cute drinker of superbowl cola, a Coca-Cola commercial.	A cute dragon drinking superbowl cola, a Coca-Cola commercial.	A cute dragon drinking cola superbowl, a commercial for Coca-Cola.
79	commercial going sunday super bowl favorite word beetle superbowl	Advertising goes on Sunday to Super Bowl favorite word, beetle superbowl.	Advertising going on Sunday Super Bowl favorite word beetle superbowl.	Ads going Super Bowl Sunday favorite word beetle superbowl.
79	doritos commercial funniest	Commercial Doritos is the funniest.	Funniest commercial Doritos.	The funniest commercial Doritos.
79	sneak peak superbowl ad lover super bowl ad watch big game	Super Bowl is a great game to watch and enjoy.	Superbowl pic ad ad ad lover Super Bowl to watch the big game.	Superbowl pic ad ad ad lover Super Bowl to watch big game.
79	volkswagen darth vader commercial good bet super bowl wager	Super Bowl bets Volkswagen darth commercial vader.	Volkswagen darth commercial vader good bet Super Bowl bet.	Volkswagen darth vader commercial good bet Super Bowl bet.
79	inproductive minute brilliant volkswagen commercial aired superbowl trekkie	Brilliant unproductive Minute Volkswagen broadcast superbowl trekkkie.	Minute unproductive brilliant advertisement volkswagen broadcast superbowl trekkkie trekkie.	Unproductive minute brilliant Volkswagen advertisement broadcast superbowl trekkie trekkie.
79	check video chrysler eminem imported detroit super bowl commercial ad	"Watch the video ""Chrysler Eminem"" imported from Detroit Super Bowl."	Watch the video Chrysler Eminem imported from Detroit Super Bowl commercial ads.	Watch the Chrysler Eminem commercial video imported from Detroit Super Bowl.
79	completely freaky sense sony xperia play commercial kind awesome creepy thumb superbowl	Scary Xperia sound plays commercial genre, scary scary scary superbowl.	The Xperia sound totally creepy plays the commercial genre, the creepy, creepy super bowl.	The creepy Xperia sound plays the commercial genre, the creepy, scary superbowl sound.
79	great advertising vw passat darth vader commercial	Vw passat darth commercial vader advert.	Big advert vw passat darth commercial vader.	Big vw passat darth vader commercial advert.
79	ffing football watching commercial st half doritos bridgestone faves superbowl	Watching the St. Doritos Bridgestone ads is a great way to play football.	Playing football by watching the St. Doritos Bridgestone ads, c' is a superbowl.	Playing football while watching the St. Doritos Bridgestone ads is a superbowl.
79	best commercial superbowl doritos guy saved best haha	Superbowl's finest player Doritos saved the best haha.	The best Superbowl Doritos player saved the best haha.	Superbowl's best player Doritos saved the best haha ever.
79	worst best super bowl commercial video	This is the worst commercial video ever made in the history of Super Bowl.	Worst commercial video of the Super Bowl.	Super Bowl's worst commercial video ever.
79	super bowl commercial report card ranking winner loser bleacher report	Super Bowl, trade bulletin, winners' rankings, losers' reports, filing cabinets, filing cabinets.	Super Bowl, sales bulletin, winner ranking, loser report, filing cabinets.	Super Bowl, commercial newsletter, winner ranking, loser report, binders, filing cabinets.
79	force strong great ad volkswagon superbowl commercial	Make the Volkswagen Super Bowl a big advertisement.	Make Volkswagen's superbowl a big advertisement.	To force great publicity for the Volkswagen brand superbowl.
79	youtube video brisk eminem super bowl commercial	Eminem Super Bowl is a game that you can play on video.	Vivid video YouTube eminem Super Bowl commercial.	Live video YouTube eminem commercial Super Bowl eminem.
79	audi green car superbowl commercial top ten super bowl commercial time	Top 10 Super Bowl Commercial Super Bowl Commercial Super Bowl Commercial Time.	Superbowl green car audi Top 10 Super Bowl Commercial Super Bowl Commercial Time.	Superbowl audi green car Top 10 Super Bowl commercial Super Bowl commercial time.
79	love coke commercial dragon superbowl	J' loves the Coke Superbowl.	J' loves the superbowl of cocaine.	J' loves the coke superbowl.
79	audi dream superbowl commercial	Commercial Audi Dream Superbowl.	Audi Dream Superbowl commercial.	This is the new Audi Dream Superbowl.
79	volkswagen commercial force best commercial darthvader passat	Volkswagen's market power is the best in the business.	Volkswagen commercial force better darthvader commercial passat.	Volkswagen commercial force best commercial darthvader passat.
79	decide win hyper masculine super bowl audience doritos super bowl ad	The Super Bowl Super Bowl announces that the Super Bowl will be won by the Super Bowl Super Bowl.	Super Bowl announces Super Bowl Super Bowl to decide to win Super Bowl Doritos Super Bowl.	Deciding to win super men's Super Bowl doritos Super Bowl announces Super Bowl.
79	angry bird commercial superbowl afk kill	It's the first time I've heard of a superbowl.	A commercial superbowl of angry birds kills.	A commercial superbowl d'apos; angry bird kills.
79	youtube chili pepsi max super bowl commercial pepsi max super bowl commercial jamaal al din nfl	Chili pepsi YouTube max commercial super bowl pepsi max commercial super bowl jamaal al din nfl.	Youtube chili pepsi max commercial super bowl pepsi max commercial super bowl jamaal al din nfl.	Youtube chili pepsi max commercial super bowl pepsi max commercial jamaal al din nfl.
79	face chrysler commercial freaked best superbowl lt	Commercial chrysler freaked out best super bowll lt.	Chrysler commercials freaked out best superbowl lt.	Chrysler commercial freaked out best superbowl lt.
79	commercial video eminem lipton brisk super bowl commercial	Eminem Lipton eminem eminem Lipton Super Bowl commercial video.	Commercial video eminem lipton Super Bowl break.	Super Bowl commercial video eminem lipton break.
79	love hate crime pepsi max commercial lol nice superbowl	J' loves Pepsi Max commercial hate crimes lol super cool super bowl.	J' loves the crime of hate Pepsi max commercial lol super cool super bowl.	J' loves hate crimes Pepsi max commercial lol super-cool super-bowl.
79	prudential whale chevy superbowl commercial	Cautious Whale Chevy Super Bowl Whale Commercial Superbowl Commercial Superbowl.	Commercial superbowl careful whale watching superbowl commercial superbowl.	Prudent whale chevy superbowl commercial superbowl.
79	audi luxury prison break super bowl commercial	Commercial Audi Luxurious Super Bowl Break Prison.	Luxurious Audi super bowl break prison.	Audi Luxurious prison break super bowl commercial.
79	great commercial superbowl audi pretty good jab mercedes	I liked the quality of the gameplay and the gameplay.	Superbowl commercial audi pretty good, jab mercedes.	Great commercial audio superbowl pretty good jab mercedes.
79	youtube video gm chevy super bowl commercial bumblebee	Gm video YouTube super bowl bumblebee gm video bumblebee commercial.	Youtube video gm chevy super bowl bumblebee commercial bumblebee.	Youtube video gm chevy super bowl bumblebee commercial bumblebee.
79	audi super bowl commercial online video audi	Audi Super Bowl Commercial Video Online Audi.	Audi Super Bowl commercial video online audi.	Audi Super Bowl commercial video audi online.
79	favorite superbowl ad pepsi max	I'm a big fan.	Top favorite for pepsi max.	Superbowl favorite ad pepsi max.
79	budwieser commercial tiny dancer hate superbowl	Commercial dancer Budwieser hates superbowl.	Tiny commercial dancer Budwieser hates superbowl.	Well, tiny commercial dancer Budwieser hates superbowl.
79	justin bieber roseanne barr super bowl ad wacky bunch superbowl commercial	Justin Bieber Roseanne Super Bowl and Wacky Bunch Superbowl Commercial.	Justin Bieber Roseanne Barr Super Bowl and Wacky Bunch Superbowl Commercial.	It's called the Super Bowl and Wacky Bunch Super Bowl Commercial.
79	vw superbowl commercial imho winner sweet adorable	Advertising superbowl winner imho sweet adorable.	Vw superbowl advertising win imho sweet sweet.	Vw superbowl advertising winner imho sweet adorable.
79	favorited youtube video gm chevy super bowl commercial bumblebee	Youtube favorite video gm video super bumblebee super bumblebee super bowl.	Favorite video YouTube gm chevy super bowl bumblebee commercial bumblebee.	Youtube favorite video gm chevy super bowl bumblebee commercial bumblebee.
79	advertising social medium technique combine super bowl tv commercial	The advertising of social media technique combine commercial super bowl tv.	Social medium technique advertisement combine super bowl tv commercial.	Advertising of social medium technique combine super bowl tv commercial.
79	status chevy cruze super bowl ad love superbowl commercial check imabzzagenr	Chevy Cruze Super Bowl Superbowl commercial love status check imabzzagenr.	Chevy Cruze Super Bowl status ad love Superbowl commercial check imabzzagenr.	Chevy Cruze Super Bowl status ad love super bowl commercial check imabzzagenr.
79	super cute adzone volkswagen force superbowl ad vader kid think control car	It's very nice to be able to enjoy the game, but it's good to be able to enjoy it.	Super cute adzone volkswagen superbowl force ad vader children think car control.	Super cute adzone volkswagen force superbowl ad vader kid think control car.
79	chrysler super bowl commercial brilliant case haven	Commercial Chrysler Super Bowl shiny Haven case.	Chrysler Super Bowl Haven shiny commercial case.	Chrysler Super Bowl commercial shiny case Haven.
79	chrysler commercial eminem best bad car terrible superbowl	Commercial Chrysler eminem worst terrible superbowl terrible car.	Chrysler commercial eminem worst bad car terrible superbowl terrible.	Chrysler commercial eminem best bad car terrible superbowl terrible.
79	homerun ohio chrysler superbowl commercial struck chord detroiters	Homerun ohio chrysler ad superbowl hit chord of detractors.	Homerun ohio chrysler superbowl ad hit chord with critics.	Homerun ohio chrysler superbowl advertising struck chord of detractors.
79	kia optimum epic ride big game commercial	Epic optimal ride ride Kia commercial game great game.	Kia epic optimal commercial game game ride ride.	Kia epic optimal ride ride big game commercial game.
79	superbowl force volkswagen commercial stellar mrx	Mrx Volkswagen Commercial Stellar Power Superbowl.	Superbowl Volkswagen Mrx commercial stellar force, sir.	Superbowl Volkswagen commercial stellar mrx force.
79	daddy prefers vw commercial messing mini darth superbowl dadstalking	Dad prefers that I' we're just marketing a mini-superbowl that harasses daddies.	Dad prefers that I' we commercialize a mini-superbowl that harasses dads.	Dad prefers that I' we're marketing a mini-superbowl stalking dads.
79	kia spent lot money optimum superbowl commercial	Kia has been spending a lot of money; optimized commercial superbowl money.	Kia spent a lot of money; optimal commercial superbowl money.	Kia spent a lot of money commercial superbowl.
79	doritos commercial raising dead best night superbowl nfl	Doritos Advertising Rise Death Best Night Super Bowl NFL.	Doritos ads get up dead best night superbowl NFL.	Doritos ads raise dead best night superbowl NFL.
79	pepsi max people laughing commercial kind laugh american idol audition superbowl	Pepsi max people who laugh at the adverts like American-style laughs superbowl audition.	Pepsi max people who laugh at advertising like laughs American idol audition superbowl audition.	Pepsi max people laughing at the advertising laugh American idol audition superbowl audition.
79	youtube video eminem lipton brisk super bowl commercial	Video YouTube eminem lipton vivid Super Bowl commercial.	Youtube video eminem lipton vivid Super Bowl.	Youtube video eminem lipton vivid, commercial Super Bowl.
79	budweiser spamming crappy commercial superbowl beer suck drink micros quit die	Budweiser spamming superbowl commercial beer sucks beverage microphones.	Budweiser spamming commercial beer shitty superbowl sucks the microphone beverage.	Budweiser spamming commercial superbowl crappy beer is sucking beverage microphones.
79	kia optimum commercial dumbest	Kia, the stupidest commercial optimum.	Stupidest commercial optimum Kia ever.	Stupidest commercial optimum Kia.
79	check video bridgestone unexpected obstacle super bowl xlii commercial	Watch the unexpected Bridgestone video Super Bowl Xlii Xlii Commercial Xlii Impediment.	Watch the Bridgestone video unexpected obstacle Super Bowl Xlii commercial xlii.	Watch the Bridgestone video unexpected super bowl Xlii commercial xlii obstacle.
79	commercial winning audi time luxury prison pepsi max dieting wife husband superbowl	The winning ads audi times deluxe prison Pepsi max max diet woman husband superbowl.	Winning advertising audi times prison luxury Pepsi max superbowl husband woman diet.	The winning ad audi times luxury prison Pepsi max diet husband superbowl woman.
79	top three super bowl commercial	Super Bowl's top three.	Top three Super Bowl ad.	The top three Super Bowl ad.
79	mercedes benz super bowl commercial	Commercial Benz Super Bowl Mercedes.	Commercial Mercedes Benz Super Bowl.	Mercedes Benz super bowl commercial.
79	eminem eminem lipton commercial super bowl bsckids	Eminem eminem ads Super Bowl bsckids.	Eminem eminem lipton advertisement Super Bowl bsckids.	Eminem eminem lipton advert Super Bowl bsckids.
79	youtube video bud light hack job superbowl commercial	Youtube video bud job hacking superbowl advertisement superbowl.	Youtube video bud job hacking superbowl ads superbowl.	Youtube video bud job superbowl advertisement superbowl hacking.
79	superbowl audi commercial	Commercial Audi Superbowl.	Commercial Audi superbowl.	Commercial superbowl audi.
79	volkswagen present best super bowl commercial going second version brill	Volkswagen presents the best Super Bowl advertisement for the Brill Super Bowl.	Volkswagen presents the best Super Bowl advertising go Brill second version.	Volkswagen presents the best Super Bowl advertising go second version Brill.
79	sony ericsson xperia play official super bowl commercial full launch coming february	Sony Ericsson xperia is officially playing the Super Bowl, a commercial game launched in February.	Sony Ericsson xperia officially plays the Super Bowl commercial full release from February.	Sony Ericsson xperia officially play Super Bowl commercial full launch from February.
79	watching superbowl darth vader commercial awesome love dude	I'm watching Super Bowl Darth Commercial Vader great love dude.	I watch Superbowl Darth Vader commercial awesome love dude.	Watching Superbowl Darth Vader commercial awesome love dude.
79	best worst super bowl commercial	Worst-ever Super Bowl commercial.	Worst Super Bowl commercial ever.	The worst Super Bowl commercial ever.
79	pepsi max ad pepsi refresh message superbowl commercial	Pepsi max ad pepsi will refresh your commercial Superbowl message.	Pepsi max ad pepsi refresh commercial Superbowl message.	Pepsi max ad pepsi refresh message Superbowl commercial.
79	superbowl volkswagen commercial force	Volkswagen Superbowl is a supermarket force.	The Volkswagen Superbowl is the world's largest supermarket.	Volkswagen supererbowl commercial force.
79	superbowl commercial volkswagen force smaller darth vader	This is a great way to get to know a lot more about the game.	Superbowl commercial volkswagen force smaller darth vader.	Superbowl commercial volkswagen force smaller darth vader.
79	superbowl pepsi commercial angry girlfriend pretty funny	Pretty funny commercial Superbowl Pepsi angry girlfriend.	Super Bowl Pepsi commercial angry girlfriend kind of funny.	Superbowl Pepsi commercial angry girlfriend pretty funny.
79	cc omg love commercial detroit superbowl brandbowl	Cc omg is a big fan of the Detroit Commercial Super Bowl.	Cc omg loves the commercial Detroit Super Bowl.	Cc omg loves the commercial superbowl in Detroit.
79	lt vote budlight commercial thumb superbowl	"Vote for a ""super bowl"" commercial."	Vote in favour of a commercial superbowl.	Vote in favour of a commercial superbowl and commercial superbowl.
79	fave st half commercial doritos grandpa superbowl	Half the big commercial doritos-father superbowl.	Half the commercial doritos big-father superbowl.	Well, half the commercial doritos big-father superbowl.
79	super bowl commercial	Super Bowl ads.	A Super Bowl ad.	Super bowl commercial.
79	doritos commercial clear doritos work superbowl	The commercial doritos clear doritos are working superbowl.	The commercial doritos clear doritos work superbowl.	Commercial doritos clear doritos work superbowl.
79	lololol doritos pepsi max killing superbowl commercial	Lolol doritos pepsi max will kill commercial superbowl.	Lolol doritos pepsi max kill superbowl commercial.	Lolol doritos pepsi max killing commercial superbowl.
79	newcar audia watch audi superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel	Newcar Audia watching Audi Superbowl advertising youtube Blitz Channel.	Newcar Audia watch Audi Superbowl advertising youtube Blitz Channel.	Newcar Audia watch the commercial Audi Superbowl youtube Blitz Channel.
79	physically congratulate pepsi woman physically harmed making commercial brandbowl superbowl	Physically congratulating the physically injured Pepsi by doing commercial superbowl.	Physically congratulating the physically injured pepsi woman on a commercial super bowl.	To physically congratulate the physically injured pepsi woman by doing commercial super bowl.
79	best superbowl commercial good game night good ad top superbow	The best good-night commercial superbowl good-playing game from the top of the list; rainbow.	The best commercial superbowl good night of good game from l&apos ad top of l' rainbow.	The best superbowl commercial good night's game of the good game of the game; ad top de l' rainbow.
79	terrific mercedes benz commercial superbowl extended version promising future	The Mercedes Benz commercial superbowl has been extended, and promises the future.	The commercial superbowl Mercedes Benz has been extended, promising the future.	The Mercedes benz commercial superbowl has been expanded, promising the future.
79	favorited youtube video brisk eminem super bowl commercial	Eminem Super Bowl is a gameplay video game.	Youtube favorite live video eminem Super Bowl commercial.	Favorite live video eminem commercial Super Bowl YouTube.
79	vw black beetle commercial favorite super bowl ad night	VW Black Beetle Super Bowl Favorite Commercial Night of Advertising.	VW Black Beetle is a favorite Super Bowl commercial night.	Super Bowl night commercial favorite VW Black Beetle.
79	volkswagen commercial black beetle spot st century beetle cutting edg	Mountain Pine Beetle Commercial Volkswagen.	Commercial mountain pine beetle volkswagen.	Volkswagen is a commercial plant for the mountain pine beetle.
79	kia optimum epic ride super bowl commercial nfl fanhouse	Super Bowl Super Bowl rides are a great way to keep track of the super Bowl fans.	Epic optimal ride Kia Super Bowl commercial fanhouse nf.	Epic optimal Super Bowl fanhouse commercial nfl ride.
79	budlight commercial superbowl fingerscrossed	Fingers crossed; arc-in-commercial sky.	We crossed the fingers of l' arc-in-commercial sky.	Fingers crossed; commercial sky-arc.
79	crash super bowl doritos pepsi max pepsico plan user generated commercial	It's a very good idea to have the same color as the one you're using.	Super bol crash doritos pepsi max plan pepsico generated by l' commercial user.	Super bowl crash doritos pepsi max pepsico plan generated by l' commercial user.
79	stella artois superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel	I'm a big fan, I'm a big fan, I'm a big fan.	Stella artois superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel.	Stella artois superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel.
79	eminem super bowl commercial damn chrysler commercial imported detroit	Eminem Super Bowl imported from Detroit.	Eminem Super Bowl commercial chrysler imported from Detroit.	Eminem Super Bowl commercial chrysler imported from Detroit.
79	super bowl commercial coca cola commercial coke	Great commercial Coca-Cola, commercial coke, commercial coke.	Super bowl commercial coke commercial coke commercial coke commercial coke.	Wow, super bowl commercial coke commercial coke commercial.
79	haha arod fed doritos commercial superbowl	Ha-rod fed Doritos Superbowl to the market.	Ha-rod fed commercial Super Bowl Doritos.	Haha arod fed Doritos superbowl commercial.
79	doritos commercial guy lick cheese guy finger favorite superbowl commercial	It's a good idea to go to the supermarket and have a supermarket and supermarket.	It's the supermarket's favorite superbowl cheese guy.	Doritos commercial guy lick cheese guy favorite commercial Superbowl.
79	best commercial super bowl imported detroit best	The best imported commercial Super Bowl in Detroit is the best one yet.	The world's best commercial super bowl imported into Detroit is the best.	The best commercial super bowl imported to Detroit is the best.
79	will write superbowl commercial someday vw take cake	J' Write an ad for the Super Bowl one day.	J' write an ad for superbowl one day.	J' will write an ad for the superbowl someday.
79	youtube present shawn moore soul reaching spreading love peace faith hope	Youtube present at l' love.	Youtube present at the festival of l' love.	Youtube present at the festival of l' love.
79	doritos funnyass commercial superbowl pug ftw	Doritos comicass commercial superbowl comicase ft commercial superbowl.	Doritos comicass commercial superbowl pug ftw commercial.	Como comicas commercial superbowl pug ftw commercial.
79	superbowl commercial big deal	You know, supermarket supermarket big deal.	Superbowl commercial big deal.	Superbowl commercial big deal.
79	superbowl commercial going bud light doritos pepsi	Superbowl advertising go budding doritos pepsi light.	Superbowl ad go bud doritos pepsi light go dorgeon.	Superbowl advertising go bud doritos pepsi light.
79	doritos super bowl commercial offensive video dorito	Doritos Super Bowl commercial video dorito video offensive offensive video.	Doritos Super Bowl commercial offensive video dorito video game.	Doritos Super Bowl commercial offensive video dorito video.
79	kia commercial advertising superbowl commercial snake consuming	Kia commercial advert superbowl consumer snake.	Commercial advertising superbowl commercial consumer snake.	Kia commercial advertisement superbowl commercial snake consumption.
79	poseidon kia commercial awesome superbowl	Commercial Poseidon Kia awesome super bowl super cool.	Super cool superbowl commercial Poseidon kia.	Poseidon kia commercial awesome superbowl super cool.
79	doritos commercial redemption superbowl	Commercial doritos superbowl of doritos redemption.	Doritos commercial doritos redemption superbowl.	Doritos superbowl commercial redemption of doritos.
79	watch audi superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel	Look at Audi Superbowl, the advertizing channel, youtube ad blitz.	Look at Audi Superbowl, the advertising channel youtube ad blitz.	Look Audi Superbowl, the advertising channel youtube ad blitz.
79	hilarious super bowl commercial	Hilarious Super Bowl ad.	It's a hilarious Super Bowl ad.	Super Bowl hilarious commercial.
79	youtube video chevrolet camaro superbowl commercial al chevrolet hd	You will be able to watch the video clip of the game.	Video YouTube Chevrolet camaro superbowl commercial at chevrolet hd.	Youtube video chevrolet camaro superbowl commercial al chevrolet hd.
79	imported detroit excellent car commercial paying attention eminen damn superbowl commercial	Imported strait excellent commercial car paying attention eminen super bowl whore commercial.	Imported strait excellent commercial car by paying attention eminen superbowl.	Imported strait excellent commercial car paying attention eminen superbowl commercial whore.
79	greatest super bowl commercial bridgestone reply youtubeadblitz superbowl sb	The biggest Bridgestone Super Bowl answers superbowl youtubeadblitz sb.	The biggest super bowl of Bridgestone answers to youtubeadblitz superbowl sb.	The biggest Bridgestone super bowl answers youtubeadblitz superbowl sb.
79	watched pugattack hilarious superbowl commercial check vote attack	J' have watched hilarious pugattack superbowl commercial check attack your attack.	J' watched pugattack hilarious superbowl commercial attack check your attack attack.	J' watched pugattack hilarious superbowl commercial check attack your attack.
79	okaaaay bowled super bowl well official bud light advert	Okaaaay at the Super Bowl Bowling game, officially announced by Bud.	Okaaaay at the official Super Bowl Bud announcer light.	Okaaaay at Super Bowl well official Bud announcer luminous announcer.
79	superbowl pepsi commercial best	It's the best in the business.	Superbowl pepsi best commercial.	Superbowl pepsi best commercial ever.
79	thi doritos superbowl commerical hot mess	These commercial doritos superbowl, hot hot messes.	These commercial superbowl doritos hot mess.	These commercial doritos superbowl hot mess.
79	doritos best superbowl commercial lmao	Doritos Best Commercial lmao Super Bowl.	Doritos best commercial super bowl lmao.	Doritos is the best superbowl commercial lmao.
79	case haven brilliant motorola xoom ad super bowl	The Xoom engine was the first of its kind in the world.	The case was the Xoom engine brilliant ad Super Bowl.	The case was Xoom engine brilliant ad Super Bowl.
79	chevy volt super bowl commercial discovery sb sbxlv	Chevy Volt Super Bowl sbxlv sbxlv commercial discovery.	Chevy Volt Super Bowl commercial discovery sbxlv sbxlv.	Chevy Volt Super Bowl commercial discovery sb sbxlv sbxlv.
79	doritos commercial super bowl banned sexy ban	The Doritos Super Bowl banned it; it banned it from being sexy.	The Super Bowl commercial of the Doritos banned the sexy ban.	The Doritos Super Bowl, a commercial super bowl, banned it.
79	volkswagen black beetle commercial teaser vw set air ad super bowl xlv	It's a good thing you're looking for a great game.	Volkswagen Black Beetle commercial teaser vw set air for super bowl xlv.	Volkswagen Black Beetle commercial teaser vw set air to super bowl xlv.
79	superbowl commercial winner vw vader xoom heard price bridgestone beaver	Superbowl commercial winner vw vader xoom has been awarded a bridgestone beaver prize.	Superbowl commercial winner vw vader xoom heard bridgestone beaver prize.	Superbowl commercial winner vw vader xoom heard price bridgestone beaver.
79	youtube mercedes benz super bowl commercial	Commercial Benz Super Bowl Mercedes YouTube.	Commercial Mercedes Benz Super Bowl YouTube.	Commercial Mercedes Benz super bowl YouTube.
79	superbowl commercial elantra psychedelic groupon wrong cocacola cool elantra win	Superbowl commercial psychedelic groupon cool cocacola win elantra.	Superbowl commercial psychedelic elantra groupon cocacola cool elantra win.	Superbowl commercial psychedelic groupon cocacola cool elantra psychedelic elite win.
79	doritos son funny as superbowl commercial wack	Funny son Doritos like superbowl pub wack.	Oh, Doritos son funny as superbowl pub wack.	Doritos son funny as superbowl wack ad.
79	lmao check funny commercial doritos pepsi max	Imao check out the funniest commercial pepsi doritos max.	Imao check out the funniest commercial doritos pepsi max.	Imao check funny commercial doritos pepsi max.
79	hella funnny drt superbowl funniest doritos commercial	Dr. drnny drt drt superbowl is the funniest Doritos advertisement doritos.	Dr. drnny drt drt superbowl the funniest ad Doritos doritos.	Dr drnny drt drt superbowl funniest Doritos doritos advertisement.
79	super bowl xlv commercial lm	It's a great game.	Super bowl xlv lm lm commercial.	Super bowl xlv commercial lm lm.
79	watch coca cola superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel	Check out the coca coca superbowl, the commercial chain youtube ad blitz.	Look at the superbowl of coca coca, the commercial chain youtube ad blitz.	Look at the coca coca superbowl, the youtube ad blitz commercial chain.
79	doritos commercial dog best	Best commercial dog, Doritos.	Doritos, the best commercial dog.	Doritos, best commercial dog in the business.
79	youtube video brisk eminem super bowl commercial	Eminem Super Bowl is a game that you can play on video.	Vivid video YouTube eminem Super Bowl commercial.	Live video YouTube eminem commercial Super Bowl eminem.
79	best superbowl commercial year chrysler comeback	This is the best return of the Chrysler de l'apos, the commercial year of the super bowl.	Best return of the chrysler de l' commercial year of the superbowl.	Best return from superbowl commercial year.
79	link superbowl ad motorola xoom tablet parody apple ad release feb	Superbowl link xoom parody tablet ad motorola promo apple feb.	Superbowl link ad motorola xoom parody apple promo feb tablet.	L'link superbowl ad motorola xoom tablet parody apple feb.
79	definitely forward superbowl commercial year esp steve martin cameo	There's no doubt that it was the commercial year of the superbowl at L' before that, with Steve Martin's superbowl cameo.	It's definitely the commercial year of the superbowl at l' before, with the camo of Steve Martin.	Undoubtedly the commercial year of the superbowl at l'apos, with Steve Martin's cameo.
79	eminem helped plug commercial yesterday superbowl second superbowlxlv	Eminem helped to put the ad yesterday superbowl 2nd superbowlxlv.	Eminem helped put the advert yesterday superbowl second superbowlxlv.	Eminem helped put the ad yesterday superbowl second superbowlxlv.
79	hashtags tv ad superbowl audi launch commercial twitter hashtag	Hashtags TV Superbowl Audi commercial launch Twitter hashtags.	Hashtags TV Superbowl Audi commercial launch Twitter hashtags.	Hashtags TV Superbowl Audi commercial launch of Twitter hashtags.
79	loved ad chrysler eminem super bowl commercial imported detroit	Eminem Eminem Super Bowl imported from Detroit, Michigan.	Ad ad chrysler eminem super bowl commercial imported from Detroit.	Ad ad chrysler eminem super bowl commercial imported from Detroit.
79	nice check video chrysler eminem super bowl commercial imported detroit	This is a great video from the Chrysler Eminem Super Bowl, imported from Detroit.	Nice super bowl chrysler eminem control video imported from Detroit.	Great video control chrysler eminem super bowl commercial imported from Detroit.
79	video volkswagen invades super bowl darth vader starwars superbowl	Video Video is a gameplay video game that you can play on your computer.	Video volkswagen invades super bowl darth vader starwars superbowl.	Video volkswagen invades super bowl darth vader starwars superbowl.
79	hahaha doritoes commercial best superbowl	Hahaha Dornitos Best commercial super bowl.	Hahaha Dornitos, best commercial super bowl.	Hahaha Dornitos is the best superbowl of all time.
79	volkswagen star war themed commercial superbowl	Superbowl commercial theme Volkswagen Star War.	Volkswagen Star War Theme commercial superbowl.	Volkswagen Star War commercial superbowl theme.
79	chrysler telling story well check chrysler commercial imported detroit	Chrysler is the name of the company and the name of Chrysler.	Chrysler does tell the story of the commercial Chrysler imported from Detroit.	Chrysler tells well l' story of commercial Chrysler imported from Detroit.
79	doritos wit homo commercial time wit dat la superbowl	Like gay, like the super bowl.	We're as gay as the super bowl.	I mean, like, as gay as the super bowl.
79	doritos super bowl commercial funny second going overboard	Second time, I go through-over the edge.	When Doritos Super Bowl goes, I go through-over the edge.	"What; Doritos Super Bowl; ..."" Second time, I'm going through-over the edge."
79	superbowl commercial top number gt force volkswagen	I'd like to thank you very much for your time.	Gt force volkswagen superbowl commercial top number gt volkswagen.	Superbowl commercial top number gt force volkswagen.
79	super bowl commercial volkswagen favored win seo	The Super Bowl was the first Super Bowl game in the world.	The commercial Super Bowl favored seo winning seo.	Commercial Super Bowl volkswagen favored seo winner seo.
79	pepsi promotes domestic violence crime superbowl ad	The Pepsi promotes the crime of super bowl domestic violence.	The Pepsi promotes the crime of domestic violence in the Super Bowl.	Pepsi promotes the crime of domestic violence at the Super Bowl.
80	republican party debt gear	L' Republican Debt Machinery.	The debt equipment of the Republican Party.	L' Republican party debt equipment.
80	rnc chair political vip super bowl republican national committee chairman reince priebus posted	Rnc political president vip Super Republican Super Bowl National Committee reince re priebus published.	Rnc political chairman vip super bowl republican chairman of the national committee reince re priebus published.	Rnc political vip super bowl republican president of the national reince re priebus published.
80	rnc appoints chairman tampa convention effort visit tampa republican nati tampa fl	President of the Tampa Convention Visit to Tampa Republican Nati Tampa fl.	To nominate the President of the Tampa Convention Visit to Tampa Republican Nati Tampa fl.	To nominate the President of the Convention of Tampa Visit of Tampa Republican Nati Tampa fl.
80	rnc money ronald reagan birthday	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	NRC money Ronald Reagan, Anniversary.	R.N.C. money Ronald Reagan Anniversary.
80	update michael steele resigns rnc	Update Michael Steele has resigned from RNC.	Update Michael Steele resigns from RNC today.	Update Michael Steele resigns RNC.
80	read open letter michael steele chairman republican national committee rnc tcot	Read the Open Letter Michael Steele Chairman of the Republican National Committee.	Read the open letter Michael Steele, Chairman of the Republican National Committee.	Read open letter Michael Steele Chairman of the National Republican Committee.
80	rnc best shot knocking debt time race leading pack	C&apos is the best time-watch shot in debt.	C&apos is the best shot for the race against the time of the debt.	C' is the best shot for the debt time trial.
81	black swan tonight amazing natalie portman talented actress bestmovieever blackswan lt	Tonight's Black Swan starring Natalie Portman is the best film ever written by Blackswan.	Black Swan tonight talented actress Natalie Portman best movie ever made by Blackswan.	Black Swan tonight Natalie Portman talented actress best movie ever Blackswan.
81	watched black swan mindblowing watch natalie portman deserves oscar mila kunis love lt	Natalie Portman deserved Oscar Mila Kunis, in love with him.	Natalie Portman deserves Oscar Mila Kunis, who's in love with her.	Natalie Portman deserves to be named Oscar Mila Kunis, in love with him.
81	wowsa black swan movie intense stirring hope natalie portman win oscar role	Black swans intense film hope Natalie Portman win Oscar role.	Black Wowsa swans intense movie hope Natalie Portman win Oscar role.	Wowsa black swan intense movie hope Natalie Portman win Oscar-winning role.
81	black swan artistically perfect portman acting brilliant plot shallow doesn affect overwhelming experience	The black swan, which acts as a shiny, shallow part of the body, does not affect it; the experience is overwhelming.	The black swan artistically perfect portman acting small shiny part n' does not affect l' overwhelming experience.	The black swan artistically perfect portman acting shiny shallow n&apos does not affect the overwhelming experience.
81	blackswan night amazing natalie portman will win oscar performance	Blackswan Amazing Night Natalie Portman wins performance award.	Blackswan Amazing Night Natalie Portman will win an Oscar performance.	Blackswan night amazing Natalie Portman will win an Oscar performance.
81	finished watching black swan twisted mental strain take embrace role natalie portman incredible	I'm done watching the twisted, twisted, black swan take on the role of Natalie Portman.	I'm done watching the twisted black swan take on the role of Natalie Portman, amazing.	No more watching the twisted mental tension black swan take on the role of incredible Natalie Portman.
81	black swan amazing natalie portman deserves award doubt will	Natalie Portman, the legendary swan, deserves a prize.	Natalie Portman, the amazing black swan, deserves a prize.	Natalie Portman, l' amazing black swan, deserves a prize.
81	black swan night london masterpiece portman oscar	The head chef-d&apos, London-based Portman Oscar, on Black Swan Night.	The night of the black swan, the chef-d' London work Portman Oscar.	The night of the black swan, Chief-d' London work Portman Oscar.
81	outstanding performance female actress natalie portman black swan sagawards	Natalie Portman Black Swan Sagawards, actress.	Exceptional performance by L' actress Natalie Portman Black Swan Sagawards.	L&apos performance exceptional; actress Natalie Portman Black Swan Sagawards.
81	congratulation natalie portman golden globe sag black swan seriously phenomenal sagawards	Congratulations Natalie Portman Golden Globe Black Swan Sagawards seriously phenomenal.	Congratulations Natalie Portman Golden globe Black Swan seriously phenomenal sagawards.	Well, congratulations Natalie Portman Golden Globe Black sag Swan seriously phenomenal sagawards.
81	black swan drama purest form portman doesn win academy corrupt aronofsky created masterpiece blackswan	The drama of the purest black swan, Portman, wins the apos; corrupt aronofsky academy created chief-d' blackswan work.	The drama of the purest black swan Portman wins the apos; corrupt aronofsky academy created head-d&apos blackswan work.	Portman's purest black swan drama wins apos; corrupt aronofsky academy created head-d' blackswan work.
81	obsessed natalie portman black swan amazed beautiful dancer	L' obsessive Natalie Portman Black Swan... astonished the beautiful dancer.	L' obsessed Natalie Portman Black Swan surprised the dancer.	L' obsessed Natalie Portman Black Swan astonished the beautiful dancer.
81	natalie portman better win oscar best actress black swan movie amazing time	It would be better if Natalie Portman won the Oscar Award for Best Amazing Weather Swan Black Actress.	Natalie Portman had better win the Oscar Award for Best Black Swan Film Award.	Natalie Portman better win the Oscar award for the best black swan movie amazing time.
81	black swan trippy natalie portman good performance	Natalie Portman, stumbling black swan, good performance.	Natalie Portman, black swan tripping, good performance.	Natalie Portman, black swan tripping, good performance.
81	black swan good movie melodramatic natalie portman phenominal shoe best actress	The Good Black Swan Melodramatic Natalie Portman phenomenal shoe best actress.	The good black swan melodramatic movie Natalie Portman phenomenal shoe best actress.	The black swan good melodramatic Natalie Portman phenomenal best actress shoe.
81	spellbound black swan night budget gross growing natalie amazing hope sweep nomination	The bewitching black swan's overnight budget is growing, Natalie is an incredible candidate for sweeping the apos; hope.	As the night budget of the bewitching black swan grows, Natalie is an incredible sweeping candidate for l' hope.	The bewitching black swan night budget is growing, and Natalie is an amazing candidate for the sweep of the apos; hope.
82	orange student dish school lunch white house chef orlando sentinel fl schoollunch letsmove	The orange cook from l' cooking school, the white housekeeper schoollunch sentinelle Orlando let go.	Orange cook from the cooking school, white house chef Orlando sentinelle schoollunch lets go.	The orange cook of the cooking school, the white house chef orlando sentinelle schoollunch lets go.
82	charlottesville city school offering student vegetarian option lunch	L&apos, Charlottesville Civic School, offers students a vegetarian lunch.	L&apos, a municipal school in Charlottesville, offers students a vegetarian lunch.	L' Charlottesville municipal school offers students a vegetarian lunch.
82	kamut international welcome improvement school nutrition bill	The international bill on improving nutrition in schools is welcome.	The international bill on improving school nutrition is a welcome development.	The international bill on improving school nutrition is welcome.
82	healthy school food pay save attention going	It's a good idea if you're looking for a place to eat.	Healthy food at school attracts less attention.	The healthy food at school attracts less attention.
83	senator avoiding tea party caucus	The Senate avoids the tea caucus.	The senator's avoiding the tea caucus.	The senator's avoiding the tea caucus now.
83	news sen paul tea party hold power hill predicted tea party movement	The news of the tea festival of Paulin has toured the world.	The news of Paulin's tea party has spread around the world!	The news of Paulin's tea party has spread all over the world.
83	dc medium opt tea party tea party caucus remains vigilant teaparty tcot tlot gop dem	The tea caucus at the middle hour stays alert and teaparty tcot glot gop dem tep.	The tea caucus at l' average hour remains vigilant and teaparty tcot tlot gop dem tep.	Tea caucus at l' average hour remains vigilant and teaparty tcot tlot gop dem tep.
83	antonin scalia charm tea party caucus simmi aujla politico	The hotel is located in the heart of the city, close to the city centre.	Antonin Scalia is charming tea party caucus simmi aujla politico.	Antonin Scalia charm tea party caucus simmi aujla politico.
83	senate teabaggers desperate caucusing member teatards tea thursday	Senate tea drinkers desperately caucus their members on Thursday.	Senate tea drinkers desperately caucusing their members' tea on Thursday.	They're senate tea drinkers desperately caucusing their members' tea on Thursday.
84	exsteme makeover grabbing heart don text drive	It's a great place to get your hands on some of the best stuff I've ever seen.	I want to grabbing heart don't need a text drive.	Extreme relooking grabbing heart don't text drive.
84	texting driving pledge ive close wresting median interstate	Sending a text message to a driver's candidate five times closer to the center of the highway.	Sending a text message to a driver's candidate five times closer to the median highway.	Sending from apos; a text to a driving candidate five times closer to the median highway.
84	mann texting driving	Mann texted to drive.	Mann's texting to drive now.	Mann's texting to drive.
84	signed pledge will text drive awsome orange thumb ring	Signed commitment will send by text an orange ring with the thumb.	L' signed commitment will send by text an orange ring with the thumb.	L' signed commitment will text orange ring with thumb.
84	don dangerous drink drive text drive	Don't be a fool, don't be a fool.	Don dangerous text reader drink reader.	Don dangerous drink reader text reader.
84	follow johnny mac jeanne pledge text drive	Follow Johnny Mac Jeanne on the text disc of his pledges.	Follow Johnny Mac Jeanne on the text disc of pledge pledges.	Follow Johnny Mac Jeanne on the pledge text disc.
84	alex brown	This is Alex Brown.	Alex brown.	Uh, Alex Brown.
84	mama texting drive damn raining	Mom keeps texting, it rains like crazy.	Mom texting, it's raining cats and dogs.	It's raining cats and dogs.
84	dont text drive	I don't have a computer.	I don't have the text reader.	I don't have a text reader.
84	join campaign texting driving save life future will help	Join the campaign by sending a life-saving message.	Join the campaign by sending a message to save your life.	Please, join the campaign by sending a message to save your life.
84	sign text drive	Sign reader text.	Sign text reader.	To sign text reader.
84	luster texting driving	Luminous text about driving.	It's a light text about the driving.	Well, it's a light text about the driving.
84	good app called auto text reply will auto text office car angel pledge don text drive	A good application called auto-text response will auto-text office because angel don don text drive.	A good application called auto text response will auto text office as angel don don text drive.	A good application called auto text response will auto text office because angel don don text drive.
84	teacher talking texting driving haaayy	The teacher speaks of a text message that leads to the end of haayyyy.	The teacher talks about a text that drives haaayyy.	The teacher is talking about a text message that drives haaayyy.
84	lt will text drive	There will be a reader of the text.	It'll have a text reader.	There will be a text reader.
84	awful watched don text drive video driving class	Don's text-driving class was horribly watched.	Don's driving text-mode class was horribly watched.	The text-mode driving class of Don was horribly watched.
84	well cant drive thing will text drive	Well don't drive the text-reading thing.	Well, don't drive the text-reading thing, then.	Well, don't drive the text reader thing.
84	worst person tonight stop will longer text drive	The worst person who stops tonight will have a longer text.	The worst person that s' will stop tonight will have a longer text reader.	The worst person who'll stop tonight will have a longer text reader.
84	commit texting tweeting driving	Please send us-a message.	S' please, send us-a message.	S' please, send us a message.
84	day ago driving started text thought	There's conduct started texting thought of a day ago.	There's conduct started text thought of one day ago.	There's started text thought one day.
84	podominick texting drive died	Well, the text engine podominick is dead.	The podominick engine is dead.	The podominick texting engine is dead!
84	texan driver promise text drive lt	Texas driver promises text reader.	The Texas driver promises a text reader.	The Texas driver will promise a text reader.
84	don text drive hey easily turn goodbye	Don't be afraid to say goodbye to your friends.	Don text reader hey easily turn good-bye.	Don text reader hey easily turn good-bye.
84	don text drive	Don texting drive.	Text drive don.	Don't text drive.
84	dont text drive safe life safe yourselfs	N' don't even send you-on security of life.	N' send no text about the security of life even you @-@.	N' send no text about security of life you-even.
84	seth godin texting working shouldn text driving talk cell phone argue wit	Need a little help.	We need to get some help.	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.
84	text driving drunk	Drunk-driving text?	It's drunk text.	Uh, drunk driving text.
84	justin bieber address danger texting driving extreme makeover music celebrity justin bieber	Justin Bieber s' addresses the danger by sending a text message leading to an extreme musical metamorphosis Justin Bieber celebrity.	Justin Bieber s' address to danger by sending a text message leading to an extreme musical metamorphosis Justin Bieber.	Justin Bieber s' address to danger by sending a text leading to Justin Bieber's extreme musical metamorphosis.
84	dangerous text drive besafe	Dangerous text-reader not working.	This is a very dangerous kind of text reader.	This is a dangerous text reader.
84	dont text drive	I don't have a computer.	I don't have the text reader.	I don't have a text reader.
84	seth godin news texting working shouldn text driving talk cell phone argu	We need phones, a text, phone, phone, phone.	I need a text, a phone, a cell phone, and a cell phone.	We need phone calls, text messages, cell phones, phone calls, cell phones.
84	greg biffle justin bieber address danger texting driving extreme makeover mtv	Greg Biffle Justin Bieber addresses the danger of driving an extreme, texto mtv-transformation.	Greg Biffle Justin Bieber address of danger of driving extreme transformation texto mtv.	Greg Biffle Justin Bieber danger address of driving extreme texto mtv transformation.
84	watching extreme makeover edition sad story texting driving text drive	Look at the' editions of the extreme, sad, text-driven, text-reading relookage.	Look at the' edition of extreme sad textual overhaul story leading text reader.	Look at the' edition of extreme re-branding sad story texto leading text reader.
84	gonna driving time will text drive	Driving time is the transmission time of the text.	Driving time will be transmission time.	The driving time will be the transmission time of the text.
84	don text drive remember	Remember the text reader.	Don't you remember the text reader.	Don't remember the text reader!
84	video terror texting toronto gta news toronto sun	Video of a terrorist attack.	Terrorist video text toronto gta news toronto sun.	Terrorist video texto toronto gta news toronto sun.
84	dont text drive worldwide	You can't drive textbooks all over the world.	I mean, don't drive text all over the world.	Don't drive text around the world.
84	drive text	You can start the reader's text.	Read the text from the reader.	Launch drive text.
84	life waste text life shouldn text drive	Waste of Text Life should be the driver of the text.	Wasting Your Text Life should drive your text.	Waste of text Life should drive the text.
84	twitition dont text drive remember alex brown	Twitition, which Alex Brown remembers.	Twitition, which the text reader remembers from Alex Brown.	Twitition, which the text reader will remember from Alex Brown.
84	justin bieber extreme makeover fan kid teen warning text drive inspired touched	Justin Bieber Extreme Kid Adolescent Makeover Fan Warning Text Drive inspired hit.	Justin Bieber extreme fan of makeover Kid Adolescent Warning Text Drive inspired hit.	Justin Bieber extreme makeover fan Kid Adolescent Warning Text Drive inspired inspired hit.
84	watching extreme makeover edition story sad don text drive	Watching the apos; History of the apos; Extreme Makeover Edition Sad Don Text Reader.	Watching the apogee; history of the apogee; edition of the extreme makeover sad Don text reader.	Look at the apos; apogee history; extreme makeover edition sad Don text reader.
84	watched extreme makeover edition awsome lt	J' looked at the makeover.	J' have watched the makeover.	J' I just watched the makeover.
84	don text drive remember alex brown	It's a good idea to try to make it easy for people to read it.	The text reader doesn't remember anything about Alex Brown.	The text reader doesn't remember Alex Brown.
84	save text save life don text driving text life imagine dream inspire	Save the text save the life only lead the text live imaginer dream inspire.	Recording the text save the life does text lead the text life imagine inspire dream.	Recording text save life does text conduct text life imagine inspiring dream.
84	don text drive example cell phone driving backseat	Don Text Reader Sample cellular phone(s) driving back seat.	Don Text Reader sample cellular phone driving backseat seat.	Don text reader sample cell phone driving backseat.
84	pledge text drive	This is a text-reader for pledges.	Text-reading of the text of pledges.	Donation pledge text reader.
84	hey dont text drive sake ur life sake love yall	Don't go.	Hey, don't you go.	Hey, hey, hey, don't go.
84	sign pledge text drive	Point out the text reader of the pledge.	Point to the pledge text reader.	Report the pledge text reader.
84	don text drive	Don texting drive.	Text drive don.	Don't text drive.
84	don text drive pledge	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	Don't text drive, promised.	Don't text drive promised.
84	texting driving good idea	T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T	T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T	T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T
84	mobile launch service osl	Mobile launch service is also available.	Mobile launch service osl osl osl.	Mobile launch service osl osl.
84	remember alex brown	Just remember-you d' Alex Brown.	Remember,-you don't know; Alex Brown.	This is the first time you've had a chance to do this.
84	shouldn texted driving snowy foo	Maybe we should text Snowy Foo while we're driving.	We better text Snowy Foo while we're driving.	You know, we should text Snowy Foo while we're driving.
84	don text drive makeachange	I don't know what you're talking about.	Don't text drive makeachange.	Don't text drive makeachange at all.
84	sign pledge abc makeachange	Sign the ABC Makeachange Oath.	Sign abc pledge makeachange.	To sign an abc makeachange oath.
84	textin driving remember alex brown teamfresh	The driver remembers Alex Brown, fresh out of the car; team.	The textin driver remembers Alex Brown, who had just been released from the Textin team.	The textin driver remembers Alex Brown, fresh off the team.
84	drive text include tweeting	Tweets are included in the reader's text.	The reader text includes tweets.	Reader text includes tweets.
84	think extreme makeover edition great message tonight don text drive	Think extreme make-over grand message edition tonight Don text reader.	Think extreme makeover edition grand message tonight Don Text Reader.	Think extreme makeover edition grand message tonight Don text reader.
84	remember alex brown don text drive lt ambrat gt	Remember-you d' Alex Brown Don Text Drive gt.	Remember-you d&apos Alex Brown Don Text Drive lt ambrat gt.	Remember Alex Brown Don Text Drive lt ambrat gt.
84	bringing tear message heart don text drive	Bring the Message of Tears Heart Don Text Reader Don Text.	Bring the message of tears of heart Don text reader Don text.	Bring the message of heart tears Don text reader Don text.
84	omg oprah plege wouldn text drive didn seriously lol xd bbl	Omg oprah plege would be a serious n&apos text reader; a serious lol xd bbl xd text reader.	Omg oprah plege would be text reader n' has seriously lol xd bbl xd seriously.	Omg oprah plege would text reader n' seriously lol xd bbl xd seriously.
84	watching extreme makeover don text drive	See l' Extreme Relooking Don Text Drive.	Look at the' extreme Don Text drive makeover.	Watch the extreme makeover Don text drive.
84	reading learn well knew dont text drive time donttextdrive	Learn how to read, write, write, write, read, read, write, read, read, read, write, read, read, write, read, read, write, read, read, write, write, read, write, read, write, write, read, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write.	Read well-known learn whose time-reading text does not text text reader.	Read to learn well known whose time-reading text does not text text reader.
84	app called auto text reply will auto text office car angel pledge don text drive	An application called auto-text reply will auto-text office because angel don't give a text drive.	Application called auto text reply will auto text office as angel don text drive.	Application called auto text reply will auto text office because angel don text drive.
84	florida car accident attorney texting ban state road safer	He's a lawyer specializing in car accidents in Florida, sending out text messages from the DMV; forbidden.	Lawyer specializing in car accidents in Florida, sending SMS from' forbidden.	Florida car accident attorney, texting from and out; banned.
84	justin influence text drive	Justin influences reader of text.	So Justin influences the text reader.	Justin will influence the text reader.
84	going text driving	Text mode drive.	I'm sorry, it's a text mode drive.	I'm driving in text mode.
84	texting driving don mom	J' just text Don Mom's driving.	J' send texts to Don mom's driving.	J' texts Don Mom's driving habits.
84	seth blog texting working texting working shouldn text driving talk	Blog seth work texto work texto work should text to lead speech talk.	Blog seth work texto work texto work texto work should text drive talk talk talk talk.	Work blog seth texto work texto work should text lead talk talk talk.
84	tune abc check extreme makeover	Check the top finish of the abc.	Check the extreme finish on the apos; abc.	Check the apos' extreme finish; abc.
84	nightt twitterlandd remember text wait shawty lt	Nuitt twitterlandd remembers to wait for text shawty ltt.	Nuitt twitterlandd remember text waiting shawty ltt.	Nuitt twitterlandd remember text wait shawty ltt.
84	remember alex brown	Just remember-you d' Alex Brown.	Remember,-you don't know; Alex Brown.	This is the first time you've had a chance to do this.
84	don text drive	Don texting drive.	Text drive don.	Don't text drive.
84	teen told wont text drive donor yeah sad reading photo caption choked	He said that there was no such thing as a text giver, a sad reading, a smothered photo caption.	Teenagers said that there was no donor text yeah sad reading photo legend stifled.	Teenagers said that there were no text donors, yeah sad reading photo caption smothered.
84	seriously guy dont text drive addicted texting phone cant driving	Seriously, the guy who texts n&apos is not hooked on the phone, he can't drive.	Seriously, the guy who texts n&apos is not a phone addict, he can't drive.	Seriously, the guy who's texting is not a phone addict, he can't drive.
84	watched extreme makeover tonight awesome apart	Well, tonight, we've been witnessing an extreme makeover.	Tonight, we witnessed an extreme makeover on its own.	There's been an extreme makeover tonight.
84	smile katrina face extreme makeover aww seriously dont text drive	Katrina smile face l' make aww extreme seriously whose text reader.	Katrina smile face l' extreme make aww seriously whose text reader.	Katrina smile face to l' extreme makeover aww seriously including the text reader.
84	texting working shouldn text driving talk cell phone argue dog	S' texting while working should lead you to talk about your dog's mobile phone.	S' send texts while working should lead to talk dog phone argue mobile phone.	S' texting while working should lead to talk mobile phone argue dog.
84	extreme makeover	Extreme makeover.	It was an extreme makeover.	An extreme makeover!
84	remembering alex brown	Alex Brown, I remember.	I remember from Alex Brown.	And I remember Alex Brown.
84	amazing gah sad cry eye text drive watching will	L' incredible Gah sad eye drive text view Will.	L' unbelievable Gah sad eye text drive looking at Will.	L' amazing Gah sad eye text drive watching Will.
84	pledge text driving	Text of pledges leads to text.	The text of these pledges leads.	The pledge text drives it.
85	investor advisory firm call apple disclose ceo succession plan concern health apple chief	The investment consulting firm Apple disclosed the CEO's estate plan regarding the Chief Apple's health.	Apple's investment consulting firm unveils the succession plan of the CEO regarding the health of the chief apple tree.	Apple's investment consulting firm released the CEO's succession plan for the health of the chief apple tree.
85	apple steve job newsweek	Apple Steve is working newsweek.	Apple Steve uses newsweek as his name.	Apple Steve job newsweek.
85	internet news steve job medical problem affect apple stock latest internet news steve job	The Internet is a major source of information for the pharmaceutical industry, as well as for the public.	The medical problem of apples; use of apples; timeliness of apples; the Internet affects the stock of apples from the latest news; the Internet.	The medical problem of apples; use of apples; timeliness of apples; Internet affects the apple stock of the latest news; Internet.
85	ijsmblog week apple future steve job	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.	Ijsmblog week apple future employment Steve Steve.	Ijsmblog week apple future job Steve Steve.
85	potential replacement steve job tech idea steve job absent app	Idea, teamwork, teamwork, teamwork, teamwork, and teamwork.	It's an idea; it's a team, it's a team, it's a team, it's a team.	It's a good idea to have a team, a team, a team, a team, a team, a team.
85	potential replacement steve job electronics worked ibm year including senior role	L' replacement electronics has been working for one year, including a senior electronics management role.	Electronic replacement worked for a year, including a senior management role.	L' replacement electronics worked for one year including a senior management role.
85	apple disclose succession plan ceo steve job influential proxy advisory firm i report	Apple discloses the company's succession plan; proxies consulting business.	Apple is pleased to announce the release of the company's succession plan.	Apple discloses the succession plan of the company; employment of the company; consulting by proxy.
85	appropriate apple shareholder demanding steve job succession plan macabre tone	An Apple stockholder demanding Steve's gruesome succession plan.	An Apple stockholder demanding a gruesome succession plan for Steve.	An Apple shareholder demanding a gruesome succession plan for Steve.
85	blog post potential replacement steve job apple	The blog posts a potential Steve job Apple replacement.	The blog posts the potential replacement Steve job Apple.	Blog posts potential replacement Steve job Apple.
85	potential replacement steve job	Potential steve replacement.	Potential Steve replacement position.	Steve's potential replacement position.
85	steve job health private matter joe wilcox betanewssadly reaffirm position stated du	Health and Safety at Work, Private Business Joe Wilcox Betanewssadly reaffirms the position set out in the present document.	A Private Case Joe Wilcox Betanewssadly reaffirms the position set out in this paper.	Occupational health, a private matter Joe Wilcox Betanewssadly reaffirms the position of this paper.
85	netgear bos astonishing attack steve job	Netgear's bona fide bona fide bona fide attack on Steve's work.	Netgear bosante amazing attack on Steve's work.	Netgear surprising bosante attack of Steve's work.
85	tim cook step steve job apple san francisco chronicle	Tim Cook Step Steve is a chronic Apple San Francisco job.	Tim Cook Step Steve is a chronic job at Apple San Francisco.	Tim Cook Step Steve job Apple San Francisco chronic.
85	global cio apple face mounting pressure steve job succession plan	This is the first time in the world that the world has seen an increase in the number of jobs.	Global apple in the face of rising succession plan pressure.	Global apple cio facing mounting pressure succession plan d' employment.
85	wired legendary steve job leave absence medical reason second time	C' is the second time that Steve legendary s' has been absent for medical reasons.	C' is the second time that Steve legendary s' absent for medical reasons.	C' is legendary Steve's second time s' absent for medical reasons.
85	recap steve job will good time apple	Let's go over Steve's work now and then apple.	Going over Steve's work will be apple time.	Let's go over Steve's work in good time apple.
86	bullet rescuer hit captain arai mahomed somali pirate captured south	A bullet-saving man hit Captain Arai at home, a pirate Somali captured in the south.	A bullet-saver hit Captain Arai at home, a Somali pirate captured in the south.	Bullet rescue hit Captain Arai at home, Somali pirate captured in the south.
86	south korea target pirate incorporation anti piracy operation gulf aden op	The goal of South Korea is to integrate pirates into anti-piracy operations.	South Korea's goal is to integrate pirates into anti-piracy operations.	South Korea aims to integrate the use of pirates into anti-piracy operations.
86	second tweet somali piracy sea economist	Somali, hijacker of the air.	"Second tweet, ""Somasa, hacker of the air."""	It's the first time I've heard of it, and it's the first time I've heard it.
86	iranian oil tanker escape pirate attack	Iranian tanker escapes pirate attack.	An Iranian tanker escaped a pirate attack.	There's a pirate attack on an Iranian tanker.
86	indian navy sink mother ship somali pirate arabian sea held fifteen pirate custody	The Indian Navy sank the Somali mother ship Arab pirate Sea D'apos; held Arabian 15 Pirate Guard.	The Indian navy sank the Somali mother ship Arab pirate Sea D' Arabia held 15 guards pirate.	Indian navy sinks Somali mother ship Arab pirate Sea D' Arabian held 15 guard pirate.
86	pirate battle free norwegian ship	The pirates freely fought the Norwegian ships.	The pirates were free to fight against the ships of Norway.	Pirates are free to fight Norwegian ships.
86	indian navy coast guard rescue thai vessel pirate joint operation indian navy coast guard intercepted neutr	Indian Navy coast guard-saves Thai pirate ship.	The Indian Navy's-coastal guards save a Thai pirate ship.	Guards-off the coast of the Indian Navy save a Thai pirate ship.
86	indian navy seizes pirate indian ocean mothership don care tnfisherman	Indian Navy seizes ship-mother of the Indian Ocean do not worry tnfisherman.	The Indian navy seizes the ship-Indian mother of the island; ocean s' does not worry tnfisherman.	Indian navy seizes Indian mother ship from island; ocean doesn't worry tnfisherman.
86	test case malaysia selva somali pirate captured international water malay	Malaya selva somatic hijacker captured international malay water.	Case type Malaysia saltva Somali pirate captured international malay water.	Case type Malaysia saltva somali pirate captured international malay water.
86	navy hunt pirate ship	The Navy is hunting the pirate ship.	The Navy will hunt down the pirate ship.	Navy's chasing the pirate ship now.
86	navy destroys pirate mother ship arrest pirate indian navy coast guard joint operatio	Navy destroys ship-pirate mother, ship-mother, ship-mother, Indian navy, l' joint operation of guards-coasts.	The navy destroys the ship-pirate mother, the ship-mother, the ship-mother, the Indian navy, l' joint operation of the guards-coast.	The navy destroys the ship-pirate mother, the ship-mother, the ship-mother, the Indian navy, l' joint guard operation-coast.
86	indian navy arrest pirate drama high sea major anti piracy operation	India's navy is stopping the high seas pirate drama.	Indian Navy stops the pirate drama on the high seas.	And the Indian navy stops the pirate drama on the high seas.
86	best news somali pirate hijack german ship somali pirate hijacked german owned ship mv amirojkes	Better news than the pirate of l' Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Air Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate.	Better news than the pirate of l' pirate pirate air pirate German pirate ship pirate pirate German pirate ship owner of my friendrojkes ship.	Better news than the pirate of l' air pirate pirate pirate pirate German pirate ship pirate pirate my friendrojkes ship owner.
86	somali pirate killed south korea rescue freighter crew south korean commando secure boat	The Somali hijacker has killed the Apos crew, a South Korean rescue freighter.	The Somali pirate killed the apos; crew d' a South rescue freighter-Korean.	The Somali pirate killed the crew of a rescue ship from the South.
86	well korean navy rescue hijacked crew kill pirate	Yeah, well, the rescue of the hijacked Korean navy crew killed hacker kill.	Well, the rescue of the hijacked Korean Navy crew kill pirate kill.	Well, rescue of Korean Navy hijacked crew kill pirate kill.
86	somali pirate flown seoul somali men suspected hijacking south korean cargo ship arabian	They are also suspected of having hijacked a South Korean freighter.-Koreans.	The hijackers of the hijackers are being taken from men suspected of having hijacked a South Korean freighter.	Pirates of the Apos; airs&apos are taken from suspected men of Apos; hijacked a South cargo ship @-Korean.
86	trial pirate suspected hijacking south korean freighter samho jewelry arabian sea	Hijacking case suspected of d' hijacking South cargo ship-Korean Samho Arabian Sea jewels.	Hacker trial suspected of d' hijacking South cargo-Korean Arab Sea Arabian Samho jewel.	The case involved a suspected hijacking of the South freighter-Korean Samho Arabian Sea jewellery.
86	indian navy capture pirate lakshwadeep island indian navy captured	The Indian Navy captures the pirate Lakshwadeep Indian island capturing the captured Indian navy.	Indian navy captures pirate Lakshwadeep Indian island captures captured Indian navy.	The Indian navy captured the pirate, Lakshwadeep, on the island of India.
86	somali pirate expand motherships extend range game changer navy	The Somali pirates are expanding the mother ships... expanding the game ranges to change the navy.	Somali pirates extend mother ships expand gaming ranges to change the navy.	Somali pirates expand mother ships, changing the navy game ranges.
86	somali pirate face life sentence lee hyo sik somali pirate captured south korean special	Lee hyo sik Somali pirate captured South-Korean faces life imprisonment.	Lee hyo sik Somali pirate captured special South-Korean faces life imprisonment.	Lee hyo sik somali hijacker captured special South @-@Korean is facing the penalty of life imprisonment.
86	malaysia hold somali pirate saving ship	There's something like a lifeboat in Malaysia.	Malaysia's got something like a lifeboat.	Well, Malaysia's holding something like a lifeboat.
86	south korea negotiating delivery somali breaking news south korea negotiating delivery	South Korea brokering the Somali delivery news of the South Korean breakup negotiating the delivery.	South Korea trading Somali delivery breaking news South Korea negotiating delivery.	South Korea negotiating the delivery somali breaking news South Korea negotiating delivery.
86	singapore news somali pirate face prosecution malaysia kuala lumpur somali pirate captured	Singapore Somali pirate news face malaysia pursuit kuala lumpali pirate captured.	Singapore Somali pirate news face the pursuit malaysia kuala lumpur Somali pirate captured.	Singapore news somali pirate face the pursuit malaysia kuala lumpur somali pirate captured.
87	identity theft cost infographic long ago identity theft online	It's a good idea to create a web site that allows you to find out more about our products, services and services.	Uses; usurpation of images; identity costs money; computer graphics long ago; usurpation of images; online identity.	Uses; usurpation of images; identity costs money to users; infographic long ago; usurpation of images; online identity.
87	protecting financial info identity theft mail	Financial Information Protection, Identity theft, Mail theft.	It's about protecting your financial information, stealing your identity, stealing your mail.	Protection of financial information, theft of identity, mail theft.
87	identity theft cost infographic	It's a good idea to have your name on the list.	Identity theft is expensive computer graphics.	The cost of identity theft is high in computer graphics.
87	identity theft cost infographic online fraud crime rise mo	It's a big deal, but it's not a big deal, it's a big deal, it's a big deal.	Identity theft costs money; computer graphics Online fraud is on the rise.	Weaknesses; identity theft; identity theft costs money; computer graphics online fraud is on the rise.
87	identity theft cost infographic online fraud crime rise mo	It's a big deal, but it's not a big deal, it's a big deal, it's a big deal.	Identity theft costs money; computer graphics Online fraud is on the rise.	Weaknesses; identity theft; identity theft costs money; computer graphics online fraud is on the rise.
87	identity theft social medium smith credit report refinance discovered	It's a good way to find out what's going on, what's going on, what's going on, what's going on and what's going on.	Detection of theft, identity theft, social communication, seizures, refinancing of assets, and an uncovered black credit report.	Detection of theft; identity theft; social communication; re-financing; uncovered black credit report.
87	attorney general office identity theft prevention tip west virginia attorney general darrell mcgraw	Virginia Attorney General @-@Western, Darrell Mcgraw, was informed by the Attorney General of the Office of Robbery Prevention.	The Attorney General of the Office for the Prevention of thefts informs the Attorney General of Virginia @-@Western, Darrell Mcgraw.	Attorney General of the office of theft prevention d' identity informs Virginia Attorney General @-@Western, Darrell Mcgraw.
87	identity theft cost infographic	It's a good idea to have your name on the list.	Identity theft is expensive computer graphics.	The cost of identity theft is high in computer graphics.
87	colorado nation scammed state denver coloradan receive scam invitation	Nation Colorado scammed denver State Coloradan receive an invitation to scam.	Nation colorado scams denver State coloradan receive an invitation to scam.	Nation colorado scam d'Etat coloradan receive scam invitation.
87	type identity theft dark dragon grownup identity theft	Identity Identity Type Identity Identity Black Dragon Adult Identity Identity Identity Identity Identity Identity Identity Identity Identity Identity Identity.	Identity theft; identity theft; identity theft; identity theft; identity theft; identity theft; identity theft; identity theft; identity theft.	Identity theft; Identity theft; identity black dragon adult theft; identity adult theft; identity theft; identity theft.
87	identity theft cost create problem business deal reaching fake provider showz	The cost of the project; the usurpation of identity; the problems created by the project; the business to reach the fake supplier Showz.	The cost of theft; impersonation; identity creates problems for business to reach the fake Showz supplier.	The cost of identity theft creates problems for business to reach the fake Showz supplier.
87	thumbnail drive wi fi device convenient risky safe tip fb	Nail miniature reader wi fi convenient security tip fb.	L' thumbnail miniature player wi fi security point convenient device fb.	L' thumbnail miniature player wi fi convenient security tip fb.
87	colorado nation scammed state identity theft protection expert warn informatio	It's a great way to protect your privacy, and it's a great way to protect your privacy.	Nation colorado defrauded of the apo; state expert in protection against theft d'apos; identity warning information.	Colorado nation defrauded of apo; state theft protection expert; identity warning information.
87	identity theft cost infographic	It's a good idea to have your name on the list.	Identity theft is expensive computer graphics.	The cost of identity theft is high in computer graphics.
87	fact identity theft	Identity theft.	The fact: theft d' identity.	Fact: identity theft.
87	reminder beware identity theft harm credit tip protect identity	If you do not have the information you need, you may be able to use it.	Remind yourself that theft of identity can hurt business; access to credit.	Remind yourself that identity theft can affect credit.
87	identity theft steal social security number theft	It is also important to note that there is no information available on the identity of the individual.	The identity of a social security number theft of a social security number vol.	Identity theft; identity theft social security number theft social security number theft.
87	identity theft cost infographic online fraud crime rise mo	It's a big deal, but it's not a big deal, it's a big deal, it's a big deal.	Identity theft costs money; computer graphics Online fraud is on the rise.	Weaknesses; identity theft; identity theft costs money; computer graphics online fraud is on the rise.
87	identity theft social security number	Social Security Number (SIN) for theft of identity.	Social security number for theft; identity card.	Identity theft social security number.
87	identity theft cost infographic	It's a good idea to have your name on the list.	Identity theft is expensive computer graphics.	The cost of identity theft is high in computer graphics.
87	freemont tribune safety tip atm tip safety	Freemont point-of-safety point-of-safety atm security platform.	Freemont security stand point security end atm security point.	Freemont security platform security tip security tip atm security tip.
87	identity theft cost comment	Comment on the Cost of Flight d' Identity.	Comment on the cost of flying d' identity.	Comment on the cost of identity theft.
87	protect phishing scam	Fraudulent phishing.	Protect your identity; phishing fraud.	Protect them; phishing fraud.
87	apps equal chance identity theft	Calls equals luck, theft, identity.	Calls equals chance robbery d' identity.	Calls equal chance of theft; identity card.
87	protect internet	The author of the article on the protection of privacy.	The protection of the privacy of individuals; author of the article.	The Canadian Journal of Public Health, Vol.
87	identity theft resource center protecting personal identifying idtheft identitytheft	Identity that protects individuals from theft; identity.	Flight Service Resource Centre; Identity protecting individuals from theft.	Identity theft resource centre; identity theft protection; identity theft.
87	data privacy day roundup add ons tool tip protect online	Online protection tools are added at the Data Protection Day Gathering.	The Data Protection Day Gathering adds more tools for online protection.	The collection of the data protection day adds new tools for online protection.
87	protect laptop theft	Protect yourself from the theft of your personal computer.	Protect-you against theft from laptops.	Protect-you against laptop theft.
87	identity theft cost infographic online fraud crime rise mo	It's a big deal, but it's not a big deal, it's a big deal, it's a big deal.	Identity theft costs money; computer graphics Online fraud is on the rise.	Weaknesses; identity theft; identity theft costs money; computer graphics online fraud is on the rise.
87	identity theft cost infographic	It's a good idea to have your name on the list.	Identity theft is expensive computer graphics.	The cost of identity theft is high in computer graphics.
87	apps equal chance identity theft leslie meredith start year company	Apps equals flight chance; identity Leslie Meredith begins the company's flight year.	Apps equals flight chance; Leslie Meredith identity begins the company year.	Apps equals chance of flight; identity Leslie Meredith begins the company year.
87	identity theft cost infographic online fraud crime rise mo	It's a big deal, but it's not a big deal, it's a big deal, it's a big deal.	Identity theft costs money; computer graphics Online fraud is on the rise.	Weaknesses; identity theft; identity theft costs money; computer graphics online fraud is on the rise.
88	oscar nomination draw attention pa gas drilling gasland fracking	The name of the company is Oscar, and the name of the company is Oscar, and the name of the company is Oscar.	The nomination at Oscar draws attention to gas drilling fracking gazland fracking.	Oscar draws attention to gas drilling fracking gasland fracking.
88	today read concerned gasland movie stand set record straight	It's the first time I've seen it, but it's the last time I've seen it.	Today, the stand of the film Gasland set a record.	Today, Gasland's film stand set a new record.
88	oscar nominated gasland director josh fox gas drilling barnett shale dallas observer blog	Oscar appointed Director of Gasland, Josh Fox Gas Drilling Barnett shale Dallas Observant Blog.	Oscar appointed Director of Gasland Josh Fox Gas Drilling Barnett shale blog observer Dallas.	Oscar appointed gazland director Josh Fox gas drilling Barnett shale Dallas blog observer.
88	gasland scare oscar nom best doc news junkie post read njp film review eco greedmachine	Gasland fear oscar name best post-reading junkie news doc njp eco-critical movie machine avidity.	Gasland fear oscar name best doc news junkie post-reading njp movie-critical eco avidity machine.	Gasland fear oscar name best doc news junkie post njp film criticism eco avidity machine.
88	industry boo oscar nod gasland	Boo-scar nod gasland industry.	L' industry boo Oscar nod gasland industry.	L' industry boo oscar nod gasland industry.
88	vote best documentary oscar poll express pls	Vote on the best Oscar documentary express survey pls pls.	Vote on the best documentary oscar probe express pls pls pls.	Vote the best oscar documentary poll express pls pls.
88	gasland nominated academy award coga defends	The Coga de l'apos Academy, appointed by Gasland, promotes the interests of yoga.	Coga de l&apos, an academy appointed by Gasland, defends the interests of the coga.	The coga de l' academy appointed by Gasland defends the interests of the coga.
88	gasland oscar nod draw industry ire gasland documentary detail environmental impact process called fra	In addition, it is important to note that there is a need for more information on the natural gas industry, particularly in terms of its impact on the environment.	"The process of production; impact on the environment; natural gas industry called ""fresh"" is a documentary on the natural gas industry."	The production process; environmental impact; natural gas industry called fra is a documentary on the natural gas industry.
88	gas industry doesn gasland oscar nod figure fracking marcellus	L' Gas Industry makes an Oscar-winning Marcellus nod fracturing gas.	L' gas industry makes a nod Oscar-winning marcellus fracturing the gas.	L' gas industry makes a nod Oscar-winning marcellus fracturing gas.
89	pressure grows myanmar sanction call growing western sanction myanmar	Pressure increases Myanmar punishment calls for Western Myanmar punishment.	Pressure increases the Myanmar sanction is calling for Western Myanmar sanction.	The pressure increases the Myanmar sanction calls for Western Myanmar sanction.
89	pressure grows myanmar sanction afp	The penalty in Myanmar is increased by the pressure.	The pressure is increasing the Myanmar punishment.	The pressure increases Myanmar's punishment.
89	gbagbo camp futile cut ivory coast economy reuters ivory coast laurent gbagbo will find way	Gbagbo futile camp ivory cup of l' reuters Ivory Coast coastal economy gbagbo will find the way.	Gbagbo camp futile ivory cup of l' coastal economy Ivory rivals gbagbo will find the way.	Gbagbo camp futile ivory cup of l' coastal economy reuters ivory coast lago gbagbo will find the way.
89	wikileaks pushed uk sanction iranian bank cable view britain settin jpost	Wikileaks supported Iranian cable Uk's crackdown on settin britain jpost settin.	Wikileaks supported the Iranian uk cable britan view settin jpost britain-settin.	Wikileaks supported the Uk iranian cable view britain settin jpost settin.
89	suu kyi party urge west maintain myanmar sanction reuters	Suu Kyi Party urges the West to maintain the Reuters Myanmar sanction.	The party suu kyi urged the west to maintain the sanctions against Myanmar reuters.	The suu kyi party urges the west to maintain the punishment myanmar reuters.
89	gbagbo camp futile cut ivory coast economy	Gbagbo futile camp Ivory Ivory coastal economy.	Gbagbo futile camp cut Ivory coastal economy ivory.	Gbagbo camp futile cut ivory coastal Ivory economy.
89	toughens sanction belarus join eu widening sanction belarus leader follow	The sanctions increase the sanctions of the head of the belarus.	The sanctions harden the belarus join the apos; widening the sanctions of the head of the belarus.	Sanctions harden the belarus join the sanctions of the belarus leader.
89	sanction dull tehran commercial image casual observer sanction irania	Allow tehran boring commercial observer occasional irania sanction.	Allow Tehran commercial image boring occasional observer irania sanction.	Allow Tehran commercial image boring occasional observer irania sanction.
89	belarus promise adequate response eu sanction belarus voiced readiness proportionate	Belarus to promise an adequate response to the sanctions imposed on Belarus, expressed state of readiness.	Belarus promise an adequate response expressed sanctions Belarus state of readiness proportionate.	Belarus promise adequate response to sanctions Belarus expressed state of readiness proportionate.
89	expert differ sanction debate	The debate on sanctions is different among experts.	The debate about the sanctions differs from expert to expert.	Sanctions debate differs from expert to expert.
89	toughens sanction belarus join eu widening sanction belarus leader	The sanctions increase the sanctions of the head of the belarus.	The sanctions harden the belarus join the apos; widening the sanctions of the head of the belarus.	The sanctions harden the belarus join the apos; widening the sanctions of the belarus leader.
89	chamber commerce writes iran express opposition sanction capital loyalty homeland	"The Chamber Trade writes that the ""Iran"" expresses its opposition, sanctions the loyalty of capital, the homeland of the loyalty."	The chamber trade writes that Iran expresses its opposition, sanctions the loyalty of capital, homeland of loyalty.	The chamber business writes that Iran's opposition sanctions the loyalty of capital.
89	suu kyi party urge west maintain myanmar sanction reuters reuters party myanmar pro	His Kyi Party is urging the West to maintain the Myanmar Reuters penalty pro pro pro reuters.	His Kyi party urges the west to maintain the sanction myanmar reuters party pro myanmar reuters.	His kyi party urges the west to maintain the punishment myanmar reuters party myanmar pro reuters.
